VOL. II. 1
CHAPTER I.
STORY-TELLING.
In
the time of the Revolution, and for a good
many years afterwards, Old Nick enjoyed that solid
popularity which, as Lord Mansfield expressed it,
follows a man's actions rather than is sought after
by them. But in our time he is manifestly falling
into the sere and yellow leaf, especially in the
Atlantic states. Like those dilapidated persons who
have grown out at elbows by sticking too long to a
poor soil, or who have been hustled out of their
profitable
prerogatives by the competition of upstart
numbers
,
his spritish family has moved off, with bag and
baggage, to the back settlements. This is certain,
that in Virginia he is not seen half so often now as
formerly. A traveller in the Old Dominion may
now wander about of nights as dark as pitch, over
commons, around old churches, and through
graveyards
,
and all the while the rain may be pouring
down with its solemn hissing sound, and the
thunder
may be rumbling over his head, and the wind
moaning through the trees, and the lightning
flinging
its sulphurous glare across the skeletons of dead
horses, and over the grizzly rawheads upon the
tombstones
;
and, even, to make the case stronger, a
drunken cobbler may be snoring hideously in the
church door, (being overtaken by the storm on his
way home,) and every flash may show his livid,
dropsical, carbuncled face, like that of a vagabond
corpse that had stolen out of his prison to enjoy the
night air; and yet it is ten to one if the said traveller
be a man to be favoured with a glimpse of that
old-fashioned
,
distinguished personage who was wont to
be showing his cloven foot, upon much less
provocation
,
to our ancestors. The old crones can tell you
of a hundred pranks that he used play in their day,
and what a roaring sort of a blade he was. But,
alas! sinners are not so chicken-hearted as in the
old time. It is a terribly degenerate age; and the
devil and all his works are fast growing to be
forgotten
.
Except Mike Brown's humoursome
pot-companion
,
I much question if there is another legitimate
goblin in the Old Dominion; and in spite of Ned
Hazard and Hafen Blok, who do all they can to
keep up his credit, I am much mistaken if he does
not speed away to the Missouri or the Rocky
Mountains
one of these days, as fast and as silently as an
absconding debtor. Lest, therefore, his exploits
should be lost to the world, I will veritably record
this Chronicle of the Last of the Virginia Devils,
as it has been given to me by the credible Hafen,
that most authentic of gossips, as may be seen by the
perusal of what I am going to write.
The substance of this narrativefor I do not deny
some rhetorical embellishmentswas delivered by
Hafen after supper, as we sat in the porch at
Swallow
Barn until midnight, Hafen all the while
puffing
a short pipe, and only rising on his feet at such
times as his animation got beyond control, and
inspired
him to act the scene he was describing. The
witnesses were Mr. Wart and Frank Meriwether,
who sat just inside of the door, attended by Lucy
and Vic, who for the greater part of the time had
their arms about Frank's neck; and Mr. Chub, who,
though within hearing,for he was seated at the
window, also smoking,I do not believe paid much
attention to the story; although he was heard once
or, twice to blow out a stream of smoke from his
mouth, and say balderbash!an epithet in
common
use with him. But there were Ned and
myself
close beside Hafen; and Rip, who sat on the
steps in the open air, with his head occasionally
turned over his shoulder, looking up at the
story-teller
with the most marked attention: and lastly,
there were sundry wide-mouthed negroes, children
and grown, who were clustered into a dusky group
beneath the parlour window, just where a broad ray
of candlelight fell upon them; and who displayed
their white teeth, like some of Old Nick's own brood,
as they broke out now and then into hysterical,
cowardly
laughs, and uttered ejaculations of disbelief in
Hafen's stories that showed the most implicit faith.
MIKE BROWN.
Mike Brown
was a blacksmith, who belonged to
Harry Lee's light-horse, and shod almost all the hoofs
of the legion. He was a jolly, boisterous, red-faced
fellow, with sandy hair, and light blue eyes so
exceedingly
blood-shot, that at a little distance off you
could hardly tell that they were eyes at all. He
had no leisure, during the Revolutionary war, to get
them clarified; for, what with the smoke of his
furnace
,
and keeping late hours on patroles, and hard
drinking, his time was filled up to the entire
disparagement
of his complexion. He was a stark trooper,
to whom no service came amiss, whether at the
anvil
or in the field, having a decisive muscle for the
management of a piece of hot iron, and an especial
knack for a marauding bout; in which latter species
of employment it was his luck to hold frequent
velitations
with the enemy, whereby he became
notorious
for picking up stragglers, cutting off
baggage-wagons
,
and rifling rum-casks, and, now and then,
for easing a prisoner of his valuables. He could
handle a broadsword as naturally as a
sledge-hammer
;
and many a time has Mike brandished his
blade above his beaver, and made it glitter in the sun,
with a true dragoon flourish, whilst he gave the
huzza to his companions as he headed an onset upon
Tarleton's cavalry.
1 *
Towards the close of the war, he served with
Colonel Washington, and was promoted to the rank
of a sergeant for leading a party of the enemy into an
ambuscade; and, in addition to this honour, the
colonel made him a present of a full suit of
regimentals
,
in which, they say, Mike was a proper-looking
fellow. His black leather cap, with a strip of
bearskin
over it, and a white buck-tail set on one side,
gave a martial fierceness to his red flannel face. A
shad-bellied blue bobtail coat, turned up with broad
buff, and meeting at the pit of his stomach with a
hook and eye, was well adapted to show the breadth
of his brawny chest, which was usually uncovered
enough to reveal the shaggy mat of red hair that
grew upon it. A buckskin belt, fastened round his
waist by an immense brass buckle, sustained a sabre
that rattled upon the ground when he walked. His
yellow leather breeches were remarkable for the air
of ostentatious foppery that they imparted to the vast
hemisphere of his nether bulk; and, taken together
with his ample horseman's boots, gave the richest
effect
to his short and thick legs, that, thus appareled,
might be said to be gorgeous specimens of the
Egyptian
column.
Such was the equipment of Sergeant Brown on
all festival occasions; and he was said to be not a
little proud of this reward of valour. On work days
he exhibited an old pair of glazed, brown buckskin
small-clothes, coarse woollen stockings, covered with
spatterdashes made of untanned deer hide, and shoes
garnished with immense pewter buckles; though, as
to the stockings, he did not always wear them. Hose
or no hose, it was all the same to Mike! I am
minute
in mentioning the regimentals, because, for a
long time after the war, Sergeant Mike was
accustomed
to indue himself in this identical suit on
Sundays
,
and strut about with the air of a
commander-in-chief
.
Mike's skill in horseshoes rendered him very
serviceable
in the campaigns. On a damp morning,
or over sandy roads, he could trail Tarleton like a
hound. It was only for Mike to examine the prints
upon the ground, and he could tell, with astonishing
precision, whether the horses that had passed were
of his own shoeing, how many were in company,
how long they had gone by, and whether at a gallop,
a trot, or a walk; whether they had halted, or had
been driving cattle, and, in fact, almost as many
particulars
as might be read in a bulletin. Upon such
occasions, when appearances were favourable, he
had only to get a few of his dare-devils together, and
Tarleton was sure to have some of Sergeant Brown's
sauce in his pottage, before he had time to say grace
over it.
Mike used always to commence these adventures
by drinking the devil's health, as he called it; which
was done, very devoutly, in a cup of rum seasoned
with a cartridge of gun-powder, which, he said, was
a charm against sword cuts and pistol shot. When
his expedition was ended, he generally called his
roll, marked down the names of the killed, wounded
and missing by a scratch of his black thumb-nail,
and then returned the dingy scroll into his pocket, with
a knowing leer at the survivors, and the pithy
apothegm
,
which he repeated with a sincere faith, that
the devil was good to his own. This familiarity
with the old gentleman, as Mike himself termed
him, added to his trooper-like accomplishment of
swearing till he made people's hair stand on end,
begat a common belief in the corps that he was on
very significant terms with his patron; and it was
currently said, that Mike Brown and the devil
would one day be wearing each other's shirts.
When the war was over, the sergeant found
himself
a disbanded hero, in possession of more liberty
than he knew what to do with; a sledge and shoeing
hammer; an old pair of bellows; a cabinet of
worn-out
horseshoes; a leather apron; his Sunday
regimentals
in tolerable repair; and a raw-boned steed,
somewhat spavined by service:to say nothing of a
light heart, and an arm as full of sinew as an ox's
leg. Considering all which things, he concluded
himself to be a well furnished and thriving person,
and began to cast about in what way he should best
enjoy his laurels, and the ease the gods had made
for him.
In his frequent ruminations over this momentous
subject, he fell into some shrewd calculations upon the
emolument and comfort which were likely to accrue
from a judicious matrimonial partnership. There was
at that time a thrifty, driving spinster, bearing the
name of Mistress Ruth Saunders, who lived at the
landing near Swallow Barn. This dame was now
somewhat in the wane, and, together with her mother,
occupied a little patch of ground on the river, upon
which was erected a small one-storied frame house,
the very tenement now in possession of Sandy Walker.
Here her sire had, in his lifetime, kept a drinking tavern
for the accommodation of the watermen that
frequented
the landing. The widow did not choose to relinquish
a lucrative trade, and therefore kept up the house;
whilst the principal cares of the hostelry fell upon the
indefatigable and energetic Mistress Ruth, who, from
all accounts, was signally endowed with the
necessary
qualifications which gave lustre to her calling.
Mike, being a free and easy, swaggering, sociable
chap, and endowed with a remarkable instinct in
finding out where the best liquors were to be had on
the cheapest terms, had fallen insensibly into the
habit
of consorting with a certain set of idle,
muddy-brained
loiterers, that made the widow Saunders'
house their head-quarters on Sunday afternoons, and
as often on week days as they could find an excuse
for getting together. And such had been Mike's
habits
of free entertainment in the army, that he
acquired
some celebrity for serving his comrades in the
the same manner that he had been used to treat the
old Continental Congress; that is, he left them pretty
generally to pay his scot.
By degrees, he began to be sensible to the slow
invasion
of the tender passion, which stole across his
ferruginous bosom like a volume of dun smoke
through a smithy. He hung about the bar-room with
the languishing interest of a lover, and took upon
himself
sundry minute cares of the household, that
excused
some increase of familiarity. He laughed very
loud whenever Mistress Ruth affected to be witty;
and pounced, with his huge ponderous paws, upon
the glasses, pitchers, or other implements that the
lady fixed her eye upon, as needful in the occasions
of her calling: not a little to the peril of the said
articles
of furniture:for Mike's clutch was none of
the gentlest, in his softest moods. In short, his
assiduities
soon made him master of the worshipful
Mistress
Ruth, her purse and person. She had seen the
devil, according to the common computation, three
times, and had been so much alarmed at his last
visit thatthe story goesshe swore an oath that
she would marry his cousin-german, rather than be
importuned by his further attentions. There is no
knowing what a woman will do under such
circumstances
!
I believe myself, that Mistress Ruth chose
sergeant Mike principally on account of his well
known dare-devil qualities.
The dame whose worldly accomplishments and
personal charms had dissolved the case-hardened
heart of the redoubted blacksmith of the legion, was
altogether worthy of her lord. A succession of agues
had spun her out into a thread some six feet long.
A tide-water atmosphere had given her an ashen,
dough face, sprinkled over with constellations of
freckles, and exhibiting features somewhat tart from
daily crosses. Her thin, bluish lips had something
of the bitterness of the crab, with the astringency of
the persimmon. Her hair, which was jet-black, was
plastered across her brow with the aid of a little
tallow
,
in such a manner as to give it a rigid
smoothness
,
that pretty accurately typified her temper on
holiday occasions, and also aided, by its sleekness,
in heightening the impression of a figure attenuated
to the greatest length consistent with the
preservation
of the bodily functions. A pair of glassy dark
eyes, of which one looked rather obliquely out of its
line, glared upon the world with a habitual
dissatisfaction
;
and in short, take her for all and all,
Mistress
Ruth Saunders was a woman of a
commanding
temper, severe devotion to business, acute
circumspection
,
and paramount attraction for Mike
Brown.
After the solemnization of the nuptials, Mike took
a lease of Mr. Tracy of the small tract of land
bordering
on the Goblin Swamp, which, even at that day,
was a very suspicious region, and the scene of many
marvellous adventures. Of all places in the
country
,
it seemed to have the greatest charm for Mike.
He accordingly set up his habitation by the side of
the old county road, that crossed the marsh by the
causeway; and here he also opened his shop.
Mistress
Mike Brown resumed her former occupation,
and sold spirits; whilst her husband devoted his time
to the pursuits of agriculture, the working of iron,
and the uproarious delights of the bottle: whereto
the managing Ruth also attached herself, and was
sometimes as uproarious as the sergeant.
In process of time they were surrounded by four
or five imps, of either sex, whose red hair,
squiting
eyes, and gaunt and squat figures, showed their
legitimate descent. As these grew apace, they were
to be seen hanging about the smithy bare-footed, half
covered with rags, and with smutty faces looking
wildly out of mops of hair, that radiated like the
beams of the sun in the image of that luminary on a
country sign.
The eldest boy was bred up to his father's trade;
that is, he flirted a horse-tail tied to a stick, all day
long in summer, to keep the flies from the animals
that were brought to be shod; at which sleepy
employment
Mike was wont to keep the youngster's
attention alive by an occasional rap across the head,
or an unpremediated application of his foot amongst
the rags that graced the person of the heir-apparent.
Upon this system of training, it is reported, there
were many family differences betwixt Mike and his
spouse, and some grievously disputed fields. But
Mike's muscle was enough to settle any question.
So that it is not wonderful that the suffering Ruth
should sometimes have taken to flight, and had
recourse
to her tongue.
In this way, the spoiler Discord stealthily crept
into
the little Eden of the Browns; and from one
flower-bed advanced to another, until he made
himself
master of the whole garden. Quarrels then
became
a domestic diversion; and travellers along the
road could tell when the patriarch Mike was
putting
his household in order, by the sound of certain
lusty thwacks that proceeded from the interior, and
the frequent apparition of a young elf darting
towards
the shop, with one hand scratching his head,
and the other holding up what seemed a pair of
trowsers
,
but which, in reality, were Mike's old leather
breeches. The customers at the shop, too, affirmed
that it was a usual thing to hear Mistress Brown
talking to herself, for two or three hours, in an
amazingly
shrill key, after Mike had gone to his anvil.
And some persons went so far as to say, that in the
dead hour of night, in the worst weather, voices could
be heard upon the wind, in the direction of Mike
Brown's dwelling, more than a mile off; one very
high, and the other very gruff; and sometimes there
was a third voice that shook the air like an
earthquake
,
and made the blood run cold at the sound of
it.
From this it may be seen that Mike's house was
not very comfortable to him; for he was, at bottom,
a good-natured fellow, that loved peace and quiet;
or, at any rate, who did not like the clack of a woman,
which, he said, wore a man out like water on a
drip-stone. To be sure, he did not care about
noise, if it was of a jolly sort; but that he never found
at home, and therefore, as he took no pride in
Ruth, to use his own phrase, upon Hafen's report,
he naturally took to roaming.
He was an open-hearted fellow too, that liked to
spend his money when he had it; but the provident
Mistress Mike began to get the upper hand; and in
nothing are the first encroachments of female
despotism
more decisively indicated than in the regulation
of what is called the family economy. Ruth
purloined
Mike's breeches, robbed the pockets, and secured
the treasure. She forestalled his debtors, and settled
his accounts, paralyzed his credit, and, in short, did
every thing but publish her determination to pay no
debts of his contracting. The stout dragoon quailed
before these vexatious tactics. He could never have
VOL. II. 2
been taken by storm; but to turn the siege into a
blockade, and to fret his soul with mouse-nibblings,
it was enough to break the spirit of any man! Mike,
however, covered himself with glory; for after being
reduced to the last stage of vassalage, as happens
sometimes with an oppressed nation, he resolved to
be his own master again, (thanks to the lusty
potations
,
or he would never have made so successful a
rebellion!) and gave Mrs. Brown, on a memorable
occasion, a tremendous beating, by which he
regained
the purse-strings, and spent where and when and
as freely as suited his own entertainment.
There was one thing in which Mike showed the
regularity and discipline of an old soldier. He was
steady to it in the worst of times. No matter where
his vagrant humours might lead him, to what
distance
,
or at what hours, or how topsy-turvy he might
have grown, he was always sure to make his way
home before morning. From this cause he became
a frequent traveller over the country in all weathers,
and at all times of night. Time or tide did not weigh
a feather. He would snap his fingers, said Hafen,
at the foggiest midnight, and swear he could walk
the whole county blindfold. The fact was, Mike
was a brave man, and feared neither ghost nor devil,
and could hardly be said to be afraid even of his
wife.
One winter night,or rather one winter morning,
for it was past midnight,Mike was coming home
from a carouse. The snow was lying about
half-leg
deep all over the fields; and there was a crust
frozen upon it, that was barely strong enough to
support
his weight; at every other step he took, it broke
through with him, so that he floundered along sadly
without a track; and there was a great rustling and
creaking of his shoes as he walked. A sharp
northwesterly
wind whistled with that shrillness that
showed the clearness of the atmosphere; and the
moon was shining as bright as burnished silver,
casting
the black shadows of leafless trees, like bold
etchings, upon the driven snow. The stars were all
glittering with that fine frosty lustre that makes the
vault of heaven seem of the deepest blue; and
except
the rising and sinking notes of the wind, all was
still, for it was cutting cold, and every living thing
was mute in its midnight lair. Yet a lonely man
might well fancy there were sentient beings abroad
besides himself, for on such a night there are sounds
in the breeze of human tones, like persons talking
at a distance. At all events, Mike was at such
a time on his way home; and as he crossed the
trackless field that showed him his own habitation at
a distance, being in the best possible humour with
himself, and whistling away as loud as he could
not from fear, but from inward satisfactionhe all at
once heard somebody whistling an entirely different
tune close behind him. He stopped and looked
around, but there was nothing but the moon and
trees and shadows; so, nothing daunted, he stepped
on again, whistling as before, when, to his great
amazement, the other note was instantly resumed.
He now halted a second time. Immediately all was
still. Mike then whistled out a sort of flourish, by
way of experiment. The other did the very same
thing. Mike repeated this several times, and it was
always answered quite near him.
Who the devil are you! exclaimed Mike,
holding his hand up to his ear to catch the sound.
Look behind you, and you will see, replied a
harsh, screaming voice.
Mike turned suddenly round, and there he saw
on the snow the shadow of a thin, queer-looking
man, in a very trig sort of a dress, mounted upon a
horse, that, by the shadow, must have been a mere
skeleton. These were moving at full speed,
although
there was no road for a horse to travel on
either; but the shadow seemed to go over shrubs
and trees and bushes, as smoothly as any shadow
could travel; and Mike distinctly heard the striking
of a horse's hoofs upon the snow at every bound;
though he could see nothing of the real man or horse.
Presently, as the sound of the feet died away, Mike
heard a laugh from the voice in the direction of the
swamp.
Hollo! cried Mike, what's your hurry?
But there was no answer.
Humph! said Mike, as he stood stockstill,
with his hands in his breeches' pockets, and began to
laugh. That's a genius for you! said he, with a
kind of perplexed, drunken, half-humorous face.
As he found he was not likely to make much out
of it, he walked on, and began to talk to himself, and
after a while to whistle louder than ever. Whilst
he was struggling forward in this way, he heard
something like a cat-call down towards the swamp;
and immediately there rushed past him the shadows
of a pack of hounds, making every sort of yelping,
deep-mouthed cry. He could even hear the little
chips of ice that were flung from their feet, whizzing
along the crust of the snow; but still he could see
nothing but shadows; and the sounds grew fainter
and fainter until they melted away in the bosom of
the swamp.
Mike now stopped again, and folded his arms
across his breast,although he could not help
tottering
a little, from being rather top-heavy;and, in
this position, he fell gravely to considering. First,
he looked all around him: then he took off his hat
and ran his fingers through his hair, and after that
he rubbed his eyes. Tut, said he, it's all a
botheration! There's no drag in the world will lie
upon this snow. That's some drunken vagabond
that had better be in his bed.
What's that you say, Mike Brown? said the
same barsh voice that he had heard before, you
had better look out how you take any freedom with
a gentleman of quality.
Quality! cried Mike, turning his head round as
he spoke. You and your quality had better be a
bed, like a sober man, than to be playing off your
cantrips at this time of night.
Mike looked on the snow, and there was the
shadow
of the horse again, standing still, and the figure
upon it had one arm set a-kimbo against his side.
Mike could now observe, as the shadow turned, that
he wore something like a hussar-jacket, for the shadow
showed the short skirt strutting out behind, and
under
this was the shadow of a tail turned upwards,
2 *
and thrown across his shoulder. His cap appeared
to be a fantastical thing perched on the very top of
his head; and below the ribs of the skeleton horse
he could perceive the legs dangling with hoofs, one
of which was cloven.
Aha! exclaimed Mike, I begin to understand
you, sir. You are no better than you should be; and
I will not keep company with such a blackguard.
Then, good night, Mike Brown! said the
voice, you are an uncivil fellow, but I'll teach you
manners the next time I meet you; and thereupon
the shadow moved off at a hard trot, rising up and
down in his saddle, like a first-rate jockey.
Good night! replied Mike; and he made a low
bow, taking off his hat, and scraping his foot, in a
very polite fashion, through the snow.
After this, Mike pushed home pretty fast, for he
was growing more sober, and his teeth began to
chatter with cold. He had a way of thrusting aside
a back-door bolt, and getting into the house without
making a disturbance; and then, before he went to
bed, he usually took a sleeping-draught from a stone
jug that he kept in the cupboard. Mike went
through this manual on the night in question, and
was very soon afterwards stretched out upon his
couch, where he set to snoring like a trumpeter.
He never could tell how long it was after he had
got to bed that night, but it was before day, when he
opened his eyes and saw, by the broad moonlight
that was shining upon the floor through the window,
a comical figure vapouring about the room. It had
a thin, long face, of a dirty white hue, and a mouth
that was drawn up at the corners with a smile. A
pair of ram's horns seemed to be twisted above his
brows, like ladies' curls; and his head was covered
with hair that looked more like a bunch of thorns,
with a stiff cue sticking straight out behind, and tied
up with a large knot of red ribbons. His coat was
black, herring-boned across the breast with crimson,
and bound round all the seams with the same colour.
It fitted as close to his body as the tailor could make
it; and it had a rigid standing collar that seemed to
lift up a pair of immense ears, that were thus
projected
outwards from the head. The coat was very
short, and terminated in a diminutive skirt that
partly
rested upon a long, pliant tail, which was whisked
about in constant motion. He wore tight crimson
small-clothes, bound with black; and silk stockings
of black and red stripes, one of which terminated
in a hoof instead of a human foot. As he walked
about the room he made a great clatter, but
particularly
with the hoof, that clinked with the sound of
loose iron. In his hand he carried a crimson cap
with a large black tassel at the top of it.
Mike said that as soon as he saw this fellow in the
room, he knew there was something coming. He
therefore drew his blanket well up around his
shoulders
,
leaving his head out, that he might have an
eye to what was going forward. In a little time the
figure began to make bows to Mike from across the
room. First, he would bow on one side, almost
down to the floor, so as to throw his body into an
acute angle; then, in the same fashion, on the other
side, keeping his eyes all the time on Mike. He
had, according to Mike's account, a strange
swimming
sort of motion, never still a moment in one
place, and passing from spot to spot like something
that floated. At one instant he would brandish his
arms, and whisk his tail, and take one step forward,
like a dancing master beginning to dance a gavot.
In the next, he would make a sweep, and retreat to
his first position; where he would erect his figure
very stiffly, and strut with pompous strides all round
the room. All this while he was twisting his features
into every sort of grimace. Then he would shake
himself like a merry-andrew, and spring from the
floor upwards, flinging out his arms and legs like a
supple-jack, which being done, he would laugh very
loud, and wink his eye at Mike. Then he would
skip on the top of a chest, and from that to a table,
from the table to a chair, from the chair to the bed,
and thence he would skip off, putting his foot upon
Mike's breast as he passed, and pressing upon him
so heavily, that for some moments Mike could
hardly
breathe. After this, he would dance a morrice
close up to the bedside, and fetch a spring that would
bring him astride upon Mike's stomach; where he
would stoop down so as to bring his long nose
almost
to touch Mike's, and there he would twist his
eyebrows and make faces at him for several
minutes
;
and from that position he would fling a
somerset backwards, as far as the room would
permit
.
All this time the foot with the loose iron clanked
very loud. Mike was not in the least afraid; but
he tried several times to speak without being able to
utter a word. He was completely tongue-tied, nor
could he move a limb to help himself, being, as he
affirmed, under a spell. But there he lay, looking
at all these strange capers, which appeared so odd
to him, that if he had had the power he would have
laughed outright.
At last the figure danced up to him, and stood
still.
I have the honour to address myself to Sergeant
Brown the blacksmith? said he interrogatively,
making a superlatively punctilious bow at the same
time.
The same, replied Mike, having in an instant
recovered the power of speech.
My name, said the figure, is, here he
pronounced a terrible name of twenty syllables, that
sounded something like water pouring out of a bottle,
and which Mike never could repeat; I am a full
brother of Old Harry, and belong to the family of the
Scratches. I have taken the liberty to call and
make my respects this morning, because I want to
be shod.
Thereupon he made another bow, and lifted up
his right foot to let Mike see that the shoe was loose.
No shoeing to be done at this time of night,
said Mike.
It does not want but two new nails, said the
figure, and the clinching of one old one.
Blast the nail will you get till daylight! replied
Mike.
I will thank you, Mr. Brown, said the figure,
if you will only take my hoof in your hand, and
pull out the loose nail that makes such a rattling.
I can't do that, answered Mike.
Why not?
Because I am afraid of waking Ruthy.
I'll answer for the consequences, said the other.
Mistress Brown knows me very well, and will
never complain at your doing a good turn to one of
my family.
I'm sleepy, said Mike, so, be about your
business
.
Then, Mike Brown, I will waken you, cried
the other in a rage; I told you I would teach you
manners.
Saying these words he came close to Mike, and
seized his nose between the knuckles of the two
first fingers of his right hand, and wrung it so hard
that Mike roared aloud. Then, letting go his hold,
he strutted away with a ludicrous short step,
throwing
his legs upwards as high as his head, and bringing
them back nearly to the same spot on the floor, and,
in this fashion, whistling all the time a slow march,
he passed directly out of the window.
When Mike had sufficiently come to his senses,
he found his gentle consort standing by his bedside,
with a blanket wrapt round her spare figure, calling
him all sorts of hard names for disturbing her rest.
Her account of this matter, when she heard from
the neighbours Mike's version of this marvellous
visit from the devil, was, that she did not know
when he came into the house that night; nor did she
see any thing of his strange visiter; although she
was sure Old Nick must have been with him, and
flung him into such an odd position as he was in;
for he made a terrible, smothered sort of noise with
his voice, which wakened her up, and there she found
him stretched across the bed with his clothes on,
and his head inclined backwards over the side, with
both arms down towards the floor. She said,
moreover
,
that he was a drunken brute, and she had a
great mind to tweak his nose for him.
And I will be bound she helped the old devil to
do that very thing! said Rip.
I don't know how that was, replied Hafen,
but Mike's nose got bluer and bluer after that,
and always looked very much bruised, which he said
was upon account of the devil's fingers being hot, and
scorching him very much.
This adventure of Mike's gave him great celebrity
in the neighbourhood; and, by degrees, the people
began to be almost as much afraid of Mike as they
were of the goblin who was supposed to frequent the
swamp. Mike added to this impression by certain
mysteries that he used in his craft. He had the art
of taming wild colts by whispering in their ears, which
had such an effect that he could handle them at his
shop as safely as the oldest horses. And he
professed
to cure the colt's distemper, sweeny, and other
maladies, by writing some signs on a piece of paper,
and causing the horse to swallow it in his oats.
These accomplishments, of course, were set down
to the proper account; namely, to Mike's intimacy
with his old companion, which was known now to
be very great, as will appear by the following
incidents
.
Some years after the last adventure, in the
summer
,
about the month of June, when the moon was
in her third quarter, Mike was crossing the common
late at night, just as the moon was rising. He was
in his usual condition; for latterly Mike was
scarcely
ever sober. There had been rain that night, but
the clouds had broken away, and he was talking
to himself, and making the road twice as long as it
was, by crossing and recrossing his path, like a ship
tacking in the wind, and every now and then
bringing
himself up against a tree or sapling, and
sometimes
stepping, with a vast stride, across a streak of
shadow, thinking it a gully; and at others,
walking
plump into a real gully without seeing it, until he
came upon his back in the mud. On such accidents,
he would swear out a good-natured oath, get up,
and go on his way rejoicing, as usual.
It happened, as he was steering along in this plight,
there suddenly stood before him his old friend in the
herring-boned jacket.
How do you do, Mike? was his usual
salutation
.
Pretty well, I thank you, sir. Mike was noted
for being scrupulously polite when he was in his cups.
So, he made a bow, and took off his hat, although
he could hardly keep his ground.
Sloppy walking to night, Mr. Mike.
Sloppy enough, sir, replied Mike, rather short,
as if he didn't wish to keep company with the devil.
How is Mistress Brown this evening? said the
other, following Mike up.
Pretty well, I thank you, sir, returned the
blacksmith
,
walking as fast as he could.
Trade brisk, Mr. Brown?
Quite the contrary, replied Mike; there's
nothing
to do worth speaking of.
How are you off for cash? asked the other,
coming up close along side.
I have none to lend, answered the blacksmith.
I did not suppose you had, sergeant; you and I
have been acquainted a long while. I hope there is
no grudge betwixt us.
I never knew any good of you, said Mike.
Let us drink to our better friendship, said the
gentleman, taking a flat bottle from his pocket.
With all my heart! cried Mike, as he stretched
out his hand and took the flask. Here's to you,
Mr. Devil!
Hereupon they both took a drink.
Now, said Mike, let us take another to old
Virginia.
Agreed, answered the gentleman; so they took
another.
You're a very clever fellow! said Mike,
beginning
to brighten up.
I know that, replied the gentleman.
You are a man after my own heart, continued
Mike, here's your health again. Give us your paw,
old fellow. Then they shook hands.
VOL. II. 3
Let us drink to Mistress Brown, said the
gentleman
politely.
Damn Mistress Brown! I'll make you a present
of her.
I accept your offer, replied the other; here's
her health.
Well, said Mike, here's the health of your
wife.
I am much obliged to you, replied the
gentleman
.
Mistress (here he pronounced his own
unspellable
name,) will thank you herself some of these
days, when you may honour her with your
company
.
But Mike, as I have taken a liking to you, I'll
make your fortune.
Will you? cried the blacksmith; then I'm
your man!
Come with me, said the other, and I will
show you where you may find as much gold as you
can carry home in a bag. But you must not mind
trouble.
Trouble! exclaimed Mike. Any trouble for
money!
Follow me, said the gentleman.
Upon this they both turned their steps towards the
swamp, the broadest part of which they reached not
very far from the scene of their colloquy. The
morass
here was covered with sheets of water, some of
them ten or twelve yards in diameter. The
gentleman
in black and crimson easily traversed these,
without soiling his habiliments more than if he had
been in a drawing-room; but Mike made his way
with great difficulty, miring himself first in one hole,
and then in another, and sometimes plunging up to his
middle in water. But his companion exhorted him
to persevere, and kept up his resolution by
presenting
him now and then with the flask, which, Mike
said, was of great use to him.
At last they arrived at the inmost part of the
swamp, upon the margin of one of the ponds, in the
middle of which the water was about two feet deep,
but shallow towards the edges.
Now, said the gentleman, Mike, my brave
fellow! do you take a drink.
Certainly, replied Mike.
The bottom of this pond, continued the other,
is full of gold; and all that you have to do is to
rake it out. I'll get you a light rake.
With this he withdrew for a few moments, and
returned with a rake made of a white-oak sapling,
with twelve iron teeth to it, each about a foot long,
and put the implement in Mike's hand, who, having
taken a good deal from his host's flask, had much
ado to stand up. But still he was full of resolution,
and very much determined to make money.
The image of the moon was reflected upon the
water, whose surface being slightly agitated by the
breeze and the frequent movement of small insects,
broke the reflection into numberless fragments, that
glittered upon Mike's vision like pieces of bright gold
at the bottom.
All that you have to do, said Mike's conductor,
is to rake out these scraps of metal, and put them
in your pocket. Work hard, don't give up; and wet
your feet as little as possible. So make yourself at
home, for I must bid you good night.
Good night, uttered Mike, and joy go with
you, my old boy!
Finding himself alone in the bosom of the swamp
at this hour, and on the high road to fortune, the
blacksmith addressed himself to his task as
vigorously
as the inordinate depth of his potations would
allow. He took up the rake, that was lying on the
ground, and raised it perpendicularly, which was
as much as he could do and keep his balance,
considering
the state of his head, and the slippery ground
he had for a footing. Besides, the rake was very heavy,
being made of green wood, and at least twenty feet
long. When he had it well poised, and ready to make
a stroke in the water, he took two steps forward to
bring him immediately to the edge of the pond.
Here goes! he cried aloud, at the same time
flinging the rake downwards, which motion
disturbed
his centre of gravity, and plunged him headlong
into the pool. At the same moment with the plash
were heard a dozen voices, laughing from the midst
of the bushes, with a prolonged and loud ho, ho, ho!
that echoed frightfully through the stillness of the
night. Mike crawled out of the water, keeping hold
of the rake, and once more stood upright on his
former
foothold.
Well! ejaculated Mike, with a thick utterance,
and a kind of peevish gravity, what do you see to
laugh at in that? Never see a man in the water
before
?
He now very seriously raised the rake a second
time, and made a more successful pitch, driving it
into
the bottom, and breaking the water into a
thousand
ripples. Then, taking hold of the long shaft,
which he straddled, as children when they ride a stick,
he began to pull with might and main. He
strained
until the perspiration poured down his cheeks in
large drops; but the teeth had sunk so deep in the
mud, that the rake was immovable.
Pretty tough work! said Mike, stopping to run
his finger along his brow.
But all his efforts proved unavailing; and he was
therefore forced to wade into the pond again to
release
the iron teeth from their bed; and, resting them
lightly on the bottom, he again began to pull, and
succeeded in bringing the rake to the shore. Upon
examination, the fruit of all this labour was nothing
more than some decayed brushwood and grass.
No great haul that! muttered Mike to
himself
;
and instantly the swamp was alive again with
the same reverberations of the choir of laughers.
Mike considering this as a taunt that he would
bear from neither devil nor imp, returned it scornfully
and in defiance, by an equally loud and affected ho,
ho, ho! delivered in bass tones. I can laugh as
well as the best of you, he said, nodding his head
towards the quarter from which the noises came.
Mike's temper now began to give way; and as
he grew angry, he toiled with proportionate energy,
but with the same disappointment, which was
always mocked by the same coarse laugh. The
violence of his exertions, the weight of the
implement
3 *
with which he worked, and his frequent
drenchings, gradually overcoming his strength, he
grew disheartened, and began to wake up to the
real nature of his employment. The chill of the
night slowly dispelled the fever of his brain, and at
last the full conviction of the truth broke upon him.
If I was not a born fool, said he, I should
think I was drunk. I see how it is: that fellow that
left the marks of his hot fingers upon my nose, has
been playing his tricks upon me again. It is
unaccountable
;
but if I don't have my revenge, he may
bridle and saddle me both, and ride me over the
swamp as much as he pleases.
So saying, Mike threw down his rake, and
resolutely
retraced his steps through the marsh. As soon
as he set his foot upon the firm land, he heard the
voice of his late companion calling out, Good night,
Sergeant Brown! which was instantly followed
with the accustomed laugh.
Good night, you blackguard! cried Mike, as
loud as he could bawl. Your liquor is as bad as
your lodgings! and posted off homeward as fast as
his legs could carry him.
All the next day Mike ruminated sullenly over
this adventure, and the more he thought upon it the
more wroth he became. There is nothing more to
be dreaded than a pleasant-tempered, sociable,
frolicksome fellow, of good bone and muscle, when
he is once roused. Quarrel not being one of his
habits, he manages it roughly and with great energy,
or as Mike would say,like a new hand at the
bellows. The affornt put upon him the night
before
went very hard with Mike, and he therefore
resolved to call his false friend to an account. It
was singular that after this thought took possession
of his mind, there seemed to be a relish in it that
almost brought him into a good humour. The idea
of standing upon his prowess with the devil, and
giving him a fair beating, was one of those luxurious
imaginings that no man ever dreamt of but Mike
Brown. There was a whimsicalness in it that
vibrated
upon the strongest cord in his character.
Mike had never met his match in daylight, and he
had a droll conviction that he could master any
thing in darkness, if he could only come to it, arm
to arm. His first and most natural suggestion was,
to put himself in order for the projected interview,
by making a merry evening of it, and then to depend
upon his genius for his success in the subsequent
stages of the adventure.
Mike followed one half of the old Scythian custom
in all affairs of perplexity: he first considered the
subject when he was drunk, but he did not revolve
it again in a sober mood. On the present occasion
his reflections had the advantage of being matured
under circumstances of peculiar animation, induced
by the disturbed state of his feelings; for he has often
said that when any thing fretted him it made him
awfully thirsty. There was one determination that
was uppermost in all the variety of lights in which
he contemplated his present purpose;and that was,
as it was a delicate affair, to treat it like a
gentleman
,
and to give his adversary fair play.
Accordingly
,
as soon as Mike had cast off work for the day,
he put on his regimentals, took his broadsword, and
set out for his usual haunt to prepare himself for the
business in hand. Never did he enter upon a
campaign
with a more wary, circumspect or soldier-like
providence.
He remained at the tavern in the neighbourhood
until he had fairly put all his compotators asleep;
and then, in the dead hour of the night, when the
moon was but a little way above the horizon, and
divided
her quiet empire with Mike's own nose, he
crept forth silently upon his destined exploit. It was
a goodly sight to see such a valiant blacksmith, so
martially bedight, with his trusty sword tucked under
his arm, stealing out at such an hour, and wending
his silent way to the Goblin Swamp, there to have
a pass at arms with the fiend! the night breeze
blowing upon his swarthy cheek, and his heavy,
sullen tramp falling without an echo upon his own
ear, and not a thought of dread flickering about his
heart.
With his head spinning like a top, and his courage
considerably above striking heat, Mike, after many
circumgyrations, arrived in about half an hour on
the frontier of the field of action. Here he halted,
according to a military fashion; and, like a cautious
officer entering upon an enemy's territory, he began
to explore the ground. Then, drawing his sword
and straightening his person, he commenced an
exhortation
to himself in the manner of a general
addressing
his troops.
Now, my brave boy, keep a stiff upper lip!
mind your eye! look out for squalls! don't fire until
you see the whites of their eyes; carry swords;
advance!
All this he uttered with a solemn, drunken
wisdom
,
and with the flourish of an old soldier. At the
words he stepped forward, and continued to approach
the swamp, muttering half articulated sounds, and
occasionally falling one step backward, from
carrying
himself rather too erect. As soon as he reached
the edge of the morass, he gave the word halt in
a loud and defying tone of voice, as if to inform his
adversary of his presence. He did not wait long
before he heard a crackling noise as of one breaking
through the thick shrubbery; and full before him
stood, on an old log within the swamp, his adversary,
in his customary dress, with the addition of a Spanish
cloak of scarlet that was muffled about his neck.
Mike, immediately upon seeing this apparition,
brought his sword with an alert motion up to his
breast, with the blade reaching perpendicularly
upward
in the line of his face; then, with a graceful
sweep of his arm, he swung it down diagonally, with
the point to the ground, in the usual manner of a
salute.
Your honour! said Mike, as he performed this
ceremony.
Walk in, Sergeant Brown! said the devil,
with a husky voice, that was scarcely above a
whisper
.
I did not expect to see you to night; I have
caught a bad cold, and am not able to stir abroad.
I am come to night, said Mike very stiffly,
and with an affectation of cold politeness, to see
you on a piece of business. I require satisfaction
for the affront you put upon me last night.
You shall have it. What's your weapon?
It is in my hand, answered the sergeant.
Then follow me, said the devil with great
composure
.
They both stepped forward into the swamp; and,
after traversing some defiles, and passing around
ponds, and making many tiresome circuits through
the most intricate parts of the marsh, Mike at
length stopped to inquire which way the devil meant
to lead him.
As I am the challenged party, I have the right
to choose my own ground, said the other.
Certainly! rejoined Mike. It is all one to
me.
At length they reached a spot that was covered
with tall trees, at the foot of which the earth seemed
to be of a more firm texture than in the rest of the
fen. There was a fire smoking through a heap of
rubbish near the middle of the ground, and a little,
peaked old woman, almost black with the smoke,
sat upon her haunches so near the fire that by the
flash of the small flame Mike could perceive that
she was smoking a pipe. Her elbows were placed
upon her knees, and her chin rested in the palms of
her hands in such a manner that her long fingers
were extended, like the bars of a gridiron, over her
cheeks. Her eyes looked like burning coals, and
could be seen through the dark at a great distance.
Wife, said the devil, Mike Brown. Mike
Brown, my wife.
Your servant, said Mike, with one of his best
flourishes, and a bow.
Pish! cried the old woman with a sort of
scream, sit down!
Much obliged to you, Ma'am, replied Mike,
I'd rather stand.
What brings you with Mike Brown into my
bedroom at this time of night? said the old woman
to her husband.
Mind your own business, was the reply, and
give me my sword. I have an affair of honour to
settle with this gentleman.
Get it yourself, said the wife.
So the devil stepped inside of a hollow tree, and
brought out a huge old-fashioned, two-handed straight
sword, that was covered with rust, and immediately
began to feel the edge with his thumb.
It is very dull; but it will do. Now, sergeant,
we will go a little way further; and settle this matter
in a twinkling.
Agreed! and remember, as you set up for a
gentleman
,
I expect fair play.
Honour bright! said the devil, putting his hand
to his breast.
No striking till each says he is ready.
By no means, said the devil.
Nor no hit below the knee.
Of course not, said the devil.
Time to breathe, if it is asked.
Assuredly!
Points down at the first blood.
Just as you say, replied the devil.
Then, said Mike, move on.
We ought to drink together, sergeant, before we
get to blows. I am for doing the thing civilly, said
the devil.
So am I, replied Mike. I am entirely of your
opinion.
So the devil put into Mike's hands a large gourd,
that had a stopper in the top of it, which the
sergeant
pulled out, and applying the orifice to his
mouth, took a hearty drink, first turning to the old
woman, who sat all this time in silence by the fire,
and saying, My service to you, Ma'am! The
devil
having likewise performed his part in this
ceremony
,
they once more resumed their walk.
In their progress towards the ground which the
devil had chosen for the theatre of this mortal
rencounter
,
they came to two small islands, the soil of
which was a yielding black mud covered with moss.
These little parcels of ground arose out of the marsh,
with well defined banks, perhaps twelve inches high,
and were separated from each other by a channel of
deep water, not more than five feet in width, so that
to pass from one to the other required a leap that
was somewhat perilous, because the foothold on the
opposite bank was not only very soft, but the ground
itself scarcely one pace in breadth. The chances
were, therefore, that in leaping to it, the momentum
employed would precipitate the leaper into another
pond of water beyond it. The devil skipped over
this strait with great ease, and called on Mike to
follow
.
The sergeant, however, hesitated, and looked
for some moments upon the spot with anxious
concern
.
He traversed the ground in the
neighbourhood
,
to observe if there was any other passage
round this hazardous channel; meditated upon the
consequences of a failure in the attempt to cross it;
looked at his legs, as if to compare their capabilities
with the obstacle before him; and, at last, wisely
determined that the risk was more than he ought, in
prudence, to run. So, taking the next expedient,
which was to make a long step, in such wise as to
plant one foot on the opposite bank, and rely upon
the assistance of his adversary to drag him over,he
forthwith essayed the effort. By one prodigious
stride, he succeeded in fixing his left foot on the
desired
spot, his legs being extended in the endeavour
to their greatest possible compass; and there he
remained
in this ludicrous position, like the colossus of
Rhodes, his feet sliding imperceptibly outward in the
slimy material of the banks, thus more effectually
splitting him asunder, whilst the great weight of his
body denied him all power to extricate himself, even
if he had stood upon a firmer base, and with a less
relaxed frame. He was, of course, wholly at the
mercy of his antagonist, upon whose generosity he
relied
with the confidence of a true soldier; if this
failed
him, he had nothing better left than to fall
side-wise
,
in the manner of a pair of distended
compasses
,
into the water, and abide the consequences of
going headlong to the bottom of a stagnant pool,
where, for aught he knew, he should not only be
compelled
to swallow a portion of the noxious liquid,
VOL. II. 4
but come into familiar contact with toads, snakes,
snapping-turtles, and other abominable inhabitants
of such a place. For the present, therefore, he began
to entreat the aid of his old companion in the most
supplicating terms. To his utter dismay, the
gentleman
in the scarlet mantle not only refused him a
hand, but answered his request with a malignant
laugh, so loud as to make the swamp ring with its
reverberations.
Blood and fury! why don't you give me your
hand? cried Mike at last, in an extremity of
torture
;
where are your manners?
What ails you? said the devil, that you roar
so loud?
I'm in a quandary! bellowed the sergeant. Is
this the way you treat a gentleman in distress? Don't
you see I'm splitting up to my chin?
When I fight, replied the other calmly, I
choose my own ground, and if you can't reach it,
it is no fault of mine.
Don't you mean to give me satisfaction? asked
Mike.
All the satisfaction in the world, Sergeant
Brown. Rare satisfaction, said the devil, laughing
and holding his sides.
You are a coward, cried Mike, drawing his
sword, and flourishing it over his head.
Step out, sergeant, and make your words good.
You are no gentleman.
Granted, said the devil; I never set up for
one. But I don't think you are much better, or you
would never stand vapouring there with your sword,
and straddling as if you thought yourself a man of
consequence.
What's the use, said Mike, in a gentle
persuasive
tone, of keeping a man here all night, tearing
the life out of him by inches? Just give us a hand,
like a genteel christian; and as to the quarrel, I'll
not be particular about it.
Good night, Sergeant Brown, said the devil;
I see you have no mind to fight; and as I did not
come here to trifle, I will wait no longer for you.
So the devil turned round and disappeared from
Mike's view, with a bitter, scoffing laugh.
The sergeant being thus left alone without relief,
found his torment becoming every moment more
insupportable
;
and therefore, without further effort to
reach the ground on either side, he plunged
head-foremost
into the pond, from which he rose in a
moment
covered with black mud, and with a multitude
of ropes of green slime clinging to his shoulders, and
platted about his throat.
This shock had the effect to bring the blacksmith
partially to his senses. He awoke from his
intoxication
,
like one from a dream, wondering at the chances
that brought him into such a predicament, and with
a confused recollection of the strange adventure he
had just been engaged in. His conclusion was, that
the old chap had taken him in again, and he
therefore
set off homeward, very much ashamed of the
failure of his expedition, and not less vexed to hear,
as he once more arrived on dry land, the usual
valedictory
,
Good night! with its hoarse, wild and
fiendish accompaniment.
I will not pretend to give any further avouch for
these facts than the authority of Hafen, who
affirmed
that he had them from Mike himself; and as
Mike was a little prone to exaggerate when his
personal
prowess was in question, the judicious reader
will make some grains of allowance on that score.
There were various incidents in Mike's life similar
to those above narrated; but it is only material to
know, that not long after this last adventure, Mike
began to grow jealous of his old crony's attentions to
Mistress Brown. There was a spirited intercourse
kept up between this worthy and the family, which
resulted at last in the sudden disappearance of the
matron from the neighbourhood. The folks in these
parts have their own notions of the matter; but they
don't like to speak freely on the subject. Mike,
however
,
bore his misfortune like a philosopher. He
very sedately increased his allowance of comfort by
doubling the strength of his cups, and, in consequence,
was more frequently than ever beside himself,a
very refreshing expedient for a man who has been
left alone in the world. The heir apparent and the
rest of the progeny abdicated their birth-right, and
wandered off, it is supposed, in search of food. The
shop was deserted, the anvil was sold, and the
bellows
fell a victim to a pulmonary attack. The roof
of the dwelling had decayed so as to give the wind
and rain free admission. The relics of the smithy
were, one windy night, blown down. The frame
of the house first became twisted out of its
perpendicular
line, and gradually sunk to earth, at the
base of the brick chimney that stands, at this day, a
monument to show that another of the host of
Revolutionary
heroes has departed. The well grew to be
choked up with weeds; the balance-pole waxed stiff,
and creaked in its swivel; and, finally, Mike ceased
to be seen in the country side.
It is now many years gone by, since these
mysterious
events employed the gossip of the
neighbourhood
;
and many credible witnesses,amongst the
rest Hafen Blok,affirm that Mike and his wife are
yet seen to hold occasional conventicles with their
old associate, in that part of the swamp known as
the devil's bed-chamber.
Well, Hafen, said I, when this story of Mike
Brown was concluded, do you believe it all?
Why, I don't know, replied Hafen, it does
seem to me as if it might be partly true. But Mike
was a monstrous liar, and an uncommon hard
drinker.
It is reasonable, said Hazard, to suppose that
the devil should be fond of such a fellow as Mike
Brown.
Said Rip, For my share, I don't believe it.
Hafen's
making fun: how could the devil walk over the
swamp in silk stockings, and not get them muddy?
4 *
CHAPTER II.
AN INTERLUDE.
About
the same hour of the night when Hafen
Blok was regaling his circle of auditors in the porch
at Swallow Barn, it fell out that two sympathetic
souls, who have frequently been brought to view in
this narrative, were weaving closer the network of
sentimental affinities in a quiet conference in one of
the chambers at the Brakes. As this contemporary
incident may serve to give my readers some insight
into the family history, I will relate it as it was told
to me by Harvey Riggs; only premising that
Harvey
is somewhat dramatic in his nature, and
therefore
apt to put words into the mouths of his actors,
which, if the matter were investigated, it might be
discovered that they never spoke. Be that as it
may, if the story be not a positive fact, (Harvey
makes a distinction between a positive and a simple
fact,) it is at least founded on a real event.
The bustle attending the negotiation of the treaty
that had just been concluded by our plenipotentiaries
at the Brakes, had subsided, upon the departure of
the Swallow Barn cavalcade, into an unusual calm.
The family retired from the tea table with a
sedateness
that might be ascribed to exhausted spirits;
and, what was most worthy of observation,
Swansdown
,
neglectful of his customary assiduities,
relinquished
the company of the ladies, and sauntered
with Mr. Tracy towards the backdoor, where, in a
chair inclined against a column of the portico, he
fixed himself, with one foot resting against the front
bar, and with his right leg thrown across his left
knee in such fashion as to point upwards at an angle
of forty-five; and in this posture he incontinently
launched into a long, prosing discourse with Mr.
Tracy, who sat opposite to him, that lasted, for
aught I know, three hours or more. He was tuned
to too high a key for light company. The
achievement
of the award had wrought him into that state
of self-complacency that generally attends upon
ambition
when saturated with a great exploit. He had
done a deed of mould, and was pleased to float upon
the billow of his vanity, high borne above all
frivolous
things.
This humour did not pass unobserved, nor,
perhaps
,
unresented: for as soon as affairs had fallen
into the posture I have described, Prudence
Meriwether
and Catharine Tracy, in an apparently
careless
spirit, set to walking up and down the hall, and
afterwards sallied forth, amidst the lingerings of the
twilight, upon the open hill side, and, with no better
protection against the damps of the evening than
their handkerchiefs thrown across their shoulders,
strolled at a snail's pace towards the river; and
talkedheaven knows what!or, at least, they
only know, who know what ruminative virgins, on
river banks at dewy eve, are wont to say.
It was nine by the clock,or even later,when
they returned to the front door and sat down upon
the steps, still intent upon the exchange of secret
thoughts. After a brief space, they rose again, and
with locked arms stepped stately through the hall,
to and fro. Still the interminable Swansdown
pursued
his incessant discourse. Another interval, and
the two ladies slowly wended their way up stairs,
and in the eastern chamber, looking towards the
river, lighted by a solitary taper that threw a murky
ray across the room, they planted their chairs at the
window; beneath which, until late at night, was
heard a low, murmuring, busy note of ceaseless
voices, like the flutter of the humming-bird in a
wilderness
of honeysuckles.
Harvey pretends that the subject of this long
communing between our thoughtful dames had a
special regard to that worthy personage whom but
now my reader has seen seated at the porch, with
his foot as high as his head. I have said somewhere
that Prudence was oratorical; and, indeed, I have
heard it remarked that the ladies of the Old
Dominion
,
in general, are not sparing of their tropes.
Upon that subject I have no opinion to give, but
leave the world to draw its own conclusions from
the following authentic conversation; authentic as
far as Harvey Riggs is a credible witness.
It is characteristic of Prudence Meriwether,as
it is of sundry other ladies of my acquaintance,to
throw the whole fervour of her imagination into the
advocacy of any favourite opinion. The glow of
her feelings is, of course, reflected upon her subject,
and the glow of her subject is again reflected back
upon her feelings; and thence, backward and
forward
successively, until the greatest possible degree
of heat is obtained by the process; exactly as we
see the same result produced between two concave
mirrors. It seems to me that an attentive
observation
of this phenomenon may go a great way to
explain
the mystery of a love affair.
The present theme was one of those upon which
Prudence was wont to expatiate with a forcible
emphasis. Her rhetoric might be said to be even
hyperbolical, and her figures of speech were certainly
of the most original stamp. First, she gave an
inventory
of Swansdown's gentle qualities. He was
amiable, mild, soft and polished. Then again,
his voice was silvery, his motion graceful, his
manners
delicate. In this enumeration of dainty
properties
she sometimes paused to ask Catharine if she
did not think so.
Catharine thought exactly so.
There was a gravity in his demeanor, said
Prudence
,
which gave authority to his presence, and
seemed to rebuke familiarity; and yet it was so
mixed up with the sallies of a playful imagination,
that it won the good opinion of the world almost by
stealth.
He is very generally respected, said Catharine.
Prudence continued the catalogue with increasing
warmth; and although Catharine was not so
figurative
,
she was not less energetic in her panegyric.
She not only echoed Pru's sentiments, but even
magnified
their proportions. Where two persons agree,
the debate must be short. Such congeniality of
thinking occludes discussion, and the two ladies,
therefore, travelled rapidly through the inventory.
Prudence rose to the height of the stature of his
mind, and descanted upon his abilities.
He had the art, she said, to impart a charm
to the dullest subjects. His discrimination was
intuitive
,
and facilitated his journey through the mazes
of research, like one that wandered over a shorn
meadow. Who but a man of genius could unravel
the occult darkness of the boundary line, and shed
certainty, in one day, upon an important question, in
opposition to all the courts and all the lawyers of a
state that boasted of both? with that forensic jurist
Mr. Wart (manifestly prejudiced against his
opinion
,)
on the other side! There was a moral
romanticity
in it. It was like casting a spell of
gramarie
over his opponents. The world would talk of
this thing hereafter!
It is very surprising, muttered Catharine.
Think of it, my dear! cried Prudence. The
country, before long, will discover his dormant
talents
,
and he will be compelled to forego his
reluctance
to guide the destinies of his native state.
It can be nothing but his modesty, rejoined
Kate, that keeps him in the back ground now.
He never would have been beaten three times for
congress, if he had not been so diffident.
He is what I denominate emphatically, said
Prudence, a man of lofty sentiments: nothing
sordid
,
nothing paltry, nothing tawdry, nothing
Nothing, replied Kate, nothing of the sort.
Such sound opinions!
And spoken in such chaste language!
Such a strain of charity! such a beautiful
commingling
of the virtues that mollify, with the
principles
that fortify, the heart!
Such a rare union! echoed Kate.
Never has the world seen more perfect harmony
than that which ruled in the counsels of our two
damsels.
At length they fell into a speculation upon the
question, why he did not marry. Women consider,
very naturally, life to be a sort of comedy, and
constantly
look to see the hero pairing off by way of
preparation for the catastrophe. They agreed that
there were not many of the sex who would not think
themselves blessed by an overture from Mr.
Swansdown
.
But it was allowed that he was fastidious.
It resulted from the peculiar nature of his
organization
.
I confess, said Prudence, it puzzles me. It is
one of the inexplicable arcana of human action that
I cannot dissolve.
Nor I, neither, replied Kate.
There are men, said Miss Meriwether, of
such attenuated fibre, that they shrink at the rude
touch of reality. They have the sensitiveness of the
mimosa, and find their affections withering up where
the blast of scrutiny blows too roughly upon them.
Such a man is Singleton.
I believe that is very true, rejoined Miss Tracy;
and besides, I think Mr. Swansdown is a little
dashed by being refused so often.
To this succeeded a shrewd inquiry as to what
was his present purpose.
For, said Prudence, it is quite clear to me
that he mediates an important revolution in his
fate.
On my word, Prudence, I have lately taken up
the same idea.
There is something, continued Prudence, in
his thoughts that disturbs him. He is variable,
vacillating
and visionary: sometimes, you would
suppose
,
all mirthful exuberance,if you were governed
by the beaming expression of his face,but, when he
speaks, it is only to say some common-place thing,
with an air of earnestness, that shows his thoughts to
be looking upon some invisible idea. He is, at other
times, so pensive, that one would think `melancholy
had marked him for her own.' What can it
signify
?
Can he have taken a religious turn? asked Kate,
with an air of wonder.
No, replied the other, thoughtfully. It has the
fitfulness of genius distracted by its own emotions.
It is not religion: we should wish it were so. But it
is not that. It is the aspen agitation of sensibility.
An imaginative temperament recreating amidst the
attractive creations of its own handiwork.
Oh, Prudence! how much that is like
Swansdown
himself?
I think, returned Miss Meriwether, I have
studied his character well. There is a kindred
congeniality
in our natures, which attaches me to his
eccentricities
.
My life has been a tissue of similar
emotions
.
And, to tell you the truth, my dear Catharine,
I fancy he recognizes some affinity between us. I
perceive that when he is anxious to share his
thoughts with a friend, he flies to me; and it
strangely
happens, that some secret instinct brings us into
that holy confidence, where friendship puts on its
garb of naked simplicity, and ideas flow together on
the same high road, without reserve.
Indeed! I did not know you were so intimate
with Mr. Swansdown. It is strange it should have
escaped me.
Why, it was a sudden thing. It is wonderful to
think how long two spirits may associate in the same
sphere without striking upon that chord which
undulates
in unison in the hearts of both. But for an
accidental walk we took three or four mornings ago,
before breakfast, I doubt if I should ever have been
brought to that effulgent conviction which I
entertain
of his high qualities. And, take him altogether,
Kate, I think him a timid man. He is even timid in
his intercourse with me; although he passes almost
every unoccupied moment in my company.
I did not think him timid, said Kate.
Oh, I am sure that he is so, my dear! To tell
you the truth, with that frankness which should
preside
over the breathings of inviolable friendship, I have
no question, from his manner, that he has something
of a very delicate nature to communicate to me.
No! Prudence! You don't think so! My dear,
you deceive yourself. You are entirely mistaken in
his views. Indeed, I know you are, cried
Catharine
with energy.
Indeed, I am sure I am not, Kate. I have it in
every thing but words.
VOL. II. 5
Then, said Kate with emphasis, there's no
faith in man!
Why not, my dear Catharine?
It is of no consequence, replied the other, in a
tremulous, murmuring voice. The thing is not
worth investigating. From any other lips than
yours, Pru, I never would have believed that
Swansdown
harboured a deceitful thought. Well, I wish
you joy of your conquest. I renounce
Heavens, Catharine! Do I understand you right?
What a dreadful truth do you divulge to my mind!
I comprehend your silence, my dearest Catharine,
and do not ask an explanation, because I see it all.
This is one of the cruelest bolts that Fate has
treasured
up in her quiver in order that she might launch
it at a heart consecrated by its sensibility, and torn
by misfortune.
What shall we do, my dear Prudence? I am all
amazement!
Do! What ought we to do, but banish him from
our favour as a false-hearted minion; banish him to
the antarctic circle of our regard, and fix upon him
the indelible stain of our contempt? From this
moment
I discard him from my heart.
And I from mine, said Catharine.
Now we are free, cried Prudence. Is it not
lucky that we have had this interview?
Most fortunate. But are you sure, my dear
Prudence
,
that you have not made some mistake? Do
you think he seriously aimed at entrapping your
affections
?
Sure, my love! He did every thing that man
could do, and said every thing that man could say,
short of falling on his knee and offering me his
hand.
What unparalleled perfidy! When I contrast
what you tell me with what I know, and for seven
long months have so frequently experienced
For seven months?
For seven months, believe me, my dear
Prudence
,
for seven months.
Why he told me, Catharine, only this morning,
that he never could grow intimate with you. That
you had a reserve in your manners that repelled all
advances; that
Good heavens! does Swansdown say so? There
is a hypocrisy in that, my dear Prudence, that shocks
me. He has had some sinister design in this
falsehood
.
Oh! forbear, Catharine. Do not mention it. I
always thought him somewhat worldly-minded; a
little hollow-hearted. He shows it in the expression
of his countenance.
Particularly, replied Catharine, about the eyes,
when he smiles. Do you know, I always suspected
him. I have a perfect horror of a man of
extravagant
professions, and have often doubted the
sincerity
of Swansdown.
Sincerity! Let not the word be profaned by
wedding
it with his name. It is plain, that all those deep
and solemn emotions by which he vainly
endeavoured
to wrench from meyes, to wrench from me, my
affections, were nothing more than the false glitter
that plays about the sunny summit of unsubstantial
deceit.
But when you tell me, said Catharine,
interrupting
her friend, that he has made an assault upon
your affections, I am lost in amazement. He has
twenty times insinuated to me, that although he
thought you a woman of some pretensions, yet you
were the last woman in the world that could
interest
his regard. He said he thought your manners
unnatural, and your tone of feeling superficial. I
recollect
his very words.
What reason have I to be thankful, exclaimed
Prudence, clasping her hands, that I have escaped
the snare he has infused into my cup! He has been
lavish of expedients to entrap me. Would you
believe
it, Catharine, he has actually written a long,
and, I must do him the justice to say, talented letter,
depicting the misery of the Greek matrons, and their
devotion to the cause of their country, with a view to
gratify me, and inspire me with a loftier sentiment of
admiration for him. He was aware of my zeal in
that cause.
The Greeks! said Catharine. Does he pretend
to be an advocate for the cause of the Greeks? His
precise words to me were, that he thought the Greeks
the most barbarous, the most uninteresting, and the
vilest wretches in the world.
The infidel! the preposterous man! What a
fatal
mildew must have struck its fangs into the
understanding
and the heart of the wretch that uttered
such a sentiment! And then, what immeasurable
hypocrisy must have varnished his face, whilst his
pen traced his appeal to the sensibilities of Virginia
in behalf of the suffering patriots!
It could not have been his own, replied
Catharine
.
Indeed, I should doubt it myself, said Prudence,
if it were not remarkable for those meretricious
ornaments
of style that disfigure even the best of his
effusions. It has, however, the marks of the beast
upon it. You may very easily see that it abounds
in those vicious decorations that betray a false taste,
those turgid, inflated, bombastic, superfluous
redundancies
that sparkle out in his compositions, like the
smothered embers of an extinguished furnace.
I think, added Catharine, that it will
invariably
be found that a bad heart
Yes, my dear, that is perfectly true: a bad heart
never puts pen to paper, but its guardian imp stands
at its elbow, and infuses into the composition his
corrupt
effluvia. And had he the assurance to say that
he thought my manners unnatural?
Yes; he said you were stiff and formal, and
almost
inaccessible.
That shows his poverty of thought, Catharine;
for he made use of the same terms in reference to
you.
He said he thought it strange, too, continued
Catharine, that you should fancy you were doing
good by circulating tracts. He observed this was
another of your follies; that these tracts
And so he had the effrontery to attack the
Tract Society!
He had, and went further; he remarked that
the society was a mere invention to give
employment
to busy-bodies and country-gossips.
Heavens and earth! had he the rashness to
question my motives?
5 *
To be sure he had; and called you one of the
immaculates.
Then, I am done with man. Depend upon it,
Catharine, the sex is not to be trusted. There is a
natural propinquityproclivity I meanin this baser
part of creation, to undervalue all that is glorious.
I never saw one man whose impulses were not
essentially
wicked.
Nor I, neither, except my father, replied
Catharine
.
Of course, I except my brother Frank, said
Prudence. Henceforward I abjure the sex.
I think I will too, said Catharine in a lower
tone.
Well now, Catharine, continued Miss
Meriwether
,
it becomes us to take a decided part in
reference to this Mister Swansdown.
What do you propose, Pru?
To treat him with that cutting coldness that we
both so well know how to assume.
I don't think we ought to make him of so much
importance.
My dear, said Prudence, after a moment's
hesitation
,
perhaps you are right. There is nothing
puffs up these lords of creation so much as to find
our sex guilty of the weakness of even the homage
of contempt. Suppose we indicate to him by our
manner that we have unveiled his treachery, and
show him, that although it has been the labour of
his life to insinuate himself into our good opinion,
we regard him as an object of perfect indifference.
As one, added Catharine, whose ways were
known to us.
Whose fate, said Prudence, in continuation,
is a subject that has never occupied our thoughts.
Whose duplicity has failed of its aim, said
Catharine.
Whose tergiversation and ambidexterity have
alike excited our ridicule, replied Prudence.
Agreed! let us do so, continued Catharine;
how shall we manage it?
By our looks, my dear Catharine! I will look
into
the deepest recesses of his heart with a glance,
and wither him into a spectacle of scorn.
Looks may do a great deal, replied Catharine,
and I will regulate my demeanor by yours.
The heathen! the Turk! the pretender! the
cormorant! said Miss Meriwether.
I am glad we have found him out! cried Miss
Tracy.
Let us retire to rest my dear, said the other.
Let us to our prayers, and be thankful that we
have escaped these impending dangers.
For a while, all was silent. But at midnight
again, and long afterwards, a buzzing sound of
suppressed
voices was heard from the chamber.
CHAPTER III.
SUMMER MORNINGS.
In
the country every thing wears a Sunday look.
The skies have a deeper blue than common, the
clouds rest upon them like paintings. The soft
flutter
of the groves hushes one into silence. The chirp
of the grasshopper, as he leaps in his short
semi-circles
along your path, has the feebleness of a
whisper
;
and the great vagabond butterfly, that gads
amongst the thistles, moves noiseless as a straggling
leaf borne upon a zephyr. Then, there is a lowing
of cows upon a distant meadow, and a scream of
jay-birds, heard at intervals; the sullen hammer of
a lonely woodpecker resounds from some withered
trunk; and, high above, a soaring troop of crows,
hoarse with bawling, send forth a far-off note.
Sometimes a huge and miry mother of the sty, with
her litter of querulous pigs, steps leisurely across the
foreground; and a choir of locusts in the
neighbouring
woods spin out a long stave of music, like the
pupils of a singing-school practising the elements of
psalmody. Still, this varied concert falls faintly
upon the ear, and only seems to measure silence.
Our morning pursuits at Swallow Barn partake
somewhat of the quiet character of the scenery.
Frank Meriwether is an early riser at this season,
and generally breakfasts before the rest of the family.
This gives him time to make a circuit on horseback,
to inspect the progress of his farm concerns. He
returns
before the heat of the day, and, about noon,
may be found stretched upon a broad settee in the
hall, with a pile of books on the floor beneath him,
and a dozen newspapers thrown around in great
confusion
:
not unfrequently, too, he is overtaken with
a deep sleep, with a volume straddling his nose; and
he will continue in this position, gradually snoring
from a lower to a higher key, until he awakens
himself
by a sudden and alarming burst that resembles
the bark of a mastiff. He says the old clock puts
him asleep, and, in truth, it has a very narcotic
vibration
;
but Frank is manifestly growing corpulent.
And, what is a little amusing, he protests in the face
of the whole family that he does not snore.
The girls get at the piano immediately after
breakfast
;
and Ned and myself usually commence the
morning with a stroll. If there happen to be
visiters
at Swallow Barn, this after-breakfast hour is
famous for debates. We then all assemble in the
porch, and fall into grave discussions upon
agriculture
,
hunting or horsemanship, in neither of which do
I profess any great proficiency, though I take care
not to let that appear. Some of the party amuse
themselves with throwing pebbles picked from the
gravel walk, or draw figures upon the earth with a
rod, as if to assist their cogitations; and when our
topics grow scarce, we saunter towards the bridge,
and string ourselves out upon the rail, to watch
the bubbles that float down the stream; and are
sometimes a good deal perplexed to know what we
shall do until dinner time.
There is a numerous herd of little negroes about
the estate; and these sometimes afford us a new
diversion
.
A few mornings since, we encountered a
horde of them, who were darting about the bushes
like untamed monkeys. They are afraid of me,
because
I am a stranger, and take to their heels as
soon as they see me. If I ever chance to get near
enough to speak to one of them, he stares at me
with a suspicious gaze; and, after a moment, makes
off at full speed, very much frightened, towards the
cabins at some distance from the house. I believe
they think I am a Georgia man, which they all
consider a kind of hobgoblin. They are almost all
clad in a long coarse shirt that reaches below the
knee, without any other garment: but one of the
group, that we met on the morning I speak of, was
oddly decked out in a pair of ragged trowsers,
conspicuous
for their ample dimensions in the seat.
These had evidently belonged to some grown-up
person, but were cut short in the legs to make them
fit the wearer. A piece of twine across the shoulder
of this grotesque imp, served for suspenders, and kept
his habiliments from falling about his feet. Ned
ordered this crew to prepare for a foot-race, and
proposed
a reward of a piece of money to the winner.
They were to run from a given point, about a
hundred
paces distant, to the margin of the brook. Our
whole suite of dogs were in attendance, and seemed
to understand our pastime. At the word, away
went the bevy, accompanied by every dog of the
pack, the negroes shouting and the dogs yelling
in unison. The
shirts
ran with prodigious
vehemence
,
their speed exposing their bare, black and
meager shanks, to the scandal of all beholders; and
the strange baboon in trowsers struggled close in
their rear, with ludicrous earnestness, holding up his
redundant and troublesome apparel with his hand.
In a moment they reached the brook with unchecked
speed; and, as the banks were muddy, and the dogs
had become tangled with the racers in their path,
the entire herd were precipitated, one over the other,
into the water. This only increased their
merriment
,
and they continued the contest in this new
element, by floundering, kicking and splashing about,
like a brood of ducks in their first descent upon a
pool. These young negroes have wonderfully flat
noses, and the most oddly disproportioned mouths,
which were now opened to their full dimensions, so
as to display their white teeth in striking contrast
with their complexions. They are a strange pack
of antic and careless animals, and furnish the
liveliest
picture that is to be found in nature, of that race
of swart fairies which, in the old time, were supposed
to play their pranks in the forest at moonlight. Ned
stood by, enjoying this scene like an amateur;
encouraging
the negroes in their gambols, and
hallooing
to the dogs, that by a kindred instinct entered
tumultuously into the sport, and kept up the
confusion
.
It was difficult to decide the contest in favour
of any of the actors. So the money was thrown
into the air, and as it fell to the ground, there was
another rush, in which the hero of the trowsers
succeeded
in getting the small coin from the ground in
his teeth, but to the great prejudice of his finery.
Rip asserts a special pre-eminence over these
young serfs, and has drilled them into a kind of local
militia. He sometimes has them all marshalled in
the yard, and entertains us with a review. They
have an old watering-pot for a drum, and a dingy
pockethandkerchief for a standard, under which they
are arrayed in military order. As they have no hats
amongst them, Rip makes each stick a cock's feather
in his wool; and in this guise they parade over the
grounds with a riotous clamour, in which Rip's shrill
voice, and the clink of the old watering-pot, may be
heard at a great distance.
Besides these occupations, Hazard and myself
frequently
ride out during the morning; and we are
apt to let our horses take their own way. This brings
us into all the by-places of the neighbourhood, and
makes me many acquaintances. Lucy and
Victorine
often accompany us, and I have occasion to
admire
their expert horsemanship. They have a brisk
little pony that is a wonderful favourite with them;
and, to hear them talk, you would suppose them
versed in all the affairs of the stable.
With such amusements, we contrive to pass our
mornings, not listlessly, but idly. This course of life
has a winning quality that already begins to exercise
its influence upon my habits. There is a fascination
in the quiet, irresponsible and reckless nature of these
country pursuits, that is apt to seize upon the
imagination
of a man who has felt the perplexities of
business
.
Ever since I have been at Swallow Barn, I
have entertained a very philosophical longing for the
calm and dignified retirement of the woods. I begin
to grow moderate in my desires; that is, I only want
a thousand acres of good land, an old manor-house,
on a pleasant site, a hundred negroes, a large library,
a host of friends, and a reserve of a few thousands a
year in the stocks,in case of bad crops,and,
finally
,
a house full of pretty, intelligent and docile
children, with some few et ceteras not worth
mentioning
.
I doubt not, after this, I shall be considered a man
of few wants, and great resources, within myself.
VOL. II. 6
CHAPTER IV.
A COUNTRY GATHERING.
The
day that followed our adventure in the
Goblin
Swamp, was one of more bustling pursuits than
those described in the last chapter. It was
distinguished
by its active preparations for the dinner
party
at Swallow Barn.
Sometime before breakfast a servant waited at
the front door for Hazard's orders: this was a negro
boy, not quite full grown, who, without jacket or
shoes, but tricked out in a hat with a yellow ribbon
for a band, and set a little to one side on his head,
was mounted, bare-backed, upon a tall, full-blooded
horse, just ready to start, when Hazard came to
instruct
him in the purpose of his errand.
Ganymede, said Ned, you will go to the
Court House, and give my compliments
Yes, sir, said the messenger, with a joyful
countenance
.
To Mister Toll Hedges and the doctor, and tell
them that we expect some friends here at dinner
today
.
Yes, sir, shouted the negro, and striking his heels
into his horse's sides at the same instant, plunged
forward some paces.
Come back, cried Ned; you hair-brained fool,
what are you going after?
To ax Mas Toll Hedges and the doctor to come
here to dinner to-day, returned the impatient boy.
Wait until you hear what I have to tell you,
continued Ned. Say to them that your Master
Frank will be glad to see them; and that I wish
them to bring any body along with them they
choose.
That's all! exclaimed the negro again, and
once more bounded off towards the high road.
You black rascal! cried Ned at the top of his
voice, and laughing, come back again. You are in
a monstrous hurry. I wish you would show something
of this activity when it is more wanting. Now, hear
me out. Tell them, if they see the 'squire, to bring
him along.
Yes, sir.
And as you pass by Mr. Braxton Beverly's,
stop there, and ask him if he will favour us with his
company. And if he cannot come himself, tell him
to send us some of the family. Tell him to send them,
at any rate. Let me see; is there any body else? If
you meet any of the gentlemen about, give them my
compliments, and tell them to come over.
Yes, sir.
Now can you remember it all?
Never fear me, Mas Ned, said the negro, with
his low-country, broad pronunciation, that entirely
discards the letter R.
Then be off, cried Hazard, and let me hear of
no loitering on the road.
That's me! shouted Ganymede, in the same tone
of excessive spirits that he evinced on his first
appearance
.
I'll be bound I make tracks! and,
saying
this, the negro flourished his hand above his head,
struck his heels again on the horse's ribs, hallooed
with a wild scream, and shot forward like an arrow
from a bow.
Soon after breakfast the visiters from the Brakes
began to appear. First came Prudence Meriwether
with Catharine, in Mr. Tracy's carriage. About an
hour afterwards, Swansdown's glittering curricle
arrived
,
bringing Bel Tracy under the convoy of the
gentleman himself. After another interval, Harvey
Riggs and Ralph followed on horseback. Mr.
Tracy
had not accompanied either of these parties; but
Harvey brought an assurance from him that he would
be punctual to the engagement.
A dinner party in the country is not that
premeditated
,
anxious affair that it is in town. It has
nothing
of that long, awful interval between the arrival of
the guests and the serving up of the dishes, when men
look in each other's faces with empty stomachs, and
utter inane common-places with an obvious air of
insincerity
,
if not of actual suffering. On the contrary,
it is understood to be a regular spending of the day, in
which the guests assume all the privileges of inmates,
sleep on the sofas, lounge through the halls, read the
newspapers, stroll over the grounds, and, if pinched
by appetite, stay their stomachs with bread and
butter
,
and toddy made of choice old spirits.
There were several hours yet to be passed before
dinner time. Our company, therefore, began to
betake
themselves to such occupations as best sorted
with their idle humours. Harvey Riggs had already
communicated to me the incidents I have recorded
of the interview between Prudence and Catharine,
and our curiosity had been accordingly aroused to
see in what way the two damsels intended to pursue
the measures which both had voted necessary in
their emergency. An occasion now occurred to put
them in practice. Prudence was seated at the piano
strumming a tune; Swansdown was in the
courtyard
,
looking through the open window, with a flower
in his hand regaling his nose, and listening to the
strains, the syren strains, that fell from his fair
enemy
.
Presently the piano ceased, the maiden turned
carelessly towards the window. Swansdown put on
a winning smile, said some unheard, gallant thing,
and presented the nosegay to the lady. She smelt
it, and sat down at that very window. This position
brought her ear right opposite the gentleman's lips.
It is pretty obvious what must follow, when a
cavalier
has such an advantage over even an angry dame.
Soon Prudence was observed to smile; and,
straightway
,
the conference became soft and low,
accompanied
with earnest, sentimental looks, and ever and
anon relieved by a fluttering, short, ambiguous, and
somewhat breathless laugh. It was plain, Prudence
was enforcing her tactics. She was heaping coals of
fire upon the head of the luckless swain. In truth,
if she yet nursed her wrath, it seemed to have grown
monstrous charitable. Perhaps she relented in her
stern purpose, and gave way to the gentler emotions
of pity, in the hope of converting the sinner.
Perhaps
she had tempered her censure of man's
obliquities
,
by the spontaneous and irresistible overflow of
6 *
her own tenderness; or, perhaps she had been
altogether
in a mistake. Whatever was the truth, her
present purpose, motive and action certainly seemed
to me marvellously inexplicable.
Whilst this private interview was going on, the
members of the household passed freely along the
hall. A drawing would show my reader how one
might have looked thence into the parlour, and seen
the position of the speakers; and how from the little
porch where Harvey and I were seated, we could
discern Swansdown through a screen of rose bushes,
as he stood with his head rather inside of the
casement
.
But, for want of a good map or sketch of
the premises, these things must be conceived. At
length Catharine, who till now had been engaged
with other cares, and who had, I presume, supposed
that the war against the perfidious poet, philosopher,
and future pillar of the state was to be one of
extermination
,
came flaunting along the hall, carolling a
gay tune, and wearing an outside of unaccustomed
levity. When she arrived opposite the parlour door,
the same phenomenon that had put us at fault seemed
all at once to strike her. An emotion of surprise was
visible upon her countenance. She passed, went
back, looked into the parlour, hesitated, returned
towards the front door, stood still a moment in a fit
of abstraction, wheeled round, and finally entered
the room with a face all smoothness and pleasure.
Her plans were concerted during these motions.
Her accost was playful, loud, and even unusually
gracious; and from that moment the trio fell into an
easy, voluble and pleasant discourse, in which the
two ladies talked without intermission, and without
listening to each other, for a good half hour.
That's strange! said Harvey, looking at me
with a face full of wonder.
You have misrepresented them, Harvey, said I.
Not a jot; for Bel has had the whole detailed
to her, not exactly in the words I have given you,
but in substance, from each of them separately this
morning. They have both, in turn, confided to her
the conversation of last night; and, like a good
secret-keeper, she has told it all to me,knowing
my anxiety in the matter,but with a strict
injunction
that it was to go no further. And so I, in order
that I may have a witness to my fidelity, have told
it all to you, who of course will understand it as
confidential, and not permit a word of it to escape
your lips. There you have the whole pedigree of the
secret, and you see that I am as close as a woman.
In the detail, I have not in any degree impaired the
excellence of the story, I assure you.
Then the wind blows from another quarter
today
,
said I.
The thing is perfectly plain, said Harvey;
that solemn ass, Swansdown, has a greater hold
on these women than they are willing to allow to
each other. Prudence is not quite agreed to trust
Kate; and Kate is half inclined to disbelieve every
word that Prudence has told her. And both of them
think it at least very probable that there is some
mistake in the matter. So, for fear there might be a
mistake, Pru has set about making a demonstration
for herself; and Kate has taken the alarm from what
she has discovered, and is afraid that Pru, if let alone,
will get the whip-hand of her. In this state of things,
they have dissolved the alliance, and each one is
coquetting on her own account. It is something like
a panic against a bank, when the creditors are all
dashing in to get the preference in the payment of
their notes.
Swansdown was at last relieved from the spirited
run that had been made upon his courtesy. The
two ladies drew off to other engagements, and the
disencumbered gentleman came round to the door
where we were sitting. It happened that Rip, a
few moments before, had been released from school,
and had walked into the parlour where Prudence
and Catharine were entertaining the poet; but,
finding
them earnestly occupied, had made a circuit
round the room and out again without stopping, and
then came and seated himself on the sill of the front
door, where he remained when Swansdown joined
our party. What had previously been occupying
Rip's brain I know not, for he sat silent and
abstracted
;
but at last, drawing up his naked heels on
the floor, so as to bring his knees almost in contact
with his chin, and embracing his legs with his arms,
in such manner as to form a hoop round them with
his fingers interlaced, he looked up at us with a face
of some perplexity, as he broke out with the
exclamation
,
Dog them women! If they ar'nt too much!
Whom do you mean, Rip? inquired Harvey.
Aunt Pru and Catharine.
What have they been doing? you seem to be in
a bad humour.
Oh, dog 'em, I say! they won't let Mr.
Swansdown
do any thing he wants: always tagging after
him. (Swansdown was a great favourite of Rip's,
principally on account of his horses.) I don't wonder
he don't like to stay with them.
What fault have you to find with the ladies,
Rip? asked Swansdown, amused with the boy's
manner. You are not angry with them on my
account, I hope?
Yes, I am. They're always a talking about you.
For my share, I think they must be in love with
you.
Here Harvey laughed aloud. What do they
say of Mr. Swansdown, Rip?
You needn't laugh, Mr. Riggs, said Rip.
Hav'nt I heard them both talking about Mr.
Swansdown? Oh, oh! I wouldn't like any body to
talk about me so!
I hope they said nothing ill of me, Rip? said
Swansdown, a little confused.
I guess they didn't, replied Rip. But you
had better look out, else every body will say that
you are going to get married to both of them. That
would be queer, wouldn't it?
But you hav'nt told us what they said,
interrupted
Harvey.
No matter, Rip, about that, said Swansdown.
We must not tell tales out of school, you know.
Catch me! replied Rip, I'm not going to
tell.
Saying these words, he jumped up and ran off to
his sports, with his natural careless and irresponsible
manner, not dreaming that the slightest consequence
could be attached to any thing he had uttered.
This simple incident had a sensible influence upon
the conduct of Swansdown during the rest of the
day. He had of late been haunted by an
apprehension
that he was almost ashamed to
acknowledge
,
namely, that it was possible his civilities both
to Prudence and Catharine might be overrated and
misconstrued. They had both flattered his vanity,
and allured him by that means into a somewhat
intimate
intercourse, although it was very far from
kindling up a serious interest in his feelings. Still,
this attention was agreeable to him; and once or
twice the suspicion might have crossed his mind,
that he was permitting matters to go too far; an
indiscretion
which he foresaw might produce some
unpleasant consequences. It was in this state of
doubt that he had left the ladies but a few moments
since; and it was, therefore, with something of
trepidation
and alarm that he heard Rip's abrupt
disclosure
,
made with the boyish recklessness I have
described. Harvey Riggs saw this, and was inclined
to make advantage of it; but Rip took the caution
inculcated by Swansdown, and frustrated the object.
The most amusing feature in the whole transaction
was, that it brought about the very state of things,
by the voluntary choice of Swansdown, that
Prudence
and Catharine, on their part, had resolved the
night before to compel; but which their uncertain
and distrustful policy to-day had countervailed.
Swansdown came to the sudden determination to
allay the false hopes he had raised, by assuming, for
the future, a more circumspect and reserved
behaviour
,
and, as soon as the opportunity favoured, to
decamp from the field of action, and make his way
back to his native oaks, where, he hoped, his
absence
would in a short timeat least in as short a
time as so sore a disease allowedheal up the
wounds his innocent and unwary perfections had
inflicted upon the peace of two unquiet and unhappy
virgins. Full of this sentiment, he suddenly became
pensive, formal, punctilious, prosy and cold. Never
did the thermometer fall more rapidly to zero.
Whilst these things were going on, our company
continued to assemble. Two odd-looking figures
arrived on horseback at the gate, followed by our
trusty boy Ganymede, who had staid behind to
accompany
the guests he had been sent to invite.
The older of the two was the doctor, a fat,
short-winded
gentleman, dressed, notwithstanding the heat
of the season, all in woollen cloth. Behind his
saddle
he carried a small valise, such as gentlemen of
his profession use in the country for the conveyance
of drugs and medicines. The other was our old friend
Taliaferro Hedges, considerably improved in attire,
but with his pantaloonssome white cotton fabric
rubbed up, by the action of his horse, almost to his
knees. He wore his broad, shapeless and tattered
straw hat, that flapped over his eyes with a supreme
air of waggishness; and as he dismounted at the gate,
he deliberately disburdened his mouth of a quid of
tobacco, and walked up to the door. It was now
past one o'clock; and as it is usual in this part
of Virginia to follow up the introduction of a guest
at this hour of the day with an invitation to take
some of the toddy, our new comers were ushered
into a back room, where an immense bowl had been
prepared by Ned Hazard, who was there present
with Meriwether and Mr. Wart to administer it.
In the midst of the jest, clamour and laughter of
the convocation that were now assembled, admiring
and doing homage to the icy and well flavoured
bowl, other visiters were introduced, amongst the
rest Mr. Braxton Beverly, an extensive breeder of
sheep and blooded horses. He was a tall, thin,
talkative gentleman, who had an authoritative way
of besieging the person he addressed, and laying
down the heads of his discourse by striking the
fingers
of his right hand upon the palm of his left, and
shaking his head somewhat as I have seen a
bullying
school-boy when he was going to fight. Mr.
Chub formed a part of this group, but stood rather in
the background, with his hands tucked under the
skirts of his coat, so as to throw them out like the
tail of a bantum cock, whilst he erected his figure
even beyond the perpendicular line. For a time,
this was a busy and a gay scene, characterized by
the exhibition of that good-humoured and natural
freedom from the constraint of forms, that constitutes,
in my view of it, one of the most unequivocal features
of a genuine hospitality. The tumult gradually
subsided
,
as the several personages in the room
retreated
towards the hall; and it was not long before the
whole party seemed to be entirely domesticated, and
had separated into as many fragments as whim or
chance produced. Some sauntered towards the
bridge, and thence to the stable; some sat in the
shade of the porch, and discussed the topics that
interested
the country; and others wandered as far as
the schoolhouse, whence might be heard an
occasional
obstreperous laugh, the sudden consequence
of some well told story.
As the dinner hour drew nigh, our scattered forces
were fast concentrating upon one point. The ladies
had assembled in the drawing room; and there were
many signs that could not be mistaken, that the hour
dedicated to the imperious calls of appetite was near
at hand. Still, Mr. Tracy had not yet appeared.
Divers speculations were set on foot as to the cause
of his absence. Perhaps he had forgotten his
engagement
;
but that was not probable, considering
how careful he was known to be in all such
matters
;
and especially after the interest he had
expressed
to relieve Meriwether from the sense of
mortification
which he supposed his friend felt in his
defeat
.
He could not have lost his way; nor could
he have mistaken the hour. A general anxiety, at
length, began to prevail on the subject. Meriwether
was particularly desirous to meet his neighbour at
this moment of pacification; and the rest of the
party
were curious to note the old gentleman's
behaviour
at so critical a juncture.
The dinner hour had now come, and every one
was still on the lookout for our ancient guest. Most
of the gentlemen were congregated about the door,
watching every object that came in sight upon the
road leading to the gateway. At last, slowly
emerging
VOL. II. 7
from behind a clump of trees, at some distance
off, where the road first occurred to view, was seen
the venerable veteran himself. He had dismounted
from his horse, and, unattended by any servant, was
walking, at a leisure pace, with his arms behind his
back, the bridle dangling from one hand, and his
horse dodging along after him, as slow as foot could
fall. Both the steed and the rider looked patiently
and pensively upon the ground. A long interval
elapsed before they reached the gate. The worthy
gentleman, all unconscious of the lateness of the
hour, or of his proximity to his point of destination,
and the impatient crowd that were gazing at him,
advanced in deep thought. The exterminated
lawsuit
disturbed him. He thought sorrowfully over the
extinguished controversy. A favourite fancy had
been annihilated, untimely cropped, as a flower of
the field. He could not realize the idea. The
privation
had left him no substitute. All this was
plainly
read in his movements: he would travel forward
a few paces; then stop; raise his head; by a careful,
circuitous motion of his hand, he would take his
handkerchief
out of his pocket, pause and adjust it in his
grasp, then, stooping forward, apply it to his nose,
and return it, with thes ame deliberation, to its place
of deposit. This operation was several times
repeated
,
and accompanied with looks of bewildered
abstraction. Poor gentleman! He had parted with
a friend when he gave up his suit. He arrived, at
length, at the gate, where he was met by
Meriwether
,
and almost by the whole company. It was a
surprise to him to find himself so near; and,
immediately
dismissing the meditative air that had
rendered
his march so tardy and perplexed, he put on his
accustomed demeanor of studied and sprightly
civility
,
and replied to the numerous greetings with an
alacrity that astonished every one.
I fear I have kept you waiting, my friend, said
he to Meriwether; that, you know, is not my way;
but, body-o'-me! I had like to have made a slip; my
timepiece is to blame. We old fellows, he
continued
,
looking at his watch, hav'nt so much of this
commodity to lose either, Mr. Meriwether, ha, ha!
Time does not spare such an old curmudgeon as I:
he has handled me pretty well already.
Papa, what made you stay so long? asked Bel.
We have been waiting for you until I began to be
alarmed lest something had happened to you.
My dear, replied the father, I thought I would
just ride round by the Apple-pie to take a look at the
grounds; and I believe I staid there rather too long.
And what had you to look at there, all by
yourself
,
I should like to know?
Nothing, my dear; but we must not talk of the
Apple-pie,not a word! That subject is to be buried
for ever. It is done, I assure you, my dear, it is
done.
With these words, the old gentleman entered the
hall and mingled with the crowd.
CHAPTER V.
THE DINNER TABLE.
About
half after three, Carey, with a solemn
official
air that was well set off by a singularly stiff
costume
,assuming
for the nonce the rank and station
of head-waiter,announced that dinner was on the
table. The greater part of the company was
collected
in the drawing-room; some two or three loitered
through the hall. At the summons, Mr. Tracy, with
that alacrious motion that sometimes belongs to old
men, sprang upon his feet and hastened to the
opposite
side of the room, where my cousin Lucretia was
seated, took her hand, and, with a repetition of
formal
bows after a fashion in vogue in the last
century
,
led her to the dining-room. Meriwether stood at
the door beckoning to one after another of his guests,
with that kind smile and unstudied grace that are
natural to a benevolent temper; his tall figure
somewhat
constrained in its motion by an infusion of
modesty
,
which is always discernible in him when
placed in any conspicuous position. As soon as Mr.
Tracy led the way, Swansdown, with some
particularity
,
offered his arm to Bel: the other ladies
found an escort among the more gallant of the
gentlemen
;
and after them the rest of the party pressed
forward pell-mell towards the dining-room, leaving
Meriwether to bring up the rear, who, upon arriving
at the table, with that considerateness that never
forsakes
him in the smallest matters, placed Mr. Wart,
Mr. Chub, and one or two of his elder guests near his
own seat.
I must not forget to mention, that before we had
taken our chairs, Mistress Winkle, decked out in all
the pomp of silk and muslin, sailed, as it were, with
muffled oars into the room from a side door; and,
with a prim and stealthy motion, deposited her
timeworn
person near to my cousin Lucretia. It is a
custom of affectionate courtesy in the family, to
accord
to this venerable relic of the past generation the
civility of a place at table. Mr. Tracy was aware
of Meriwether's feelings towards the aged dame;
and, prompted by his overflowing zeal on the present
occasion to manifest his deference to his host, he no
sooner observed her than he broke out into a jocose
and gallant recognition:
Mistress Winkle! what, my old friend! It
rejoices
me to see you looking so welland so
youthful
!
The world goes merrily with you. Gad's-my
life! if Colonel Tarleton were only alive again to
make another visit to the James River, it would be
hard to persuade him that time had gained so small
a victory over the romping girl that he had the
impertinence
to chuckle under the chin so boldly. A
saucy
and stark trooper he was in those days, Mistress
Winkle! But the gout, the gout, I warrant, did his
business for him long ago! Ha, ha! You hav'nt
forgot
old times, Mistress Winkle, although they have
well nigh forgotten you.
The housekeeper, during this outbreak, courtesied,
7 *
hemmed and smiled; and, with much confusion,
rustled
her silken folds in her chair, with somewhat of
the motion of a motherly hen in the process of
incubation
.
Mr. Tracy had touched upon an incident
that, for nearly half a century, had been a theme that
warmed up all her self-complacency, and which
owed its origin to one of the English partisan's forays
upon the river side, during the Revolution, in which
he was said to have made himself very much at home
at Swallow Barn, and to have bestowed some
complimental
notice upon the then buxom and
blooming
dependant of the family.
The table was furnished with a profusion of the
delicacies afforded by the country; and,
notwithstanding
it was much more ample than the
accommodation
of the guests required, it seemed to be
stored rather with a reference to its own dimensions
than to the number or wants of those who were
collected
around it. At the head, immediately under
the eye of our hostess, in the customary pride of place,
was deposited a goodly ham of bacon, rich in its own
perfections, as well as in the endemic honours that
belong to it in the Old Dominion. According to a
usage worthy of imitation, it was clothed in its own
dark skin, which the imaginative mistress of the
kitchen
had embellished by carving into some fanciful
figures. The opposite end of the table smoked with a
huge roasted saddle of mutton, that seemed, from its
trim and spruce air, ready to gallop off the dish.
Between
these two extremes was scattered an enticing
diversity of poultry, prepared with many savoury
adjuncts
,
and especially that topical luxury, which yet
so slowly finds its way northward,fried chickens,
sworn brother to the ham, and old Virginia's standard
dish. The intervening spaces displayed a profusion
of the products of the garden; nor were oysters and
crabs wanting where room allowed; and, where
nothing
else could be deposited, as if scrupulous of
showing a bare spot of the table-cloth, the
bountiful
forethought of Mistress Winkle had provided
a choice selection of pickles of every colour and
kind. From the whole array of the board it was
obvious
,
that abundance and variety were deemed no
less essential to the entertainment, than the
excellence
of the viands.
A bevy of domestics, in every stage of training,
attended upon the table, presenting a lively type of
the progress of civilization, or the march of intellect;
the veteran waitingman being well contrasted with
the rude half-monkey, half-boy that seemed to have
been for the first time admitted to the parlour;
whilst, between these two, were exhibited the
successive
degrees that mark the advance from the
young savage to the sedate and sophisticated image
of the old-fashioned negro nobility. It was equal to
a gallery of caricatures, a sort of scenic satire upon
man in his various stages, with his odd imitativeness
illustrated in the broadest lines. Each had added
some article of coxcombry to his dress; a pewter
buckle fastened to the shirt for a breast-pin; a dingy
parti-coloured riband, ostentatiously displayed across
the breast, with one end lodged in the waistcoat
pocket; or a preposterous cravat girding up an
exorbitantly
starched shirt collar, that rivalled the driven
snow, as it traversed cheeks as black as midnight,
and fretted the lower cartilage of a pair of
refractory
,
raven-hued ears. One, more conceited than
the rest, had platted his wool (after a fashion
common
amongst the negroes,) into five or six short cues
both before and behind; whilst the visages of the
whole group wore that grave, momentous elongation
that is peculiar to the African face, and which is
eminently adapted to express the official care and
personal importance of the wearer.
As the more immediate, and what is universally
conceded to be the more important, business of the
dinner was discussed, to wit, the process of dulling
the edge of appetite, the merriment of the company
rose in proportion to the leisure afforded to its
exercise
;
and the elder portion of the guests gently slid
into the vivacity of the younger. Mr. Tracy did not
lose for an instant that antiquated cavalier air which
he had assumed on entering the room. As Harvey
Riggs expressed it, he was painfully polite and
very precisely gay. The ladies, for a time, gave
their tone to the table; and, under this influence, we
found ourselves falling into detached circles, where
each pursued its separate theme, sometimes in loud
and rapid converse, mingled with frequent bursts of
laughter that spread an undistinguishable din through
the room; and sometimes in low and confidential
murmurings, of which it was impossible to say
whether they were grave or gay. Swansdown's
voice was poured into Bel's ear in gentle and
unremitting
whispers, of which Ned Hazard alone, of all
the gueststo judge by his intense and abstracted
gazewas able to unriddle the import. Prudence,
equally abstracted, was unnaturally merry, and
laughed much more than was necessary at
Harvey's
jokes. Catharine talked with singular
saga-city
,
and listened, with still more singular
earnestness
,
to Mr. Beverley, who was instructing her, with
equal interest and eloquence, upon the wholesome
effects he had found in the abundant use of flannel
which he described with unnecessary amplitude of
detailsin repelling the assaults of an ancient
enemy
,
the rheumatism. Now and then a loud and
rather obstreperous laugh, not altogether suited to
the region he inhabited, and which some such
consciousness
seemed abruptly to arrest, was set up by
Taliaferro Hedges. This worthy had already
begun
to occupy that questionable ground which a
gentleman of loose habits and decaying reputation
is pretty sure to arrive at in his descending career.
Dissipation had lowered him somewhat in the world,
and had already introduced him to a class of
associates
who had made a visible impression on his
manners, a circumstance that very few men have so
little shrewdness as not to perceive, nor so much
hardihood as not to be ashamed of. In truth, Toll
had imbibed some of the slang, and much of the
boisterousness
of the bar-room; but he had not yet
given such unequivocal indications of the
incurableness
of his infirmity, as to induce his acquaintances
(who for the most part upheld him on some family
consideration) to exclude him from their houses; on
the contrary, a certain strain of disorderly but
generous
companionship, breaking out and shining above
the vices to which it was akin, still recommended
him to the favour of those who were unwilling to
desert him as long as his case was not absolutely
hopeless. The course of intemperance, however,
gravitates by a fatal law downwards: it is
unfortunately
of the most rare occurrence, that the mind
which has once been debauched by a habit of
intoxication
,
ever regains that poise of self-respect which
alone preserves the purity of the individual. It was
easy to perceive that Hedges laboured under a
perpetual
struggle to constrain his deportment within even
the broader boundaries that limit the indulgence of
the class of gentlemen.
Amidst these diversified exhibitions, Mr. Wart
ate like a man with a good appetite, and gave
himself
no trouble to talk, except in the intervals of
serving
his plate; for he remarked, that he was not
accustomed to these late hours, and thought them
apt to make one surcharge his stomach; whilst the
parson, who sate opposite to him, wore a perpetual
smile during the repast; sometimes looking as if he
intended to say something, but more generally
watching
every word that fell from Mr. Wart's lips.
The courses disappeared; a rich dessert came
and went: the spirits of the company rose still
higher
.
The wine, iced almost to the freezing point,
moved in a busy sphere; for the intense heat of the
weather gave it an additional zest. We had made
the usual libations to the ladies, and exchanged the
frequent healths, according to the hackneyed and
unmeaning
custom that prevails unquestioned, I
suppose
,
over Christendom, when the epoch arrived at
which, by the arbitrary law of the feast, the
woman-kind
are expected to withdraw; that time which, if
I were a sovereign in this dinner-party realm, should
be blotted from the festive calendar. I should shame
me to acknowledge that there was any moment in
the social day when it was unseemly for the
temperate
sex to look upon or listen to the lord of creation
in his pastimes; but I was neither monarch nor
magician
,
and so we were left alone to pursue
unreproved
the frolic current upon which we had been
lifted
.
Before us glittered the dark sea of the table,
studded over with carracks, argosies, and
barks freighted with the wealth of the Azores,
Spain, Portugal and France; and with the lighters
by which these precious bulks were unladen, and
deposited in their proper receptacles. In sooth, the
wine was very good.
Almost the first words that were spoken, after we
had readjusted ourselves from the stir occasioned by
the retreat of the ladies, came from Mr. Tracy. He
had been waiting for a suitable opportunity to acquit
himself of a grave and formal duty. The occasion
of the dinner, he conceived, demanded of him a
peculiar
compliment to the host. His strict and refined
sensitiveness to the requirements of gentle breeding
would have forbidden him to sleep quietly in his bed
with this task unperformed; and therefore, with a
tremulous and fluttered motion, like that of a young
orator awe-struck at the thought of making a speech,
he rose to command the attention of the table. A
faint-hearted smile sat rigidly upon his visage, like
moonlight on a marble statue,his eye glassy, his
cheek pale, and his gesture contrived to a faint and
feeble counterfeit of mirth. It was evident the old
gentleman was not accustomed to public speaking:
and so he remarked, as he turned towards
Meriwether
,
and continued an address some what in the
following
terms:
Since we have, my dear sir, so fortunately
succeeded
in putting an end to a vexatious question,
which, although it has resulted in throwing upon my
hands a few barren and unprofitable acres, has given
all the glory of the settlement to you;(here his voice
quavered considerably,) for it was indubitably, my
very worthy and excellent friend, at your instance
and suggestion, that we struck out the happy thought
of leaving it to the arbitrement of our kind friends:
and to tell the truth, (at this point the old gentleman
brightened up a little and looked jocular, although he
still had the quaver,) I don't know but I would as
lief have the lawsuit as the land,seeing that it has
been the occasion of many merry meetings:I will
take upon myself to propose to this good company of
neighbours and friends, that we shall drink,ha ha!
(continued the veteran, waving his hand above his
head, and inclining towards the table with a gay
gesticulation,) that we shall drink, gentlemen, a
bumper; (here he took the decanter in his hand, and
filled his glass.) Fill your glasses all around,no
flinching!
Fill up! fill up! cried every one, anxious to
help the old gentleman out of his difficulties, Mr.
Tracy's toast in a bumper!
Here, continued Mr. Tracy, holding his glass
on high with a trembling hand, here is to our
admirable
host, Mister Francis Meriwether of Swallow
Barn!a sensible and enlightened gentleman,a
considerate landlord,a kind neighbour, an
independent
,
upright, sensible,enlightened(here he
became
sadly puzzled for a word, and paused for a full
half minute,) reasonable defender of right and
justice
;
a man that is not headstrong (his perplexity
still increasing) on the score of landmarks, or indeed
on any score!I say, gentlemen, here's wishing him
success in all his aims, and long life to enjoy a great
many such joyous meetings as the present;
besides
Health of our host, and many such meetings!
exclaimed Mr. Wart, interrupting the speaker, and
thus cutting short a toast of which it was evident
Mr. Tracy could not find the end.
Health to our host,joyous meetings! cried
out half a dozen voices.
And thus relieved from his floundering progress,
the old gentleman took his seat in great glee,
remarking
to the person next to him, that he was not
much practised in making dinner speeches, but that
he could get through very well when he was once
pushed to it.
Meriwether sat out this adulatory and unexpected
assault with painful emotions, sinking under the
weight of his natural diffidence. The rest of the
company awaited in silence the slow, drawling and
distinct elocution of the speaker, with an amused and
ludicrous suspense, until Mr. Wart's interruption,
which was the signal for a shout of approbation;
VOL. II. 8
and in the uproar that ensued, the wine was quaffed;
while Mr. Tracy chuckled at the eminent success of
his essay, and Meriwether stood bowing and
blushing
with the bashfulness of a girl.
When the clamour subsided, Philly Wart
remarked
in a quiet tone,
I think our friend Meriwether will scarcely
escape
a speech in reply to this compliment. The
fashion is to return the broadside whenever it is
given.
I pray you, said Meriwether, with an emotion
amounting almost to alarm, do not ask me to say
any thing. I have an insuperable aversion to such
efforts: my nerves will not stand it. Mr. Tracy
knows how kindly I take the expression of his
regard
.
Harvey Riggs, who observed Meriwether's real
embarrassment, rose to divert the attention of the
company to another quarter; and putting on an air
of great solemnity, observed that he was unwilling to
lose so favourable an opportunity of paying a tribute
to two very worthy, and on the present occasion he
might say, conspicuous persons; I mean,
gentlemen
,
said he, Mr. Philpot Wart and Mr.
Singleton
Oglethorpe Swansdown. Replenish, gentlemen!
Here's to the health of the pacificators! the men
whose judgments could not be led astray by the
decisions
of courts, and whose energies could not be
subdued by the formidable difficulties of the
Apple-pie
!
Bravo! rang from every mouth.
A speech from Mr. Swansdown! exclaimed
Ned Hazard.
A speech from Mr. Swansdown! echoed from
all quarters.
The gentleman called on rose from his chair.
Harvey Riggs rapped upon the table to command
silence; there followed a pause.
I do not rise to make a speech, said
Swansdown
with great formality of manner.
Hear him! shouted Harvey.
I do not rise, gentlemen, said the other, to
make a speech; but custom, in these innovating
times, almost imperatively exacts that the festive,
spontaneous and unmerited encomiums of the table,
that, I remark, the festive, spontaneous and
unmerited
encomiums of the table, generated in the heat
of convivial zeal, should meet their response in the
same hilarious spirit in which they find their origin
Gentlemen will understand me; it is not my
purpose
to rebuke a custom which may, and doubtless
does, contribute to the embellishment of the social
relations. It is merely my purpose, on the present
occasion, as an humble, and, if I know myself, an
unpretending individual, to respond to the free and
unbidden expressions of the good-will of this
company
to myself, and my distinguished colleague, with
whom my name has been associated. In his name
therefore, and in my own, I desire to
acknowledge
the deep sense we entertain of the compliment
conveyed in the toast of our worthy fellow-guest.
(Philly Wart bowed and smiled.) It will be amongst
the proudest topics of remembrance left to me,
gentlemen
,
amidst the vicissitudes of a changeful life,
that the personal sacrifices I have made and the
toil I have bestowed, in the successful endeavour
to define and establish the complex relations and
rights of two estimable friends, have found a
favourable
and flattering approval in the good sense of this
enlightened company. If it should further result,
that the great principles developed, and, to a certain
extent, promulgated in this endeavour, should
hereafter
redound to the advantage of the generation
amongst which I have the honour to live, I need
not say how sincerely I shall rejoice that neither
my friend nor myself have lived in vain. I propose,
gentlemen, in return,The freeholders of the Old
Dominion; the prosperity of the Commonwealth
reposes
securely upon their intelligence!
Amen! said Hazard in an under tone,
intended
only for my ear, and may they never fail to do
honour to
unpretending
merit!
I suppose, said Mr. Wart, speaking in an
unusually
placid tone, as he rose with a face reefed into
half its ordinary length with smiles, and, at the same
time, expressing arch waggery, I suppose it is
necessary
that I also should speak to this point. There
are, if your honour pleasesMr. President
ordinarily
two different motives for proposing the health of
an individual at table. The one is a
bon fide
purpose
to exalt and honour the person proposed, by
a public manifestation of the common feeling
toward
him, by reason of some certain act or deed by
him performed, entitling him, in the estimation of
the persons proposing, to applause. In this point of
view, my worthy friend who has just spoken, seems
to have considered the case in hand. The second
motive for the act, may it please you,Mr.
Meriwether
,may
be, and such I take it, a certain intent,
inter alia
, to promote and encourage cheerful
companionship
.
With whatever gravity the
res gesta
may be conducted, I hold that it is to be looked upon
diverso intuitu
, according to the temper and
condition
of the company for the time being.
Now, sir, I will not venture to say that my
learned
friend has not wisely considered the toast in the
present instance, as intended and made in all
gravity
of purpose; but, seeing that this company did
certainly manifest some levity on the occasion, I
choose, sir, to stand on the sunny side of the
question
,
as the safest, in the present emergency.
Vere
sapit
, sir,
qui alieno periculo sapit:
I, therefore, sir,
go for the joke. I have sometimes seen an old hound
tongue upon a false scent; but then there is music
made, and, I believe, that is pretty much all that is
wanting on the present occasion.
When a man is praised to his face, gentlemen of
the jury, he continued, rising into an energetic key,
and mistaking the tribunal he was addressing,I
beg pardon, gentlemen, you see the ermine and the
woolsack will stick to my tongue:
Omnibus hoc
vitium cantoribus
, as an ancient author (I forget
his name) very appropriately remarks. What is
bred in the bone,you know the proverb. But when
a man is praised to his face,here the speaker
stretched out his arm, and stood silent for a moment,
as if endeavouring to recollect what he intended to
say,for he had lost the thread of his speech,and
during this pause his countenance grew so
irresistibly
8 *
comic that the whole company, who had from
the first been collecting a storm of laughter, now
broke out with concentrated violence.
Poh, Ned Hazard! you put every thing I had to
say out of my head with that horse-laugh, continued
the orator, looking at Ned, who had thrown himself
back in his chair, giving full vent to his merriment.
Philly patiently awaited the blowing over of this
whirlwind, with an increased drollery of look; and
then, as it subsided, he made a bow with his glass in
his hand, saying, in an emphatic way, your healths,
gentlemen! swallowed his wine, and took his seat,
amidst renewed peals of mirth. At the same moment,
from the depths of this tumult, was distinctly heard
the voice of Mr. Chub, who cried out, with his eyes
brimful of tears, and a half suffocated voice,A
prodigious queer man, that Mister Philly Wart!
Segars were now introduced, the decanters were
filled for the second time, and the flush of social
enjoyment
reddened into a deeper hue. Some one or
two additional guests had just arrived, and taken
their seats at the table, a full octave lower in tone
than their excited comrades of the board: it was like
the mingling of a few flats too many in a lively
overture
;
but the custom of the soil sanctions and invites
these irregularities, and it was not long before this
rear-guard hastened on to the van. The scene
presented
a fine picture of careless, unmethodized and
unenthralled
hospitality, where the guests enjoyed
themselves
according to their varying impulses, whether
in grave argumentation or toppling merriment. Now
and then, a song,none of the best in execution,
was sung, and after that a boisterous catch was
trolled, with some decisive thumpings on the table, by
way of marking time, in which it might be perceived
that even old Mr. Tracy was infected with the
prevailing
glee, for his eyes sparkled, and his head shook
to the music, and his fist was brandished with a
downward swing, almost in the style of a professed
royster. In the intervals of the singing a story was
told. Sometimes the conversation almost sank into
a murmur; sometimes it mounted to a gale, its
billow
rolling in with a deep-toned, heavy, swelling
roar, until it was spent in a general explosion. Not
unfrequently, a collapse of the din would surprise
some single speaker in the high road of his narrative,
and thus detect him recounting, in an upper key,
some incident which he had perhaps addressed to
one auditor, and which, not a little to his
disconcertment
,
he would find himself compelled to
communicate
to the whole circle. It was in such an interval
as this, that Hedges was left struggling through the
following colloquy with Ralph Tracy:
I made a narrow escape.
How was that? asked Ralph.
Oh, a very serious accident, I assure you! I came
within an ace of getting yoked that trip; married, sir,
by all that's lovely!
No! exclaimed Ralph, you did'nt, sure enough
Toll?
If I didn't, replied Toll, I wish I may be
(here he slipped out a round, full and expressive
malediction
.)
I'll tell you how it was. Up at the
Sweet Springs I got acquainted with a
preposterously
rich old sugar planter from Louisiana. He had
his wife and daughter with him, and a whole squad
of servants. Forty thousand dollars a year! and the
daughter as frenchified as a sunflower: not so
particularly
young neither, but looking as innocent as if
she wa'nt worth one copper. I went for grace, and
began to show out a few of my ineffable
pulchritudes
,and
what do you think?she was most
horribly
struck. I put her into an ecstasy with one of
my pigeon-wings. She wanted to find out my name.
Well, and what came of it?
Thar
were only three things, said Toll, in the
way. If it had not been for them, I should have been
planting sugar this day. First, the old one didn't
take to if very kindly; and then, the mother began
to rear a little at me too; but I shouldn't have
considered
that of much account, only the daughter
herself
seemed as much as to insinuate that the thing
wouldn't do.
Did you carry it so far as to put the question to
her?
Not exactly so far as that. No, no, I was not
such a fool as to come to the
ore tenus;
I went on
the non-committal principle. She as much as
signified
to a friend of mine, that she didn't wish to make
my acquaintance: and so, I took the hint and was
off:wa'nt that close grazing, Ralph?
This concluding interrogatory was followed up by
one of Toll's loud cachinnations, that might have
been heard a hundred paces from the house, and
which was, as usual, chopped short by his perceiving
that it did not take effect so decidedly as he
expected
upon the company. Upon this, Hedges became
rather silent for the next half hour.
The dining-room had for some time past been
gradually assuming that soft, mellow, foggy tint
which is said by the painters to spread such a charm
over an Indian-summer landscape. The volumes of
smoke rolled majestically across the table, and then
rose into the upper air, where they spread themselves
out into a rich, dun mass that flung a certain hazy
witchery over the scene. The busy riot of revelry
seemed to echo through another Cimmerium, and
the figures of the guests were clad in even a spectral
obscurity. Motionless, exact and sombre as an
Egyptian obelisk, old Carey's form was dimly seen
relieved against the light of a window, near one end
of the table; all the other domestics had fled, and
the veteran body-guard alone remained on duty.
The wine went round with the regularity of a city
milk-cart, stopping at every door. A mine of wit
was continually pouring out its recondite treasures:
the guests were every moment growing less
fastidious
;
and the banquet had already reached that
stage when second-rate wit is as good as the best, if
not better. The good humour of our friend Wart
had attracted the waggery of Riggs and Hazard,
and they were artfully soliciting and provoking him
to a more conspicuous part in the farce of the
evening
.
Like Munchausen's frozen horn, the counsellor
was rapidly melting into a noisy temperature. He
had volunteered some two or three stories, of which
he seemed, some how or other, to have lost the pith.
In short, it was supposed, from some droll expression
of the eye, and a slight faltering of the tongue, that
Mr. Wart was growing gay.
Harvey Riggs, when matters were precisely in this
condition, contrived, by signs and secret messages,
to concentrate the attention of the company upon
the old lawyer, just as he was setting out with the
history of a famous campaign.
You all remember the late war, said Philly,
looking around, and finding the eyes of every one
upon him.
This announcement was followed by a laugh of
applause, indicating the interest that all took in the
commencement of the narrative.
There is certainly nothing particularly calculated
to excite your risible faculties in that! said he, as
much amused as his auditory.I was honoured by
his Excellency the Governor of Virginia with a
commission as captain of a troop of horse, having
been previously elected to that station by a
unanimous
vote at a meeting of the corps.
Explain the name of the troop, said Ned
Hazard
.
The Invincible Blues, replied the other; the
uniform being a blue bobtail, and the corps having
resolved that they would never be vanquished.
I am told, interrupted Harvey Riggs, that you
furnished yourself with a new pair of yellow
buckskin
small-clothes on the occasion; and that with
them and your blue bobtail you produced a
sensation
through the whole country.
Faith! said Mr. Chub, speaking across the
table
,
Mr. Riggs, I can assure you I don't think a
horseman well mounted without leather
small-clothes
.
I took prodigious pains, continued Philly, not
heeding the interruption, to infuse into my men the
highest military discipline. There wasn't a man in
the corps that couldn't carry his nag over any worm
fence in the county,throwing off the rider
The rider of the fence, you mean, said Hazard,
drily.
To be sure I do! replied Philly, with briskness,
you don't suppose I meant to say that my men
were
ex equis dejecti
exephippiated, if I may be
allowed
to coin a word? No, sir, while the horse kept
his legs, every man was like a horse-fly.
What system of discipline did you introduce?
inquired Harvey.
The system of foxhunting, answered Mr.
Wart; the very best that ever was used for
cavalry
.
Go on, said Harvey.
We received intelligence, somewhere in the
summer of eighteen hundred and thirteen, that old
Admiral Warren was beginning to squint somewhat
awfully at Norfolk, and rather taking liberties in
Hampton Roads.
Ratione cujus
, as we lawyers
say, it was thought prudent to call into immediate
service some of the most efficient of the military force
of the country; and, accordingly, up came an order
addressed to me, commanding me to repair with my
men, as speedily as possible, to the neighbourhood of
Craney Island. This summons operated like an
electric shock. It was the first real flavour of
gun-powder
that the troop had ever snuffed. I never saw
men behave better. It became my duty to take
instant
measures to meet the emergency. In the first
place, I ordered a meeting of the troop at the Court
House;for I was resolved to do things coolly.
You are mistaken, Mr. Wart, said Harvey,
in the order of your movements; the first thing
that you did was to put on your new buckskin
breeches.
Nonsense! said the counsellor; I called the
meeting at the Court House, directing every man to
be there in full equipment.
And you sent forthwith to Richmond,
interrupted
Hazard, for a white plume three feet long.
Now, gentlemen! said Philly, imploringly, one
at a time! if you wish to hear me out, let me go on.
Well, sir, the men met in complete order. Harry
Davenport, (you remember him, Mr. Meriwether, a
levil-may-care sort of a fellow, a perfect walking
nuisance in time of peace, an indictable offence
going
at large!) he was my orderly, and the very best,
I suppose, in Virginia. I furnished Harry (it was
entirely a thought of my own) with a halbert, the
shaft twelve feet long, and pointed with a foot of
polished
iron. As soon as I put this into his hands, the
fellow set up one of his horse-laughs, and galloped
about the square like a wild Cossack.
I should think, said Meriwether, that one of
our countrymen would scarcely know what to do
with a pole twelve feet long, after he had got into
his saddle: however, I take it for granted you had
good reason for what you did.
The Polish lancers, replied Philly, produced
a terrible impression with a weapon somewhat
similar
.
No matter, said Ned, about the Polish
lancers
;
let us get upon our campaign.
Well, continued Mr. Wart, I thought it
would not be amiss, before we started, to animate
and encourage my fellows with a speech. So, I
drew them up in a hollow square, and gave them a
flourish that set them half crazy.
That was just the way with Tyrtus before
Ithome! exclaimed Mr. Chub, with great
exultation
,
from the opposite side of the table. I should
like to have heard Mr. Wart exhorting his men!
I will tell you exactly what he said, for I was
there at the time, said Ned Hazard; Follow me,
my brave boys! the eyes of the world are upon you;
keep yours upon my white plume, and let that be
your rallying point!
Pish! cried Philly, turning round and showing
his black teeth with a good-natured, half-tipsy grin,
I said no such thing. I told them, what it was
my duty to tell them, that we had joined issue with
the British Government, and had come to the
ultima
ratio;
and that we must now make up our minds to
die on the field of our country's honour, rather than
see her soil polluted with the footsteps of an
invader
;
that an enemy was at our door, threatening
our firesides.
You told them, interrupted Hazard again,
that the next morning's sun might find them stark
and stiff and gory, on the dew-besprinkled sod. I can
VOL. II. 9
remember those expressions as well as if it were
yesterday.
I might have said something like that, replied
Philly, by way of encouragement to the men.
However, this you recollect well enough, Ned,
that there was not a man in the corps whose mind
was not as perfectly made up to die as to eat his
dinner.
All, except old Shakebag the tavernkeeper,
said Ned, and he was short-winded and pursy,
and might be excused for preferring his dinner.
I except him, replied Mr. Wart, and then
proceeded
with his narrative. As soon as I had finished
my address, I dissolved the square, and instantly took
up the line of march.
You should say rather that you took up the
charge, said Ned, for you went out of the village
in line, at full speed, with swords brandishing above
your heads. You led the way, with Harry
Davenport
close at your heels, thrusting his long lance
right at the seat of your yellow buckskins, and
shouting
like a savage.
What was that for? I asked with some
astonishment
.
Ned puts a colouring on it, replied the
counsellor
;
I did go out from the court house at a charge,
but there was no brandishing of swords; we carry
our swords, Mr. Littleton, in the charge, at arm's
length, the blade being extended horizontally
exactly
parallel with the line of the eyes. I did this to
give the men courage.
How near was the enemy at this time? I
inquired
.
They had not landed, answered Ned gravely,
but were expected to land at Craney Island, about
one hundred miles off.
Here was a shout of applause from the table.
I can tell you what, said Mr. Wart, for he
was too much flustered to take any thing in joke that
passed, there is no time so important in a
campaign
as when an army first breaks ground. If you
can keep your men in heart at the starting point,
you may make them do what you please
afterwards
.
That's true! said Mr. Chub, who had evinced
great interest in Philly's narrative from the
beginning
,
and was even more impervious than the
lawyer
himself to the waggery of the table. Cyrus
would never have persuaded the Greeks to march
with him to Babylon, if he had not made them
believe
that they were going only against the Pisidians.
Such stratagems are considered lawful in war. It
was a masterly thing in my opinion, this device of
Mr. Wart's.
Had you severe service? asked Meriwether.
Tolerably severe, replied Philly, while it
lasted
.
It rained upon us nearly the whole way from
here to Norfolk, and there was a good deal of ague
and fever in the country at that time, which we ran
great risk of taking, because we were obliged to
keep up a guard night and day.
You had an engagement I think I have heard?
said I.
Pretty nearly the same thing, answered Mr.
Wart. The enemy never landed whilst I
remained
,
except, I believe, to get some pigs and fowls
on Craney Island: but we had frequent alarms,
and several times were drawn up in line of battle,
which is more trying to men, Mr. Littleton, than
actual
fighting. It gave me a good opportunity to see
what my fellows were made of. Harry Davenport
was a perfect powder-magazine. The rascal wanted
us one night to swim our horses over to the Island.
Gad, I believe he would have gone by himself if I
hadn't forbidden him!
Your campaign lasted some time? said I.
About a week, replied Philly. No, I am
mistaken
,
it was rather more, for it took us three days
to return home: And such a set of madcaps as we
had all the way back to the court house! Nothing
but scrub races the whole distance!
Now, said Harvey Riggs, looking at Mr. Wart
with a face of sly raillery, now that you have got
through this celebrated campaign, tell us how many
men you had.
Seven rank and file, said Ned, answering for
him.
Fiddle-de-dee! exclaimed Mr. Wart. I had
twenty!
On your honour, as a trooper? cried Ned.
On my
voir dire
, said Philly, hesitating.I
had nine in uniform, and I forget how many
were not in uniform,because I didn't allow these
fellows to go with us; but they had very good
hearts for it. Nine men, bless your soul, sir, on
horseback, strung out in Indian file, make a very
formidable display!
Well, it was a very gallant thing, take it
altogether
,
said Harvey. So, gentlemen, fill your
glasses. Here's to Captain Wart of the Invincible
Blues, the genuine representative of the chivalry of
the Old Dominion!
As the feast drew to a close, the graver members
of the party stole off to the drawing-room, leaving
behind them that happy remnant which may be
called the sifted wheat of the stack. There sat
Harvey
Riggs, with his broad, laughing face mellowed
by wine and good cheer, and with an eye rendered
kindly by long shining on merry meetings, lolling
with the heel of his boot across the corner of the
table
,
whilst he urged the potations like a seasoned
man, and a thirsty. And there sat Meriwether,
abstemious
but mirthful, with a face and heart
brimful
of benevolence; beside him, the inimitable
original
Philly Wart. And there, too, was seen the jolly
parson, priestlike even over his cups, filled with
wonder
and joy to see the tide of mirth run so in the
flood; ever and anon turning, with bewildered
eagerness, from one to another of his compotators,
in doubt as to which pleased him most. And there,
too, above all, was Ned Hazard, an imp of laughter,
with his left arm dangling over the back of his chair,
and his right lifting up his replenished glass on high,
to catch its sparkling beams in the light; his head
tossed negligently back upon his shoulder; and
9 *
from his mouth forth issuing, with an elongated
puff, that richer essence than incense of Araby:
His dog Wilful, too, privileged as himself, with
his faithful face recumbent between his master's
knees.
Such are the images that still gladden the
old-fashioned
wassail of Virginia.
CHAPTER VI.
A BREAKING UP.
They
who remained at the dinner table were at
last summoned to tea and coffee in the adjoining
apartment, where the ladies of the family were
assembled
.
It was about sunset, and Mr. Tracy's
carriage, with two or three saddle horses, was at the
door. As soon as this short meal was despatched,
Catharine and Bel made their preparations for
departure
.
Ned, like a flustered lover, was officiously
polite in his attentions to the lady of his affections:
he had brought Bel her bonnet, and assisted in
adjusting
it to her head, with supererogatory care; and,
as he led her to the carriage, he took occasion, with
many figures of speech, to tell her how much he
participated
in the affliction she had experienced by the
loss of Fairbourne; and, as he was sure the recreant
did not meditate a total separation from his mistress,
he vowed to bring him back to her if he was to be
found alive in the county. Bel endeavoured to
evade the service tendered; and, getting into the
coach, she and Catharine were soon in full progress
homeward.
Mr. Tracy's horse was led up to the steps, and
the old gentleman, after some civil speeches to the
company, a little bragging of his ability as a
horseman
,
and a respectful valedictory to Meriwether,
clambered up with a slow but unassisted effort into
his saddle.
I should make a brave fox-hunter yet, Mr.
Wart, said he with some exultation, when he found
himself in his seat, and would puzzle you to throw
me out on a fair field. You see I can drink, too, with
the best of you. I am good pith yet, Mr.
Meriwether
!
Upon my word, sir, said Meriwether, smiling,
you do wonders! There is not to-day in Virginia,
a better mounted horseman of the same age.
Good eating and drinking, Mr. Meriwether, and
good wine warm the blood of an old grasshopper like
me, and set him to chirping, if he can do nothing
else. Come Ralph, you and Harvey must get to
your horses: I will have my aide-de-camps. Mount,
you young dogs, and never lag! I allow no grass to
grow to my horse's heels, I warrant ye! Mount
and begone!
The two attendants obeyed the order, and reined
their steeds near to his.
Now don't run away from us, said Harvey.
Why, as I think upon it again, Harvey, more
maturely, replied the old gentleman, I think we
will jog along slowly; we might alarm the horses of
the carriage if we got to any of our harum-scarum
pranks. So, good evening! good evening!
With these words the cavalcade set forward at a
brisk walk, Mr. Tracy gesticulating in a manner
that showed him to be engaged in an animated
conversation
with his companions.
Soon after this, Mr. Swansdown's curricle was
brought to the door. This gentleman, with a
languid
and delicate grace, apprized Meriwether that
he was about to wing his flight to Meherrin,
there to immerse himself in pursuits which his present
visit had suspended; and, consequently, he could not
promise himself the pleasure of soon again meeting
his worthy friend at Swallow Barn. He reminded
his host, however, that he would carry into his
retirement
the agreeable consciousness that his visit had
not been a fruitless one, since it had contributed so
happily to the termination of an ancient dispute. He
particularly insisted on the honour of a return visit
from Meriwether and his friends.
His parting with the ladies might be said to have
been even touching. It presented an elegant
compound
of sensibility and deference. Prudence could
not possibly mistake the impression he designed to
convey to her. He gently shook her gloved finger, as
he said, with a gentle and embarrassed smile, I
particularly
regret that the nature of the occupation to
which I am about to return is such as to engross me
for some months, and most probably may compel me
again to cross the Atlantic. It is likely, therefore,
that I shall have added some years to my account
before we meet again. Your fate will be doubtless
changed before that happens: as for mine, I need
scarcely allude to it; I am already written down a
predestined cumberer of the soil. I still may hope,
I trust, to be sometimes remembered as a passing
shadow.
He means to write a book, and die a bachelor,
poor devil! That is the English of this flourish, said
Ned to Prudence, as soon as Swansdown walked
towards the front door.
Pru was silent, and inwardly vexed. At length
she said to Ned, He attaches more consequence
to his movements than any body else.
Shortly after this, the glittering vehicle, with its
dainty burden, was seen darting into the distant
forest.
One after another our guests followed, until none
were left but Mr. Wart and Hedges, who having
determined to ride together as far as the Court House,
were waiting, as they said, until the night should
fairly set in, in order that they might have the
coolness
of the little hours for their journey.
Well, Mr. Chub, said Philly, what do you
think of our friend Swansdown?
I am glad he is gone, replied the parson; in
my opinion he is very fatiguing.
In a few minutes after this, the counsellor dropped
asleep in his chair, leaving Meriwether in an
unusually
argumentative mood, but unfortunately
without
a listener. Frank had drawn up to the
window
,
and thrown his feet carelessly against the sill,
so as to give himself that half recumbent posture
which is supposed to be most favourable to all calm
and philosophic discussions. He had launched upon
one of those speculative voyages in which it was his
wont to circumnavigate the world of thought; and
as there were no lights in the room, he continued to
pour into the unconscious ears of his friend Wart
his startling random-shots of wisdom, for half an
hour before he became aware of his unedifying
labour
.
Finding, however, that no answer came from
the quarter to which he addressed himself, he
suddenly
stopped short with the exclamation, God
bless me! Mr. Wart, have you been asleep all this
time? truly, I have been sowing my seed upon a
rock. But sleep on, don't let me disturb you.
Asleep! replied Philly, waking up at hearing
himself addressed by name, as a man who dozes in
company is apt to do; not I, I assure you: I have
heard every word you have said. It was altogether
just; indeed I couldn't gainsay a word, but I think,
Mr. Hedges, it is time for us to be moving.
Meriwether laughed, and remarked that Mr.
Hedges had left the room some time since with Mr.
Chub.
At all events, said Philly, we will have our
horses. It is time we were upon our journey.
Every effort was made to detain him and his
companion
until the next morning; but the counsellor
was obstinate in his resolve to be off that night,
observing
that he had already taken a longer holiday
at Swallow Barn than he had allowed himself in the
last fifteen years; and as to the hour, said he, I
am an old stager on the road, and have long since
lost all discrimination between night and day.
But it is very dark, said Hazard, and
threatens
rain. You will assuredly be caught in a
thunder
storm before you get three miles.
Wet or dry, replied the other, it makes but a
small matter in the account. I don't think a shower
would take much of the gloss from my old coat,
he added, looking round at his skirts, and as for
Hedges here, I know he is neither sugar nor salt.
With a julep before we go, said Hedges, and
another when we stop, you may put as much wet
and darkness between the two as you please, for
me. So let us pad our saddles according to the old
recipe, `A spur in the head is worth two on the
heel.'
Saying this, he went to the sideboard and helped
himself rather beyond the approved allowance. I
have a laudable contempt for thin potations, Mr.
Wart, he added as he took off his glass.
The horses were at the door; it was now about
ten o'clock; when the two travellers were mounted,
Philly whistled up his hounds, and they set forward
on their dark journey.
CHAPTER VII.
KNIGHT ERRANTRY.
The
next morning Hazard appeared a little
perplexed
.
Notwithstanding the apparent recklessness
of his character, it belongs to him, as it does to the
greater number of those persons who put on an
irresponsible
face in the world, to feel acutely any
supposed
diminution of the esteem of his friends induced
by his own indiscretion. In the present instance he
was particularly obnoxious to this sentiment. Bel's
good opinion of him was the very breath of his
nostrils
,
and her rigid estimate of the proprieties of life
the greatest of his terrors. His perplexity arose from
this, that he had given way the day before at the
dinner table to the natural impulses of his character,
and in spite of the admonitory presence of the lady
of his soul, nay, perhaps elevated into a more
dangerous
gaiety by that very circumstance, he had
possibly
(for such a temper as his is least of all others
able to know the true state of things), in her very
sight and hearing, committed a thousand trespasses
upon her notions of decorum. Whether he had or
not, he was in doubt, and afraid to inquire. All that
he knew of the matter was, that, like a man in a
dream, he had passed through a succession of
agreeable
changes; had begun the day with a certain
VOL. II. 10
calm pleasure, rose from that into a copious flow of
spirits, thence to an exuberant merriment, and
thence intowhat he could not precisely tell:
heaven
knows if it were riot or moderate revelry,
outrageous
foolery or lawful mirth!the prospect from that
point was a misty, dreamy, undefined mass of
pleasant
images. Of this he was conscious, that after
drinking much wine, and while reeking with the
fumes of tobacco, (a thing utterly abhorrent to Bel,)
he had certainly ventured into her presence, and had
said a great many things to her in very hyperbolical
language, and, if he was not mistaken, in somewhat
of a loud voice. Perhaps, too, he might have
been rather thick of speech! The recurrence of the
scene to his thoughts this morning rather disturbed
him.
There was one consolation in the matter. Bel's
father, the very personation, in her view, of all that
was decorous and properthe Nestor of the day
the paragon of precisionhad, it was admitted on all
hands, left Swallow Barn very decidedly exhilarated
with wine. If Bel believed this, (and how could she
fail to see it?) the fact would go a great way towards
Ned's extenuation. And then the occasion too!a
special compliment to Mr. Tracy. Tut! It was as
pardonable a case as could be made out!
Amidst the retrospects of the morning Hazard
had not forgotten the promise he had made Bel the
night before, to attempt the recovery of her hawk.
Harvey Riggs before dinner had informed him of
Bel's loss, and of his, Harvey's, engagement that
Ned should bring back her bird. Hazard was not
aware that I had heard him pledge himself to this
task as he assisted Bel to the carriage; nor did he
mention it to me to-day, when he announced after
breakfast that he had ordered our horses to the door
for a ride. Without questioning his purpose, I
readily
agreed to accompany him; and, therefore, at an
early hour we were both mounted, and, followed by
Wilful, we took the road leading from Swallow
Barn immediately up the river.
Now, said I, after we had ridden some distance,
pray tell me what is the object of this early and
secret
enterprise, and what makes you so abstracted
this morning?
I wish to heaven, Mark, replied Ned, half
peevishly
,
that this business were settled one way or
another!Ned always spoke to me of his courtship
as this business; he had a boyish repugnance to
call it by its right name. Here am I, he
continued
,
a man grown, in a girl's leading-strings,
`turned forehorse to a smock,' as Shakspeare calls
it. Saint Devil speed us, and put me out of
misery
!
Now, what do you think, Mark, of all the
adventures
in the world, I am bound upon at this
moment
?
Why, sir, I answered, upon the most
reasonable
wild goose chase that ever a man in love
pursued
.
I never knew you before to do so wise a thing;
for I take it that you and I are already in search of
Bel's hawk. There are not more than a million
birds about; and I'll be bound Fairbourne is one of
them! He is certainly within a hundred miles, and I
have no doubt anxiously expecting us.
Conjurer that thou art! said Ned, how did
thy foolish brain find that out?
Didn't I hear you last night, when you were so
tipsy that you could hardly stand, bleat into Bel's ear
that you would neither take rest nor food until you
restored her renegade favourite to her fist?
Did I say that? exclaimed Ned. Was I not
supremely ridiculous?
I can't pretend to do justice to your language on
the occasion. It would require higher poetical
powers
than I boast of to imitate, even in a small degree,
the euphuism of your speech. The common
superlatives
of the dictionary would make but poor
positives
for my use, if I attempted it.
Look you, now! said Hazard, Is not this
deplorable
,
that a man should have a mistress who
hates a fool above all worldly plagues, and yet be so
bestridden by his evil genius that he may never
appear
any thing else to her! I am not such a miserable
merry-andrew by nature, and yet, by circumstances,
wherever Bel is concerned I am ever the very
crownpiece
of folly!
And do you think, said I, that this little girl,
so instinct, as she is, with the liveliest animal
impulses
,a
laughing nymph,is such a Cato in
petticoats
as to be noting down your nonsense in her
tablets
for rebuke? Why, sir, that is the very point
upon
which you must hope to win her!
I am afraid I wasn't respectful, said Ned.
I assure you, I replied, that, so far from not
being respectful, you were the most ridiculously
observant
,
reverential, and obsequious ass,
considering
that you were in your cups,I ever saw.
Was I so? exclaimed Ned. Then I am
content
;
for, on that score, Bel is as great a fool as I am
on any other. Now, if I can only bring her back her
bird, he said exultingly,and I have some
presentiment
that I shall get tidings of him,I shall rise to
the very top of her favour.
Saying this, Ned spurred forward to a gallop, and
flourished his whip in the air as he called to me to
follow at the same speed.
Mark, watch every thing that flies, he cried
out; you may see the harness about his legs; and
listen for the bells, for the truant can't move
without
jangling,`I live in my lady's grace,'
remember
the motto!
Now, by our lady!I mean our lady Bel, said
I, for henceforth I will swear by none but her,I
am as keen upon this quest as yourself. I vow not
to sleep until I hear something of this ungrateful
bird.
My reader would perhaps deem it a hopeless
venture
to attempt the recovery of a bird under the
circumstances
of this case; but it will occur to him, if
he be read in romance, that it was not so unusual an
exploit to regain a stray hawk as he might at first
imagine. A domesticated bird will seldon wander
far from his accustomed haunt; and, being alien to
the wild habits of his species, will, almost invariably,
resort to the dwellings of man. Fairbourne having
been known to direct his flight up the river, we
10 *
had good reason to hope that the inhabitants of
this quarter might put our search upon a successful
track.
For a good half mile, therefore, we rode at speed
along the highway leading to the ferry. The
velocity
of our motion, combining with the extravagant
nature of the enterprise, and the agreeable
temperature
of the morning, cloudless and cool, had raised
our spirits to a high pitch. In this mood we soon
arrived at Sandy Walker's little inn upon the river.
All that we could learn here was, that the hawk
had been seen in the neighbourhood the day before,
and had probably continued his flight further up the
river.
With this intimation we proceeded rapidly upon
our pursuit. It was near noon when, through many
devious paths, visiting every habitation that fell in
our way, we had gained a point about five miles
distant
from Swallow Barn. Some doubtful tidings of
Fairbourne were obtained at one or two houses on
the road; but for the last hour our journey had been
without encouragement, and we began to feel
oppressed
with the mid-day fervours of the season. It
was, therefore, somewhat despairingly that we
halted
to hold a consultation whether or not we should
push our expedition farther.
Not far distant, from the road we could perceive
the ridge-pole of a log cabin showing itself above a
patch of luxuriant Indian corn. This little dwelling
stood upon the bank of the river; and, as a last
essay
,
we resolved to visit it, and interest its inmates in
the object of our enterprise. It was with some
difficulty
that we made our way through a breach in
the high worm-fence that bounded the road; and,
after
struggling along a path beset with blackberries
and briars, we at length found ourselves
encompassed
by the corn immediately around the hut. At
this moment Wilful sprang from the path, and ran
eagerly towards the yard in the rear of the dwelling.
He did not halt until he arrived at an apple-tree,
where hung a rude cage; under this he continued to
bark with quick and redoubled earnestness, until
Ned called him back with a peremptory threat, that
brough him crouching beneath the feet of our horses,
where he remained, restless and whining, every now
and then making a short bound in the direction
of the tree, and looking up wistfully in Hazard's
face.
In the mean time an old negro woman had come
to the door; and, as Ned engaged her in
conversation
,
Wilful stole off unobserved a second time to
the tree, where he fell to jumping up against the
trunk, uttering, at the same time, a short,
half-subdued
howl.
There is something in the branches above the
cage, I exclaimed, as I followed the movements of
the dog with my eye. It is Fairbourne himself! I
see the silver rings upon his legs glittering through
the leaves!
For heaven's sake, Mark, keep quiet! cried
Ned, springing from his horse. If it be Fairbourne
in truth, we may get him by persuasion, but never by
alarming him. Dismount quickly. Wilfulback,
sir.
I got down from my saddle, and the horses were
delivered into the charge of the old woman. Wilful
crept back to the door of the hut. Ned and myself
cautiously advanced to reconnoitre.
As soon as all was still, to our infinite joy,
Fairbourne
in proper identity descended from his leafy
bower and perched upon the top of the cage. Some
association of this abode of the mocking-bird with his
own prison in the mulberry-tree at the Brakes, had,
possibly, attracted and bound him to this spot; and
there he sat, seemingly quiet and melancholy, and
struck with contrition for the folly that had tempted
him to desert his mistress and his mew. I thought
he recognized an acquaintance in Wilful; for as
the dog moved about, Fairbourne's quick eye
followed
him from place to place; and, so far from
showing perturbation at Wilful's presence, he
composedly
mantled his wing and stretched his neck, as
if pleased with the discovery.
Assured by these manifestations, Ned addressed
the bird in the words of endearment to which he
had been accustomed, and slowly stepped forward
towards the tree. Fairbourne, however, was
distrustful
,
and retreated to the boughs. After much
solicitation on the part of Hazard, and a great deal
of prudery on that of the hawk, we had recourse to
some morsels of meat obtained from the hut. These
Ned threw upon the earth, and Fairbourne, pinched
by hunger and unable to resist, pounced upon them
with an unguarded voracity. Still, as Ned
advanced
upon him he retreated along the ground,
without flying. A piece of the cord which Bel had
used as her creance, some three or four feet in length,
was attached to his jesses, and served in some
degree
to embarrass his progress, as it was dragged
through the grass. Hazard endeavoured to place
his foot upon the end of this line, but as yet had
been baffled in every effort. Wilful seemed to
comprehend the purpose, and with admirable
sagacity
stole a circuit round the bird, drawing nearer to
him at every step, and then, with a sudden and
skilful
leap, sprang upon him, in such a manner as
effectually
to secure his captive, scarcely ruffling a
feather
.
Hazard rushed forward at the same instant,
and made good his prize, by seizing his wing and
bearing him off to the hut.
The good fortune of this discovery and the
singular
success that attended it, threw us into transports.
Ned shouted and huzzaed, and tossed up his hat in
the air, until the old negro woman began to look in
his face to see if he were in his senses. The hawk,
the unconscious cause of all this extravagance,
looked like a discomfited prisoner of war,
bedraggled
,
travel-worn and soiled,a tawdry image of a
coxcomb. His straps and bells hanging about his
legs had the appearance of shabby finery; and his
whole aspect was that of a forlorn, silly and
way-ward
minion, wearing the badge of slavery instead
of that of the wild and gallant freebooter of the
air so conspicuously expressed in the character of
his tribe.
Congratulating ourselves on our good luck, we
began to prepare for our homeward journey. The
negro received an ample bounty for the assistance
afforded in the capture; the jesses were repaired
and secured to Fairbourne's legs, and the bird
himself
made fast to Hazard's hand. In a few
moments
we were remounted and cantering in the
direction
of Swallow Barn, with a lightness of spirits
in Hazard that contrasted amusingly with his
absolute
despondence half an hour before.
CHAPTER VIII.
A JOUST AT UTTERANCE.
We
had not travelled far on our return to
Swallow
Barn, before we arrived at a hamlet that stands
at the intersection of a cross road. This consists of
a little store, a wheelwright's shop, and one or two
cottages, with their outhouses. The store was of
that miscellaneous character which is adapted to the
multifarious wants of a country neighbourhood, and
displayed a tempting assortment of queensware,
rat-traps, tin kettles, hats, fiddles, shoes, calicoes,
cheese, sugar, allspice, jackknives and jewsharps,
the greater part of which was announced in staring
capitals on the window-shutter, with the persuasive
addition, that they were all of the best quality and to
be had on the most accommodating terms. The rival
establishment of the wheelwright was an old shed
sadly bedaubed with the remainder colours of the
paint brush, and with some preposterous
exaggerations
in charcoal of distinguished military men
mounted
on preternaturally prancing steeds; and, near the
door, a bran-new, blue wagon, and a crimson plough
showed the activity of the trade.
As may readily be conjectured, this mart of
custom
was not without its due proportion of that
industious
,
thriving and reputable class of comers
who laudably devote their energies to disputation,
loud swearing, bets and whiskey,a class which, to
the glory of our land, is surprisingly rife in every
country side. Some six or seven of these worthies
were congregated on the rail of the piazza, which
extended across the front of the store, like so many
strange fowls roosting along a pole. The length of
our previous ride and the heat of the day made it
necessary that we should stop here for a short time
to get water for our horses. We accordingly
dismounted
.
Fairbourne excited the curiosity of the inhabitants
of the porch; and Ned, who seemed to be well
acquainted
with the persons about him, answered their
many questions with his customary good-humour.
During this brief intercourse, one of the party
approached
with a swaggering step, and began to pry,
with rather an obtrusive familiarity, into the odd
equipment of the hawk. His air was that of a
shabby gentleman. He had an immense pair of
whiskers, a dirty shirt, and a coat that might be said
to be on its last legs; but this, however, was
buttoned
at the waist with a certain spruce and
conceited
effect. As Ned held the bird upon his hand,
this complacent gentleman brought himself, first, into
a rather troublesome contact, and finally threw his
arm across Hazard's shoulder. Ned, at first, gently
repelled him, but as the other still intruded upon him,
and placed himself again in the same situation
Softly, Mr. Rutherford! he said, slipping away
from beneath the extended arm; you will excuse
me, but I am averse to bearing such a burden.
You are more nice than neighbourly, Ned
Hazard, replied the other, stiffly erecting his
person
.
I think I can remember a time when even
you, sir, would not have found me burdensome: that
time may come again.
I am not in the habit, rejoined Ned, of
arguing
the right to shake off whatever annoys me.
Aye, aye! said the other, walking to the
opposite
end of the porch. There are dogs enough to
bark at the wounded lion, that dare not look him in
the face when he is in health. It is easy enough
to learn, as the world goes, what is likely to annoy
a fair-weather friend. Honesty is of the tailor's
making
These and many other expressions of the like
import
were muttered sullenly by the speaker, with such
glances towards Hazard as indicated the deep
offence
he had taken at the rebuke just given.
This man had been originally educated in
liberal
studies, and had commenced his career not
without some character in the country, but had
fallen into disgrace through vicious habits. An
unfortunate reputation for brilliant talents, in early
life, had misled him into the belief that the care
by which a good name is won and preserved
is a useless virtue, and that self-control is a tax
which only men of inferior parts pay for success.
This delusion brought about the usual penalties;
first, disappointment, then debauch, and after that,
in a natural sequence, the total wreck of worldly
hopes:a brief history which is often told of men,
and varied only in the subordinate incidents which
colour the common outline.
VOL. II. 11
Rutherford still retained, (as it generally happens
to a vain man,) unimpaired by the severe judgment
of the world, his original exaggerated opinion of the
extent of his abilities; but, having lost the occasions
for their display, he became noted only by a
domineering
temper, a boastful spirit, a supreme hatred
of those in better circumstances than himself, and,
sometimes, by excessive and ferocious intemperance.
His conduct on the present occasion passed
unheeded
.
Hazard had no disposition to embroil
himself
with a man of this description, and therefore
made no reply to these muttered overflowings of his
spleen.
I have seen your bird before, Mr. Ned Hazard,
said a plain countryman, who sat without a coat on
the bench of the piazza. If I am not mistaken, that
hawk belonged to one of Mr. Tracy's daughters,
over here at the Brakes.
It did, replied Ned; she has nursed it with her
own hand.
Well, I have been studying, said another,
ever since you came here, to find out what all these
things are stuck about its legs for. It is the most
unaccountablest thing to me! I don't consider one of
these here hawks no more than vermin. What is it
good for, Mr. Hazard, any how?
Indeed, I declare I can't exactly tell,
answered
Ned. In the old time they kept hawks pretty
much as we keep hounds,to hunt game with.
Oh, they are amazing swift, and desperate
wicked
,that's
a fact! said the first speaker. Did you
never see how spiteful these little king-birds take
after and worry a crow? They are a sort of hawks
too
Many's the time, said another of the company
that I have known how to follow a fox from
looking
at the crows tracking him across a field; and
I have seen hawks take after vermin just in the same
way.
But what is the use, asked the second speaker
again, of these here silver rings? and here are
words on one of them, too. Let me see,`I live
in my lady'sgrace,' he continued, straining his
sight to make out the legend.
Rutherford had now approached to the skirts of
the group, and stood leaning against the balustrade
of the porch, with an unsocial and vexed air, as if
disposed to take advantage of whatever might occur
to vent his feelings.
My lady's grace! said he, tartly, My lady's
grace! I suppose we shall hear of my lord's grace,
too, before long! There are some among us who, if
they durst do it, would carry their heads high enough
for such a title. If that stark, old, English tory, Isaac
Tracy, of the Brakes,as he calls himself
Miles Rutherford, interrupted Hazard, angrily,
look to yourself, sir! I am not disposed to put up
with your moody humour. Do not give me cause to
repent my forbearance in not punishing your
insolence
at its first outbreak.
A better man than you, Ned Hazard, said the
other, proudly as you choose to bear yourself, might
have cause to repent his rashness in making such a
threat. Insolence do you call it, sir! Take care that
I do not teach you better to know who I am!
I know you already, replied Ned, for a
brawling
bullya disturber of the common peacea
noisy churla nuisance, sir, to the whole country
round.
I know you, said Rutherford.
Silence! cried Ned; Not another word from
your lips, or, by my life! unworthy as you are of the
notice of a gentleman, I will take the pains to
chastise
you here upon this spot.
Good gentlemen! Good gentlemen! Mercy on
us! Stop them! exclaimed our old acquaintance,
Hafen Blok, who, until this moment, had been seated
in the store, and now came limping to the porch, on
having recognized Hazard's voiceFor God's
sake, Mr. Ned Hazard, don't put yourself in the way
of Miles Rutherford! Take a fool's advice, Mister
Edward, he continued, coming up to Ned, and
holding
him by the coat: It isn't fit for such as you to
concern yourself with Miles Rutherford; the man's
half in liquor, and of no account if he wasn't.
Several others of the company crowded round
Hazard to beg him not to be disturbed by his
antagonist
.
In the mean time Rutherford had worked
himself
up to a pitch of fury, and, springing over the
balustrade
upon the ground, he took a station in front of
the house, where, vociferating in his wrath a hundred
opprobrious epithets, he challenged Hazard to come
out of the crowd if he dared to face him.
I interposed to remind Hazard that he should
restrain
his anger, nor think of matching himself with
such an enemy. He listened calmly to my
remonstrance
,
and then laughing, as if nothing had
occurred
to ruffle his temper, though it was manifest
that he was much flurried, he remarked in a tone of
assumed good humour,
You mistake if you imagine this ruffian moves
me; but still I think it would be doing a public
service
if I were to give him a sound threshing here on
his own terms.
Don't think of such a thing, Mister Edward!
said Hafen; you are not used to such as Miles.
He is close built, and above fourteen stone. You are
hardly a feather to him.
You underrate me, Hafen, replied Ned, smiling,
and I have a mind to show you that weight is not
so great a matter as a good hand.
You are bold to speak amongst your cronies,
said Rutherford. You can make a party if you
can't fight. But I shall take the first opportunity,
when I meet you alone, to let you know that when I
choose to speak my mind of such hoary-headed
traitors
as old Isaac Tracy, I will not be schooled into
silence by you.
At these words Hazard turned quickly round to
me, and whispered in my ear, with more agitation of
manner than was usual to him, I will indulge this
braggart; so, pray don't interrupt me. You need
not be anxious as to the result; then, speaking to
the assemblage of persons who surrounded him, he
said, Now, my good friends, I want you to see fair
play, and on no account to interfere with me as long
as I have it.
11 *
With this he left the porch, and stepping out upon
the ground where Rutherford stood, he told him that
he would save him the trouble of any future meeting,
by giving him now what he stood especially in need
of,a hearty flogging.
Rutherford in a moment threw off his coat. Ned
cooly buttoned his frock up to the chin.
Good Lord, preserve us! exclaimed Hafen Blok
againMr. Hazard's gone crazy! Why, Miles
Rutherford ought to manage two of him.
I can tell you what, said one of the lookers-on,
after surveying Ned for a moment, Ned Hazard's
a pretty hard horse to ride, too; only look at his eye,
how natural it is!
By this time the two combatants had taken their
respective positions. Ned stood upon a practised
guard, closely eyeing his antagonist, and waiting the
first favourable moment to deal a blow with effect. It
was easy to perceive that, amongst his various
accomplishments
,
he had not neglected to acquire the
principles of pugilism. Rutherford's figure was
muscular
and active; and, to all appearance, the odds
were certainly very much in his favour. Not a word
was spoken, and an intense interest was manifested
by the whole assembly as to the issue of this singular
encounter.
During the first onset Ned acted entirely on the
defensive, and parried his opponent's blows with
complete success. In the next moment he changed
the character of the war, and pressed upon
Rutherford
with such science and effect, as very soon to
demonstrate that he had the entire command of the
game. From this period the contest assumed, on
the part of Hazard, a cheerful aspect. He struck
his blows with a countenance of so much gaiety,
that a spectator would have imagined he buffeted
his adversary in mere sport, were it not for the blood
that streamed down Rutherford's face, and the
dogged
earnestness that sat upon the brow of the
belaboured
man. Wilful seemed to take a great interest
in the affray, and curveted around the parties,
barking
,
sometimes violently, and springing towards his
master's opponent. On such occasions Ned would
call out to him, with the utmost composure, and
order
him away, but without the least interruption to
his employment; and Wilful, as if assured by his
master's cool tone of voice, would yield instant
obedience
to the mandate, and take his place amongst
the by-standers.
For the space of two or three minutes nothing
was heard but the sullen sound of lusty blows,
planted with admirable adroitness on the breast and
face of Miles Rutherford, whose blows in return
were blindly and awkwardly spent upon the air.
At last, the furious bully, worn down by abortive
displays of strength, and perplexed by the vigorous
assaults of his enemy, began to give ground and show
signs of discomfiture. Ned, as fresh almost as at
first, now pressed more severely upon him, and, with
one decisive stroke, prostrated him upon the earth.
At this incident a shout arose from the crowd,
and every one eagerly interceded to exhort Ned to
spare his adversary farther pain. Ned stepped a
pace back, as he looked upon his recumbent foe,
and composedly said
I will not strike him whilst he is down. But if
he wishes to renew the battle, I will allow him to
get upon his legs,and he shall even have time to
breathe.
Rutherford slowly got up; and, without again
placing himself in an attitude of offence, began to
vent his displeasure in wild and profane execrations.
Several of the persons nearest took hold of him, as
if with a purpose to expostulate against his further
prosecution of the fight; but this restraint only made
him the more frantic. In the midst of this uproar,
Ned again approached him, saying, Miles
Rutherford
,
it little becomes you as a man to be
unburthening
your malice in words. We have come to blows,
and if you are not yet satisfied with the issue of this
meeting, I pledge you a fair field, and as much of
this game as you have a relish for. Let the crowd
stand back!
After looking a moment at Hazard in profound
silence, Rutherford's discretion seemed suddenly to
sway his courage; and, dropping his arms by his
side in token of defeat, he muttered, in a smothered
and confused voice, It's no use, Ned Hazard, for
me to strike at you. You have had the advantage
of training.
You should have counted the cost of your
insolence
,
replied Ned, before you indulged it. The
tongue of a braggart is always more apt than his
hand, he continued, taking a white handkerchief
from his pocket, and wiping his brow, and, at the
same time unbuttoning his coat and adjusting his
dress. You have disturbed the country with your
quarrelsome humours long enough; so take the
lesson
you have got to-day, and profit by it. Hafen,
get me some water; my hands are bloody.
At this instant the group of amused and gratified
spectators mingled promiscuously together, and
made the welkin ring with cheers of triumph and
exultation.
That I should have lived to see such a thing as
this! vociferated Hafen, as he went to get the
water
.
Didn't I always say Mister Ned Hazard
was the very best bottom in the country!
I fight fair, murmured Miles Rutherford, as if
struggling under the rebuke of the company, and
endeavouring
to make the best of his situation, but I
am not conquered. Another timeby Hell!another
time! and Ned Hazard shall rue this day. That
proud coxcomb has practised the art and strikes
backhanded. The devil could not parry such blows.
What does he say? asked Ned.
Miles, you are beaten! exclaimed half a dozen
voices, and you can't make any thing else out of it.
So be off! saying this, several individuals gathered
round him to persuade him to leave the ground.
It is immaterial, said Miles; and taking up his
coat from the ground, he walked towards the
neighbouring
dwellings in a sad and confused plight.
I am a fool, said Hazard in my ear, to
permit
myself to be ruffled by this scoundrel; but I am
not sorry that I have taken advantage of my anger
to give him what he has long deserved.
Ned now began gradually to recover his gaiety,
and, after a short space, having washed his hands
and recruited himself from the severe toil in which
he had been engaged, he took Fairbourne from one of
the crowd, to whom the charge of the bird had been
committed, and we mounted our horses amidst the
congratulations of the whole hamlet for the salutary
discipline which Ned had inflicted upon his splenetic
antagonist.
In less than an hour we regained Swallow Barn:
returning like knights to a bannered castle from a
successful inroad,flushed with heat and victory,
covered with dust and glory; our enemies subdued
and our lady's pledge redeemed.
CHAPTER IX.
MOONSHINE.
We
were too much elated with having achieved
the recapture of the hawk, to postpone the
communication
of our good fortune to the family at the
Brakes longer than our necessary refreshment
required
;
and accordingly, about five o'clock in the
evening, having then finished a hearty dinner, and
regained our wasted strength, we were on our way
to the habitation of our neighbours.
Whether it was that the rapid succession of
scenes, through which we had past during the
forepart
of the day, and the vivid excitements we had
experienced, had now given place to a calmer and
more satisfied state of feeling; or whether it arose
only from some remaining sense of fatigue from
previous
toil, our present impulse was to be silent. For
more than a quarter of an hour, we trotted along the
road with nothing to interrupt our musings but the
breeze as it rustled through the wood, the screams
of the jay-bird, or the tramp of our horses. At
length Ned, waking up as from a reverie, turned to
me and said
Mark! not a word about that fight to-day.
Truly, you speak with a discreet gravity, said I.
What would you have?
Not the slightest hint that shall lead Bel Tracy
to suspect I have had a quarrel with Miles
Rutherford
.
I pity you, Ned, said I, laughing. Out,
hyperbolical
fiend! why vexest thou this man?
Ah! replied Ned, that is the curse of the star
I was born under. The most innocent actions of
my life will bear a reading that may turn them, in
Bel Tracy's judgment, into abiding topics of reproof.
I dread the very thought that Bel should hear of this
quarrel. She will sayas she always saysthat I
have descended from my proper elevation of
character
.
I wish I had a hornbook of gentility to go by!
It never once occurred to me when I was chastising
that blackguard, that I was throwing aside the
gentleman
.
My convictions always come too late.
Why, what a crotchet is this! said I. To
my thinking, you strangely misapprehend your
mistress
,
Ned, when you fancy she could take offence
at hearing that you had punished an insolent fellow
for reviling her father.
It is the manner of the thing, Mark, replied
Ned. The idea that I had gone into a vulgar ring
of clowns, and soiled my hands in a
rough-and-tumble
struggle with a strolling bully. Now if I had
encountered an unknown ruffian in the woods, with
sword and lance, on horseback, and had had my
weapon shivered in my hand, and then been trussed
upon a pole ten feet long,Gad, I believe she would
be thrown into transports!that would be romance
for her; it would be a glorious feat of arms; and, I
doubt not, she would attend me in my illness, like
the king's daughter in the ballad,the most
bewitching
of leeches! But to be pommeled black and blue,
with that plebeian instrument a fistpugh!she will
turn up her nose at it with a magnificent disdain.
Do you see any traces of the fight about me? have
I any scar or scratch? do you think I may pass
unquestioned
?
You may thank your skill in this vulgar
accomplishment
,
I answered, that you do not carry a
black eye to the Brakes. As it is, you have
nothing
to fear on that score; and, I promise you,
although
I doubt your apprehension of Bel, that I
will say nothing that shall lead to your detection.
This is only of a piece with my other miseries,
said he. It is another proof of the tyranny to
which a man is exposed who is obliged to square his
conduct to the caprices of a mistress. I declare to
you I feel, at this moment, like a schoolboy who is
compelled to rack his wits for some plausible lie to
escape a whipping.
Truly, Ned, you are a most ridiculous lover,
said I. Of all men I ever knew, I certainly never
saw one who took so little trouble to square his
conduct
to any rule. This is the merest farce that ever
was acted. Little does Bel suspect that she has in
her train such a trembling slave. Why, sir, it is the
perpetual burthen of her complaint that your
recklessness
of her rises to the most flagrant contumacy:
and, to tell you the truth, I think she has reason on
her side.
Well, well! said Ned, laughing, be that as it
may; say nothing about the feat of to-day, because,
VOL. II. 12
in sober earnest, I am not quite satisfied with the
exploit myself. I certainly was under no obligation
to drub that rascal Rutherford.
In the discussion of this topic we arrived at the
Brakes, where both joy and surprise were
manifested
at finding Fairbourne brought back in fetters to
his prison. Harvey Riggs clapped his hands and
called out Bravo! Well done Hazard! Did'nt I
say, Bel, that Ned would perform as many wonders
as the seven champions altogether? Is there such
another
true knight in the land?
As for Bel, she was raised into the loftiest
transports
.
She laughed,asked a thousand questions,
darted from place to place, and taking Fairbourne
in her hand, smoothed his feathers, and kissed him
over and over again. The rest of the family joined
in similar expressions of pleasure, and Ned gave a
circumstantial detail of all the facts attending the
recovery
,
carefully omitting the least allusion to the
affair
that followed it. When this was done, Harvey
again heaped a torrent of applause upon the Knight
of the Hawk, as he called Hazard, and with a lively
sally sang out, in a cracked and discordant voice,
Oh, 'tis love, 'tis love, 'tis love, that rules us all completely,
Oh, 'tis love, 'tis love, 'tis love commands, and we obey
which he concluded with sundry antics, and
danced out of the room. Bel, upon hearing the part
that Wilful acted in the recapture, declared that
she would take him into high favour, and that
thenceforth he should have the freedom of the
parlour
;
saying this, she patted him upon the back, and
made him lie down at her feet.
Hey day! this is a fine rout and pother about a
vagabond bird! said Mr. Tracy. Will you lose
your senses, good folks! Mr. Edward, you see what
it is to gather toys for these women. You have
made Bel your slave for life.
Bel blushed scarlet red at this intimation; and
Ned observing it, followed suit: their eyes met. A
precious pair of fools, to make so much of so small a
thing!
Fairbourne was carried to his perch, and regaled
with a meal; and the composure of the family being
restored, after the conclusion of this important affair,
we sat down to talk upon other matters.
Swansdown
,
we were told, had taken his departure after
breakfast. Mr. Tracy, Harvey assured us, had been
in his study nearly all day, conning over the papers
of the arbitration. The old gentleman, he said,
was not altogether satisfied with the award,
inasmuch
as there were certain particulars of fact which
he conceived to be mistated, especially in regard to
a survey, affirmed to be made of the mill-dam, which
did not appear in his notes. I have no doubt,
Harvey
added, that before a month my venerable
kinsman
will be in absolute grief for this untimely
cutting
short of the law-suit in the vigour of its days.
Ned sat beside Bel, occupied in a low, tremulous,
and earnest conversation, until the stars were all
shining bright, and even then, he unwillingly broke
his colloquy at my summons. Our horses had been
waiting at the door for the last hour.
We galloped nearly the whole way back to
Swallow
Barn; Ned rapidly leading the way, and
striking
his whip at the bushes on the road side, whistling,
singing, and cutting many antics upon his saddle.
What the deuce ails you? I called out.
I feel astonishingly active to night, said he. I
could do such deeds! and thereupon he put his
horse up to full speed.
The man is possessed, said I, following,
however
,
at the same gait.
That night we did not go to bed until the moon
rose, which I think the almanac will show to have
been near one o'clock.
CHAPTER X.
THE LAST MINSTREL.
As I do not at all doubt that my reader has by
this time become deeply interested in the progress of
Ned Hazard's love affairs; and as I find, (what
greatly surprises myself,) that Ned has grown to be a
hero in my story; and that I, who originally began
to write only a few desultory sketches of the Old
Dominion, have unawares, and without any
premeditated
purpose, absolutely fallen into a regular
jogtrot
,
novel-like narrative,at least, for several
consecutive
chapters,it is no more than what I owe to
posterity to go on and supply such matters of fact as
may tend to the elucidation and final clearing up of
the present involved and uncertain posture into which
I have brought my principal actors. Feeling the
weight of this obligation, as soon as I had closed the
last chapter I began to bethink me of the best means
of compassing my end; for, like a true
historiographer
,
I conceived it to be, in some sort, my bounden
duty to resort to the best sources of information which
my opportunities afforded. Now, it must have been
perceived by my clear-sighted readers, that I am
already
largely indebted to Harvey Riggs for the
faithful
report of such matters as fell out at the Brakes
when I was not there myself to note them down;
and I therefore thought, that in the present
emergency
12 *
I might, with great profit to my labour, have
recourse to the same fountain of intelligence. In
this I do but imitate and follow in the footsteps of all
the illustrious chroniclers of the world, who have
made it their business to speak primarily of what
they themselves have seen and known, and
secondarily
,
to take at second hand, (judiciously perpending
the force of testimony,) such things as have come to
them by hearsay: for, nothing is more common than
for these grave wights to introduce into their books
some of their weightiest and most important morsels
of history by some such oblique insinuation as this;
I have heard people say, or the renowned
Gregory
of Tours, or William of Malmsbury, or John
of Nokes affirms, or, it was currently reported and
believed at the time,or some such preface, by which
they let in the necessary matter. Henceforth, then,
let it be understood, that as I profess to speak in my
own person of what happened at Swallow Barn, so
I rely mainly on my contemporary Harvey, as
authority
for all such synchronous events as transpired
at the Brakes. With this explanatory advertisement,
I proceed with my story.
I have described, in the last chapter, the unnatural
speed with which Hazard and myself had ridden to
Swallow Barn. Bel too, it seems, was possessed in
some such strange mood after we were gone; for
she moved about the house singing, dancing, talking
unconnectedly, and manifesting many
unaccountable
humours. I devoutly believe that both she and
Hazard were bewitched. It might have been the
hawk,or some other little animal with wings on his
shoulders.But I leave this to the consideration of
the Pundits, and pass on to events of more
importance
.
We had not left the Brakes above half an hour
when the scraping of a violin was heard in the yard,
near the kitchen door. The tune was that of a
popular
country-dance, and was executed in a very
brisk and inspiring cadence.
That sounds like Hafen Blok's fiddle, said
Ralph. He has come here for his supper, and we
shall be pestered with his nonsense all night.
If it be Hafen, said Bel, he shall be well
treated, for the poor old man has a hard time in this
world. He is almost the only minstrel, cousin
Harvey
,
that is left.
`The bigots of this iron time,
Have called his harmless art a crime.'
And truly, I wish we had more like him! for,
Hafen
has a great many ballads that, I assure you, will
compare very well with the songs of the troubadours
and minnesingers.
There you go, cried Harvey, with your age of
chivalry. I don't know much about your
troubadours
and minnesingers: but, if there was amongst
them as great a scoundrel as Hafen, your age of
chivalry was an arrant cheat. Why, this old fellow
lives by petty larceny; he hasn't the dignity of a
large thief: he is a filcher of caps and napkins from
a washerwoman's basket; a robber of hen-roosts;
a pocketer of tea-spoons! Now, if there was any
romance
in him, he would, at least, steal cows and
take purses on the highway.
Pray, cousin, exclaimed Bel, laughing, do
not utter such slanders against my old friend Hafen!
Here, I have taken the greatest trouble in the world
to get me a minstrel. I have encouraged Hafen to
learn ditties, and he has even composed some
himself
at my bidding. Once I gave him a dress which
you would have laughed to see. It was made after
the most approved fashion of minstrelsy. First, there
was a long gown of Kendal green, gathered at the
neck with a narrow gorget; it had sleeves that hung
as low as the knee, slit from the shoulder to the
hand and lined with white cotton; a doublet with
sleeves of black worsted; upon these a pair of points
of tawny camlet, laced along the wrist with blue
thread points, with a welt towards the hand, made of
fustian; a pair of red stockings; a red girdle, with a
knife stuck in it; and, around his neck, a red riband,
suitable to the girdle. Now what do you think,
cousin, of such a dress as that?
Where, in the name of all unutterable vagaries!
did you get the idea of this trumpery? cried
Harvey
.
It is faithfully taken, said Bel, from the exact
description of the minstrel's dress, as detailed by
Laneham, in his account of the entertainment of
Queen Elizabeth at `Killingworth Castle.'
And did Hafen put it on?
To be sure he did! replied Bel, and paraded
about with it here a whole evening.
Bel, said Harvey, after a loud laugh,I like
your nonsense: It is so sublimated and refined, and
double-distilled, that, upon my soul, I think it throws
a shabby air over all other folly I ever saw!
Minstrel
Blok, Hawk Fairbourne, and Childe Ned,
Dragon-killing Ned, are altogether without a
parallel
,
or a copy in the whole world. A precious train
for a lady! And so, Hafen has been learning
ballads
,
too?
Certainly, returned Bel, I have taken the
trouble to get him some very authentic collections.
Now, what do you think of `the Golden Garland of
Princely Delights?' that is an old book that I gave
him to learn some songs from, and the wretch lost
it, without learning one single sonnet.
Good reason why, said Ralph;he never
could read.
I didn't know that, Ralph, when I gave it to
him, said Bel. But Hafen has an excellent
memory
.
Hark! he is beginning to sing now. Listen,
cousin, and you will hear something to surprise you.
At this moment, Hafen's voice was heard
commencing
a stave, with a nasal tone, in a monotonous,
quick, up-and-down tune, which accompanied words
that were uttered with a very distinct articulation.
Let us have this in the porch, said Harvey;
and he immediately led the way to the back-door;
where Hafen being called, took his seat and
recommenced
his song as follows:
November the fourth, in the year of ninety-one,
We had a sore engagement near to Fort Jefferson.
St. Clair was our commander, which may remembered he,
For there we left nine hundred men, in the Western Territory.
Our militia was
attackted
, just as the day did break;
And soon were overpowered and forced to retreat.
They killed Major Ouldham, Levin and Briggs likewise,
With horrid yells of savages resounded through the skies;
Major Butler was wounded, the very second fire
Well, that will do, Hafen, interrupted
Harvey
;
we don't like such a bloody song as this; it is
the very essence of tragedy.
It's as true as preaching, Mister Riggs, said
Hafen. I was there myself, in Colonel Gibson's
regiment.
No doubt! replied Harvey. But Miss
Tracy
wants something more sentimental, Hafen; this
butchering of militia men does not suit the ladies so
well as a touching, sorrowful song.
Ay, ay! said Hafen, I understand you,
Mister
Harvey. I have just the sort of song to please
Miss Isabel. It goes to the tune of `William
Reilly.'
`While I rehearse my story, Americans give ear,
Of Britain's fading glory, you presently shall hear;
I'll give a true relation, attend to what I say,
Concerning the taxation of North America.
There is a wealthy people who sojourn in that land,
Their churches all with steeples most delicately stand,
Their houses, like the lily, are painted red and gay;
They flourish like the gilly in North America.'
Poh! this is worse than the other! exclaimed
Harvey. Do you call this sentimental? Why
don't you give us something pitiful? Bel, your
minstrel
is as badly trained as your hawk.
Hafen, said Bel, I fear you have not thought
of me lately, or you would have brought me
something
more to my liking than these songs.
Bless your young heart, young mistress!
replied
Hafen, I can sing fifty things that you'd like
to hear, in the love line: There's `the Manhattan
Tragedy,' and `the Royal Factor's Garland,' and
`the Golden Bull,' and `the Prodigal Daughter,'
and `Jemmy and Nancy,' commonly called the
Yarmouth Tragedy, showing how, by the
avariciousness
and cruelty of parents, two faithful lovyers
were destroyed: and there's `the Gosport Tragedy,'
that shows how a young damsel was led astray by
a ship's carpenter, and carried into a lonesome
wood; and how her ghost haunted him at sea;
`When he
immediantly
fell on his knees
And the blood in his veins with horror did freeze.'
Oh, very well, said Harvey, stop there; we
don't wish to hear the music. Go get your supper,
Hafen; the servants are waiting for you. These
are entirely too sentimental; you run into
extremes
.
Hafen obeyed the order; and, as he
limped
towards the kitchen, Harvey remarked to Bel,
This is a fine smack of war and love that Hafen
has favoured us with;
`The last of all the bards was he
Who sang of Border Chivalry.'
Truly, Cousin Bel, these shreds and patches of
romance
are wonderfully picturesque. Hafen does
honour
to your zeal in behalf of the days of
knighthood
and minstrelsy.
You may laugh, Harvey, as much as you
please, but there is something pleasant in the idea
of moated castles, and gay knights, and border
feuds, and roundelays under one's window, and
lighted
halls where ladies dance
corantos
and `trod
measures' as they called it!
And when hawks, added Harvey, were not
flown like kites, with a string, but came at a whistle,
and did as they were told; and troubadours were
not Dutch pedlers; and when bachelors could win
mistresses by hard blows, and were not sent off
because
they were merry and like other people.
Pshaw! cousin, interrupted Bel. You havn't
one spark of genuine romance in your whole
composition
.
It is profane to listen to such a recreant as
you are.
Well, Bel, I will tell you, said Harvey. It
is not to be denied that Hafen shines as a fiddler,
however questionable may be his merits as a
ballad-monger
.
So if cousin Kate here and Ralph will
dance, we will bring him into the parlour and have
a four handed reel. We will call it a
coranto
, if
you prefer the name; and, to give you a lighted
hall, I will have two more candles put on the
mantle
piece.
Agreed, said Bel, so tell Hafen to bring in
his instrument.
Hafen appeared at the summons, and an hour
was merrily spent in dancing.
When the dance was over Bel gave Hafen a
glass of wine, and slipped into his hand a piece of
money.
Many thanks to my young lady! said the old
man. You deserve a good husband and soon.
You have travelled, Hafen, to very little
purpose
,
said Harvey, if you are not able, at your
time of life, to tell this lady's fortune.
Oh, bless you! replied Hafen, I can do that
very truly. You are not afraid, young mistress, to
show me the palm of your hand?
Not she! said Harvey. Bel, open your hand;
let the venerable Hafen disclose to you the decrees
of fate.
Take care, Hafen, said Bel, holding out her
hand; if you say one unlucky word I will for ever
dismiss you from my service.
Hafen took from his pocket an old pair of
spectacles
,
and proceeded, very minutely, to examine the
open hand.
Here is a line that has not more than six months
to run: that is the line of marriage, young mistress.
It is not so smooth a line, neither, as ought to be in
such a palm, for it breaks off in two or three places,
with some crossings.
Defend me! cried Bel. What does that
mean?
It means, replied Hafen, that the lady is hard
to please, and can scarcely find heart to make up her
mind.
True! exclaimed Harvey. Worshipful
sooth-sayer
,
Hafen, go on!
The lady does not sleep well o' nights,
continued
Hafen; and here are cloudy dreams; the hand
is mottled, and yet her blood ought to flow
smoothly
too, for it has a healthy colour; the palm is moist
and shows a warm heart: I fear the lady has
fancies
.
VOL. II. 13
Well, well, it is all nothing, as there is a good
ending to it. Here is a person who has done her
great service lately. He will do her more: and,let
me see,he is a gentleman of good blood, and more
in love than I think it right to tell. He travels on a
line that runs to marriage. Fie, my young mistress,
you would not be obstinate with such a gentleman!
But here is a stop and a cross line. `There is many
a slip 'twixt the cup and the lip.' No, no, it is
better
than it looks.
Excellent well! cried Harvey again.
It is not excellent well, cousin, said Bel,
playfully
withdrawing her hand. Hafen, you have to
learn the beginnings of your art. You know nothing
about palmistry! Couldn't you see, with half an eye,
that the marriage line on my hand was a mile from
the end? I wonder at you!
Not so fast, not so fast, Miss Isabel! cried
Hafen
,
with a sly laugh. You can't deceive me. I
saw the very man to-day. And a proper gentleman
he isa brave one, as I said before. Why, gentle
bred as he is, he can handle any man, in the way of
boxing, 'twixt this and Richmond. It is a real
pleasure
to see him strike a blow.
His name, said Harvey.
It would not be a strange name to these walls,
if I was to tell it, answered Hafen. But I never
thought such a pair of arms belonged to a
gentleman
,
as he showed this morning.
Ned Hazard? said Harvey. Pray, what did
you see of him this morning?
I will tell you and our pretty young lady here
what I saw, replied Hafen. Up here at the cross
roads, you must know,about noon or a little later,
comes along Mister Edward Hazard and that
strange gentleman his friend, on horseback, with that
same hawk that's out here in the cage. Well, there
was a parcel of neighbours drinking, and such like,
about the store. Mister Edward never stands
much upon ceremony; so, he got down, and
then the other got down, and `good morning,'
and `good morning,' went round. Mister
Edward's
not one of your proud men, for he got to
showing
them the bird, and told them, bless your heart!
whose it wasMiss Isabel's here. I suspected
something
then, said Hafen, putting his finger against the
side of his nose and looking at Harvey. Well,
one word brought on another, and somehow or
'nother
,
Miles Rutherford gives Mister Edward the lie.
So, out jumps Mister Edward, and calls to the others
to stand by him, and swears out pretty strong, (you
know, Miss Isabel, Mister Ned's like any other man
at swearing when he's angry,) and tells Miles to
step out if he dares, and says, he will lick him to his
heart's content,or something to that effect. Well,
Miles had whipped almost every fighting man in the
county, and he wa'nt going to be baulked by Ned
Hazard; and, accordingly, out he comes. Mercy
on me! says I, now Mister Edward will give Miles
such a mouthful to stay his stomach, as he never
tasted
in his life before. I knew Mr. Hazard of old,
and told Miles what he'd get. And sure enough, it
would have done your heart good, Miss Isabel, if
you had seen how Mister Edward did drub Miles!
And the best of it was, he did it so genteel, as if he
did'nt want to bloody his clothes. And when he was
done he wiped his face, as natural as if he had been
at his dinner, and I brought him some water to wash
his hands; and then off he and the tother gentleman
rode after bidding the company good day.But did'nt
we give them three cheers!
Are you telling us the truth, Hafen? asked
Harvey, earnestly.
I would not tell you a lie, Mister Harvey,
replied
Hafen, if it was to save my right hand from
being chopped off this minute.
This morning, do you say this happened?
As I am a Christian man, said the pedler.
Ned fought with that bully, Miles Rutherford?
and with fists?
As fair a fight, Mister Riggs, replied Hafen,
and as pretty a one as you ever saw.
What brought it about? You have told us
nothing
about the cause of the quarrel.
I'm not particular about that, said the other;
but it was words. The truth is, I suspect Miles
was impertinent, and Mister Edward wanted to beat
him; for he said he did it on account of the good of
the public. Both on 'em might have been a little in
the wrong, but Mister Hazard's hand was in; and,
you know, a man don't stand much persuasion when
that's the case. But, you may depend, Mister
Edward
gained a great deal of glory.
Edward didn't say a word about this to us, said
Bel.
I can't unriddle it, replied Harvey, shaking his
head.
Hafen was now dismissed from the parlour; and
Bel and Harvey fell into a long conversation, in
relation
to the disclosure that was just made. Bel
uttered
a deep and sincere complaint in Harvey's ear,
that the waywardness of Hazard's temper should be
so continually driving him off his guard. It was so
unbecoming his station in society to permit himself to
appear in these lights to the world! When would he
learn discretion? How could he hope to win the
affections
even of his intimate friends, when he was
perpetually offending against the plainest duties he
owed them? She admitted his goodness of heart, and
the value she set upon the many excellent points in
his character; but it seemed as if fate had
unalterably
decreed that every day he was to be farther
removed
from all hopes of making himself agreeable to
her.
To these suggestions Harvey could frame no
defence
,
except that Hafen had, perhaps,
misrepresented
the facts.
I do not wish to inquire into the details, said
Bel, because no provocation, in my opinion, could
excuse a gentleman in making such a figure before a
set of low-bred rustics. I cannot express to you,
cousin Harvey, how much this thing shocks me.
There are provocations, Bel, replied Harvey,
that would render such an exploit as our
muddy-brained
pedler has celebrated meritoriouseven in
a gentleman.
I cannot think it,cousin:I cannot think so,
replied Bel, musing over the matter; I wish I
could.
I'll tell you, Bel, what we will do, said
Harvey
,
13 *
with a gay air; we will get our old
minnesinger
Hafen to hitch it into verse and sing it to the
tune of `The Lay of the Last Minstrel.'
Incorrigible sinner! exclaimed Bel, how can
you jest upon such an incident! as for your friend
Edward, I pity him; you know why. But do not
make me think as hardly of you. Good night!
Pleasant dreams to you! cried Harvey.
Fancy
that you have heard of a tilting match between a
bull and a cavalier, and that the bull was beaten.
Romance and chivalry are sovereign varnishes for
cracked crowns and bloody noses. Good night!
CHAPTER XI.
SIGNS OF A HERO.
While
Hazard was indulging the luxurious
fancy
that he had sailed, at last, into the harbour of
Bel's good graces; and was casting about to see
how he should best make good his moorings, Hafen,
like a lame Vulcan, was forging a thunderbolt that
was destined to descend upon Ned's slender
pinnace
,
and either tear up one of the principal planks,
or at least, give him such a lurch as should make
him think he was going straight to the bottom.
Happy would it have been for Hazard if he had
not forbidden me to say any thing to his mistress
about his unfortunate quarrel with Miles Rutherford;
for then I could have given the matter such a gloss
as must have entirely satisfied any reasonable
woman
whatever. But to have this incident mangled
by Hafen Blok, disgraced by his slang, and
discoloured
by his officious zeal to contribute to Ned's
glorification, was one of those unlucky strokes of
fortune to which the principal actors in romance
have been subject from time immemorial. This,
therefore, gives me strong hopes that he is really
destined to be a hero of some note before I am done
with him. It has thrown him, for the present, into a
deep shade. And yet,shortsighted mortal!so
little suspicious was he that affairs had taken this
turn, that all the next day (being Sunday) he was
more like a man bordering upon insanity than a
rational
christian. His first impulse was to go over to
the Brakes immediately after breakfast: then, he
checked himself by the consideration that it was
pushing matters too fiercely. After this, he thought
of sending for Harvey Riggs to join us at dinner:
then, he reflected that it wasn't Harvey he wished
to see. He would sit down with a book in his hand,
but would soon discover that he could not
understand
one sentence that he was reading. He
would get up, and walk as far as the gate; look
critically
at the plum-tree, that had not the smallest
appearance of fruit upon it and very few leaves, and
then return to the house whistling, until Lucy or
Vic would tell him, it was Sunday and he must
not whistle. At length, as a last resort, he went
up to his chamber, and dressed himself out with
extraordinary
particularity in white drilling pantaloons,
as stiff with starch as if they were made of foolscap
paper, a white waistcoat, his green frock, a black
stock, boots and his light, hair-cloth forage-cap. In
this attire he appeared in the hall, with a riding
whip in his hand, walking up and down in profound
abstraction.
Where are you going, Ned? asked Meriwether.
Going! he replied, I am going to stay at
home.
I beg your pardon! I thought you were about
to ride. Meriwether passed on. Ned continued
his walk.
Where are you going, Edward? asked my
cousin Lucretia.
Nowhere, said Ned. I mean to stay at
home. My cousin Lucretia disappeared.
Edward, where are you going? inquired
Prudence
.
I am not going out, said Ned. Prudence
decamped
.
Uncle Ned, may I go with you? shall I get
Spitfire? cried Rip, running into the hall.
Where? asked Ned, with some surprise.
Wherever you are going to ride, answered Rip.
Good people! exclaimed Hazard. What
has got into the family! where would you have me
go? what do you see? what do you want?
Arn't you going to ride? asked Rip.
By no means, my dear.Away went Rip.
All this I saw from the porch. So, getting up
from my seat, I also accosted him with the same
question. Where are you going?
The Lord knows, Mark! I have just dressed
myself, and have been walking here, for want of
something better to do. I wish it were to-morrow!
for I don't like to go over yonder to-day. I think a
man ought not to visit more than three times a week.
I feel very queerly this morning: I have been
everywhere
,
gaping about like an apprentice-boy in his
Sunday clothes. I have seen the horses in the
stable
,
the fowls in the poultry-yard, the pigs, the
negroes
,
and, in fact, I don't know what in the devil
to do with myself. Mark, we will go over to the
Brakes to-morrow morning?
Oh, certainly. I think our affairs require some
attention in that quarter. Why not go this
evening
?
I should like it very much, said Ned. But it
would alarm the family. I feel qualmish at being
seen there too often. People are so fond of
gossipping
!
No, no, we will wait until to-morrow.
These particulars will show the state of Hazard's
mind, the day following the recovery of the hawk,a
day that passed heavily enough. Ned pretended to
impute al lthis tediousness to Sunday, which, he
remarked
,
was always the most difficult day in the
week to get through.
On Monday morning we were at the Brakes by
ten o'clock. Bel was busy with Fairbourne, and
looked uncommonly fresh and gay. Her manner
was affable, and too easy, I thought, considering the
peculiar relation of her affairs, at this moment,
towards Hazard. She addressed her conversation
principally to me; and, once or twice, refused Ned's
services in some little matters wherein it was natural
he should offer them. I observed, moreover, that
she did not second his attempts at wit as freely as
she was used to do: they made me smile; but upon
her they fell harmless and flat, like schoolboys'
arrows
headed with tar. All this seemed strange and
boded ill. Hazard observed it; for it made him
awkward; his cheek grew pale, and his words stuck
in his throat.
In a short time some household matters called Bel
away.
The wind has changed, said Ned, in a
half-whisper
to me, as we walked to the parlour; the
thermometer is falling towards the freezing point. I
wish this business was at the
Whist, Ned! I exclaimed, don't swear! There
is some mistake in this matter: we'll talk to
Harvey
.
Harvey Riggs took a seat with us at the front
door; and there, in a long, confidential and grave
conference, he explained to us all that he knew of
this perplexing affair. He said that he had been
trying
to bring Bel to reason, because he thought, to use
his own phrase, it was all flummery in her to be so
hyperbolical with Ned; but that she was struck,
just between wind and water, with Hafen's rigmarole
about Ned's boxing match; and that it would
require
some time to get this warp out of her fancy;
that there was no question she was deeply wounded
by all she had heard; but still he had hopes, that he
would be able to set matters right again. Ned,
said he, my dear fellow, let me warn you, at least
until you are married, (if you are ever to have that
luck,) to care how you make a fool of yourself;
because
it is sure immediately to turn Bel into a
greater
one. Mark, they are a miraculous pair of geese!
cried Harvey, breaking out into a loud laugh; and
then singing out with a great flourish, to the tune of
a popular song, the following doggerel
And grant, oh Queen of fools! he said,
Thus ran the mooncalf's prayer
That I may prove the drollest knight
And wed the queerest fair.
Ned absolutely raved. He thought he had the
fairest occasion in the world to get into a passion;
and he, accordingly, fell to swearing against all
womankind
,
in the most emphatic terms. As soon as
he had unpacked his heart in this way, he
dropped
into another mood, and began to deplore his
fate, pretty much as he had done on some of those
former occasions that I have described; and last of
of all,which he ought to have done at first,he
became
very reasonable; and, in a calm, manly
defence
of himself, narrated circumstantially the whole
affair; showing, in the most conclusive manner, that
he had been induced to accept Miles Rutherford's
challenge, only because he did not choose to hear
that graceless brawler pour out his vile abuse upon
one so venerable in his eyes as Mr. Tracy.
What could I do, said he, but chastise such
a scoundrel, for the irreverent mention, in such a
circle, of the excellent old gentleman? and, I
humbly
think, that, of all persons in the world, Bel
Tracy
is the last that has a right to complain of it.
This sets the matter in a new light, said
Harvey
;
I told Bel, I was certain Hafen had lied.
Her worshipful minstrel, her rascally minnesinger
makes a great figure in this business!
Here Hazard's mood changed again. Nothing
is so brave as a lover who has found good ground
to rail against his mistress; he may be as gentle as
a pet squirrel, or a lamb that is fed by hand, as long
as he has no confederate to encourage him in
rebellion
;
but no sooner does he receive a compassionate
word from a by-stander, or enlist a party, than he
becomes the most peremptory and fearful of animals.
Harvey's words stirred up Ned's soul into a sublime
mutiny; and, for some minutes, he was more
extravagant
than ever. He would let Bel see that she
had made a sad mistake, when she imagined that he
was going to surrender his free agency, his
judgment
,
his inclinations, his sense of duty to her! It
became a man to take a stand in affairs of this
nature
!
He scorned to put on a character to win
a woman, that he did not mean to support
afterwards
,
if he should be successful: it would be rank
hypocrisy! What, in the devils' name, did she expect
of him!to stand by, and acknowledge himself a
man, when sheyes, she herselffor an attack upon
her father was an attack upon herwas reviled and
made the subject of profane jest and vituperation
on the lips of an outlaw! Let Bel consider it in this
point of view, and how could she possibly find fault
with him?
Yes. Let Bel consider it in this point of view!
said Harvey, chiming in with a droll and affected
gravity; I'll go and put the subject to her in this
light, this very instant.
No, said Ned, you need not be in a hurry.
But, in earnest, Harvey, at another time I would
like you to do it: it is but justice.
I'll harrow up, replied Harvey, with a deep
tragic
voice, her inmost soul.
In order that you may have free scope, said
Hazard, it will be better for Mark and me to set
off home immediately.
`Sir Lucius, we won't run,' said I, laughing.
VOL. II. 14
Do you think there is danger, Ned? shall we make
a rapid retreat?
`Brush, exclaimed Harvey, the sooner you
are off, the better!' I will met you anon, and report
to you at Swallow Barn.
Without taking leave of the family we
commenced
our retreat; and during the ride Ned
displayed
the same alternations of feeling that were
manifested in our interview with Harvey. These
emotions resolved themselves, at last, into one
abiding
and permanent determination, and that,
considering
the character and temper of Hazard, was
sufficiently comic, namely,that in his future
intercourse
with Bel, he would invariably observe the
most scrupulous regard to all the high-flown and
overstrained elegancies and proprieties of conduct
which she so pretended to idolize. His humour
was that of dogged submission to her most capricious
whims. Never did spaniel seem so humbled.
I know I shall make a fool of myself, said he,
but that is her look-out, not mine. I'll give her
enough of her super-subtle, unimaginable, diabolical
dignity!I will be the very essence of dulness, and
the quintessence of decorum!I will turn myself
into
an ass of the first water, until I make her so sick
of pedantry and sentiment, that a good fellow shall
go free with her all the rest of her life!
CHAPTER XII.
A COUNCIL OF WAR.
As
soon as we had left the Brakes Harvey sought
an opportunity to communicate to Bel all that he
had learned from us in regard to the cause and
circumstances
of the quarrel between Ned and
Rutherford
;
presenting to her, in the strongest point of
view he was able, the signal injustice she had done
to so faithful and devoted a lover. I should not
have regarded the matter a rush, said Harvey, if
it were not that Ned, as I have often told you, is
one of the most sensitive creatures alive, and so
much inclined to melancholy that there is no
knowing
what effect such an incident may have upon his
temper. Bel smiled incredulously, and seemed as
if she did not know whether to take Harvey in jest
or earnest.
You may treat this lightly, continued Harvey,
but I am sure you will feel some unpleasant
misgivings
when you come to reflect on it. She smiled
again.
It is not a just return for that admirable
constancy
,
Harvey proceeded, which Ned,
notwithstanding
his upper current of levity, has always
shown towards you; and which, amidst all his
waywardness
,
has always set steadily towards you. If
he has been volatile in his pursuits, you cannot deny
that he has connected you with the pleasantest
passages
of his life; if he has been strange in his
conduct
,
now and then, it is very obvious that he has
never ceased to feel the desire to make himself
agreeable to you; if he has occasionally erred from
the straight line of decorum, every transgression may
be traced to some ardent endeavour to support your
cause, even at the expense of your good opinion.
Now, this is what I call faith, honour and gallantry:
It shows single heartedness, homage and modesty.
It is in the very best strain of a cavalier devoted to
his lady-love; and has more true chivalry in it than
all the formal courtesies in the world
Bel began to look grave.
It cuts Ned to the heart to think his mistress
ungrateful; and, particularly, that she should listen
to a vile strolling pedler, and take his account of a
fray as if it were gospel, instead of suspending her
opinion until she should have a more authentic
relation
from himself. This has sunk deeper into his
feelings than any act of unkindness that ever befel
him. And from you, Bel!Conceive what anguish
Ned must have experienced when your cold looks
chided him for one of the most disinterested actions
of his life.
Why didn't he tell us all about this quarrel when
he brought the hawk home? said Bel. Why was
he silent then, I should like to know?
Was it for him, asked Harvey, to vaunt his
exploits in your ear? A brave man naturally
forbears
to speak of his achievements; and therein is
Ned's true modesty of character conspicuous. He
would have concealed this from
you
until he had
grown gray, lest you might have been tempted to
think he played the braggart with you. I cannot
sufficiently admire such forbearance.
Ah me, cousin! said Bel, I do not know what
to think: You perplex me. I would not willingly
offend the meanest creature that lives. I am sure I
have no reason to be unkind to Mr. Hazard. But
still it is not my fault that I cannot set the same
value
upon his virtues that you and others do.I
almost
wish I had not been so marked in my
demeanour
to him this morning. I am sure I am not
ungrateful
in my temper, cousin Harvey: Did he speak
much of it?
Rather in sorrow than in anger, returned
Harvey
.
But the thought haunted him all the time
he was here. He broke out once or twice and
swore.
Swore at
me?
exclaimed Bel.
No; I was mistaken in saying he swore.
He gave vent to some piteous feelings,as well
he might:but they were expressed chiefly in
sighs.
I wish I knew whether you were in earnest,
Harvey, said Bel, beseechingly. Mercy on me!
I do not know what to think. I wish I were in
heaven
!
And still, I won't believe Ned Hazard cares
the thousandth part as much for me as you make
out.
This was not true, for Bel was inwardly very
much moved with the whole relation, and began to
14 *
feel, what she never before acknowledged, that Ned
had a very fair claim to her consideration.
Harvey was making an experiment upon her heart;
and, having set her to musing over the affair, left her
to settle the case with her own conscience. He had
now satisfied himself that Ned, if he used even
ordinary
discretion, might turn the accident to good
account
;
and he therefore said nothing more to Bel,
knowing that the more she thought of what had
passed
,
the graver would be the impression on her mind.
The next morning he hastened over to Swallow
Barn, where, like a trusty minister, he detailed the
sum of his observations in a solemn council,
convoked
for that purpose.
Never was any topic more minutely or more ably
discussed. We all agreed that Ned's prospects were
brightening; that a crisis had arrived which it
required
great judgment to manage with effect; and that,
above all things, he must be very guarded for the
future
.
It was also resolved that he should henceforth
be more special and direct in his attentions, and not
scruple to assume the posture of an avowed lover:
that he should put on as much propriety of manner
as might be found requisite to gratify Bel's most
visionary
requisitions; and that, in particular, he must
neither swear in her presence, nor talk lightly before
her.
Oh, as to that, said Ned, who had grown as
pliant as a trained hound in our hands, I have
already
resolved to show her that I can play the part
of the most solemn fool in the world. But, what
perplexes me most is to find out some sentimental
subject for conversation. I shall commit myself by
some egregious blunder of a joke, if I get to talking
at random. Faith, I have a great mind to write
down a whole discourse and commit it to memory.
Talk to her, said Harvey, upon classical
matters
.
Show her your learning. She thinks you don't
read; rub up some of your college pedantry: any
thing man;give her a little of the heathen
mythology
!
Oh, I'll do it! cried Ned with exultation. I'll
astonish her with the Encyclopedia!
Take care, though, interrupted Harvey, to
season
it well with delicate and appropriate allusions to
the affair in hand. Let it be congenial and
lover-like
;
no matter how nonsensical. But don't be
bombastic
,
Ned.
Trust me! he replied, I'll suit her to the
twentieth
part of a scruple.
Here our conclave broke up with a flash of
merriment
;
and we did nothing but jest all the rest of
the day.
Harvey dined with us; and when, in the evening,
he thought of returning, Carey came into the parlour
to make a proposition which had the effect to detain
our guest with us all that night. The incident that
followed will require a chapter to itself.
CHAPTER XIII.
WOODCRAFT.
When
Carey came into the parlour he pulled off
his hat and made a profound bow; and then
advanced
to the back of Ned's chair, where, in a low and
orderly tone of voice, he made the following grave
and interesting disclosure: namely, that the boys
meaning some of the other negroes that belonged to
the plantation,had found out what had been
disturbing
the poultry-yard for some time past: that it
was not a mink, as had been given out, but nothing
less than a large old '
possum
that had been traced to
a gum tree over by the river, about a mile distant:
that the boys had
diskivered
him (to use Carey's own
term) by some feathers near the tree; and, when
they looked into the hollow, they could see his eyes
shining like foxfire. He said they had been trying
to screw him out, by thrusting up a long stick cut
with a fork at the end, (an approved method of
bringing
out squirrels, foxes and rabbits from their holes,
and much in practice in the country,) and tangling
it in his hair, but that this design was abandoned
under
the supposition that, perhaps, Master Edward
would like to hunt him in the regular way.
Ned professed a suitable concern in the
intelligence
;
but inquired of Carey, whether he, as an old
sportsman, thought it lawful to hunt an opossum at
midsummer. This interrogatory set the old negro to
chuckling, and afterwards, with a wise look, to
putting
the several cases in which he considered a hunt
at the present season altogether consonant with
prescriptive
usage. He admitted that '
possums
in
general
were not to be followed till persimmon time,
because they were always fattest when that fruit was
ripe; but, when they couldn't get persimmons they
were mighty apt to attack the young fowls and
cut their throats: That it was good law to hunt any
sort of creature when he was known to be doing
mischief to the plantation. But even then, Carey
affirmed
with a howsomdever, and nevertheless,
that if they carried young, and especially a '
possum
,
(which has more young ones than most other beasts,)
he thought they ought to be let alone until their
appropriate
time. This, however, was a large male
opossum, that was known to be engaged in
nefarious
practices; and, moreover, was shocking fat;
and therefore, upon the whole, Carey considered him
as a lawful subject of chase.
To this sagacious perpending of the question, and to
the conclusion which the veteran had arrived at, Ned
could oppose no valid objection. He, therefore,
replied
that he was entirely convinced that he, Carey,
had taken a correct view of the subject; and that if
Mr. Riggs and Mr. Littleton could be prevailed upon
to lend a hand, nothing would be more agreeable
than the proposed enterprise.
We were unanimous on the proposition. Harvey
agreed to defer his return to the Brakes until the
next morning; and it was arranged that we should
be apprized by Carey when the proper hour came
round to set out on the expedition. Carey then
detailed the mode of proceeding: A watch was to
be set near the hen-roost, the dogs were to be kept
out of the way, lest they might steal upon the enemy
unawares, and destroy him without a chase; notice
was to be given of his approach; and one or two of
those on the watch were to frighten him away; and
after allowing him time enough to get back to the
woods, the dogs were to be put upon the trail and to
pursue him until he was
treed
.
Having announced this, the old servant bowed
again and left the room, saying, that it would be
pretty
late before we should be called out, because it
was natural to these thieving animals to wait until
people went to bed; and that a '
possum
was one of
the cunningest things alive.
Midnight arrived without a summons from our
leader: the family had long since retired to rest;
and we began to fear that our vigil was to end in
disappointment
.
We had taken possession of the
settees
in the hall, and had almost dropped asleep,
when, about half past twelve, Carey came tiptoeing
through the back door and told us, in a mysterious
whisper, that the depredator upon the poultry-yard
had just been detected in his visit: that big Ben
(for so one of the negroes was denominated, to
distinguish
him from little Ben,) had been out and saw
the animal skulking close under the fence in the
neighbourhood of the roost. Upon this intelligence,
we rose and followed the old domestic to the
designated
spot.
Here were assembled six or seven of the negroes,
men and boys, who were clustered into a group at a
short distance from the poultry-yard. Within a
hundred
paces the tall figure of big Ben was discerned,
in dim outline, proceeding cautiously across a field
until he had receded beyond our view. A nocturnal
adventure is always attended with a certain show of
mystery: the presence of darkness conjures up in
every mind an indefinite sense of fear, faint, but still
sufficient to throw an interest around trivial things,
to which we are strangers in the daytime. The
little
assembly of blacks that we had just joined were
waiting in noiseless reserve for some report from Ben;
and, upon our arrival, were expressing in low and
wary whispers, their conjectures as to the course the
game had taken, or recounting their separate
experience
as to the habits of the animal. It was a
cloudless
night; and the obscure and capacious vault
above us showed its thousands of stars, with a
brilliancy
unusual at this season. A chilling breeze
swept through the darkness and fluttered the
neighbouring
foliage with an alternately increasing and
falling murmur. Some of the younger negroes stood
bareheaded, with no clothing but coarse shirts and
trowsers, shivering amongst the crowd; and, every
now and then, breaking out into exclamations, in a
pitch of voice that called down the reproof their
elders. Ned commanded all to be silent and to
seat themselves upon the ground; and while we
remained
in this position, Ben reappeared and came
directly up to the circle. He reported that he had
detected the object of our quest near at hand; and
had followed him through the weeds and stubble of
the adjoining field, until he had seen him take a
course which rendered it certain that he had been
sufficiently alarmed by the rencounter to induce him
to retire to the gum. It was, therefore, Ben's advice
that Ned, Harvey, and myself, should take Carey as
a guide, and get, as fast as we could, to the
neighbourhood
of the tree spoken of, in order that we
might be sure to see the capture; and that he would
remain behind, where, after a delay long enough to
allow us to reach our destination, he would put the
dogs, which were now locked up in the stable, upon
the trail; and then come on as rapidly as they were
able to follow the scent.
Ben had the reputation of being an oracle in
matters
of woodcraft; and his counsel was, therefore,
implicitly adopted. Carey assured us that there was
no mistake in him, and that we might count upon
arriving at the appointed place, with the utmost
precision
,
under his piloting. We accordingly set
forward
.
For nearly a mile we had to travel through
weeds and bushes; and having safely accomplished
this, we penetrated into a piece of swampy
woodland
that lay upon the bank of the river. Our way
was sufficiently perplexed; and, notwithstanding
Carey's exorbitant boasting of his thorough
knowledge
of the ground, we did not reach the term of our
march without some awkward mistakes,such as
taking ditches for fallen trees, and blackberry bushes
for smooth ground. Although the stars did their best
to afford us light, the thickness of the wood into
which we had advanced wrapt us, at times, in
impenetrable
gloom. During this progress we were
once stopped by Harvey calling out, from some
twenty paces in the rear, that it was quite
indispensable
to the success of the expedition, so far as he was
concerned, that Carey should correct a topographical
error, into which he, Mr. Riggs, found himself very
unexpectedly plunged; I have this moment, said
he, been seized by the throat by a most rascally
grapevine; and in my sincere desire to get out of its
way, I find that another of the same tribe has
hooked
me below the shoulders: Meantime, my hat has
been snatched from my head; and, in these
circumstances
,
gentlemen, perhaps it is not proper for me
to budge a foot.
Notwithstanding these embarrassments, we at last
reached the gum tree, and halting in his shade,
if the tree could be said to be proprietor of any part
of this universal commodity, patiently awaited
the events that were upon the wind. The heavy
falling dew had shed a dampness through the air that
had almost stiffened our limbs with cold It was
necessary that we should remain silent; and, indeed,
the momentary expectation of hearing our followers
advance upon our footsteps fixed us in a mute and
earnest suspense. This feeling absorbed all other
emotions for a time; when finding that they were not
yet afoot, we began to look round upon the scene,
and note the novel impressions it made upon our
senses. The wood might be said to be vocal with a
thousand unearthly sounds; for, the wakeful beings
of midnight, that inhabit every spray and branch of
the forest, are endued with voices of the harshest
discord
.
VOL. II. 15
The grove, that in daylight is resonant with
melody, is now converted into a sombre theatre of
gibbering reptiles, screeching insects and nightbirds
of melancholy and grating cries: The concert is not
loud, but incessant, and invades the ear with
fiendish
notes: it arouses thoughts that make it
unpleasant
to be alone. Through the trees the murky
surface
of the river was discernible, by the flickering
reflections
of the stars, with darkness brooding over
the near perspective; in the bosom of this heavy
shadow, a lonely taper shot its feeble ray from the
cabin window of some craft at anchor; and this was
reflected, in a long, sharp line, upon the water below
it. The fretful beat of the waves was heard almost
at our feet; and the sullen plash of a fish, springing
after his prey, occasionally reached us with strange
precision. Around us, the frequent crash of rotten
boughs, breaking under the stealthy footstep of the
marauder of the wood that now roamed for booty,
arrested our attention and deceived us with the
thought that the special object of our search was
momentarily approaching.
Still, however, no actual sign was yet given us that
our huntsmen were on their way. Harvey grew
impatient
and took our old guide to task for having
mistaken
his course; but Carey persisted that he was
right, and that this delay arose only from Ben's wary
caution to make sure of his game. At length, a
deep-toned
and distant howl reached us from the direction
of the house.
Big Ben's awake now, said Carey; that's
Csar's voice, and he never speaks without telling
truth.
We were all attention; and the
tonguing
of this
dog was followed by the quick yelping of four or five
others. Ned directed Carey to seat himself at the
foot of the gum tree, in order that he might prevent
the opossum from retreating into the hollow; and
then suggested that we should conceal ourselves
under
the neighbouring bank.
By this time, the cries of the dogs were redoubled,
and indicated the certainty of their having fallen upon
the track of their prey. Carey took his seat, with
his back against the opening of the hollow, and we
retired to the bank, under the shelter of some large
and crooked roots of a sycamore that spread its bulk
above the water. Whilst in this retreat, the halloos
of Ben and his assistants, encouraging the dogs,
became
distinctly audible, and gradually grew stronger
upon our hearing. Every moment the animation of
the scene increased; the clamour grew musical as
it swelled upon the wind; and we listened with a
pleasure that one would scarce imagine could be felt
under such circumstances, instantly expecting the
approach of our companions. It was impossible
longer to remain inactive; and, with one impulse,
we sprang from our hiding-place, and hurried to the
spot where we had left old Carey stationed as a
sentinel
at the door of the devoted quadruped's home.
At this moment, as if through the influence of a
spell, every dog was suddenly hushed into profound
silence.
They have lost their way, said Ned, or else
the animal has taken to the brook and confounded
the dogs. Is it not possible, Carey, that he has been
driven into a tree nearer home?
Never mind! replied Carey, that '
possom's
down here in some of these bushes watching us.
Bless you! if the dogs had treed him you would hear
them almost crazy with howling. These '
possoms
never stay to take a chase, because they are the
sorriest
things in life to get along on level ground;they
sort of hobble; and that's the reason they always
take off,as soon as they see a body,to their own
homes. You trust big Ben; he knows what he's
about.
The chase, in an instant, opened afresh; and it
was manifest that the pursuers were making rapidly
for the spot on which we stood. Carey begged us to
get back to our former concealment; but the request
was vain. The excitement kept us on foot, and it
was with difficulty we could be restrained from
rushing forward to meet the advancing pack.
Instead
,
however, of coming down to the gum tree, the
dogs suddenly took a turn and sped, with urgent
rapidity, in a contrary direction, rending the air with
a clamour that far exceeded any thing we had yet
heard. We have lost our chance! cried Harvey.
Here have we been shivering in the cold for an
hour to no purpose. What devil tempted us to leave
Ben? Shall we follow?
Pshaw, master Harvey! exclaimed the old
negro
,don't
you know better than that? It's only
some
varmint
the dogs have got up in the woods.
When you hear such a desperate barking, and such
hard running as that, you may depend the dogs have
hit upon a gray-fox, or something of that sort, that
can give them a run. No '
possom
there! Big Ben
isn't a going to let Csar sarve him that fashion!
Ben's voice was heard, at this period, calling back
the dogs and reproving them for going astray; and,
having succeeded in a few minutes, in bringing them
upon their former scent, the whole troop were heard
breaking through the undergrowth, in a direction
leading
immediately to the tree.
Didn't I tell you so, young masters! exclaimed
Carey.
There he is! there he is! shouted Ned. Look
out Carey! Guard the hole! He has passed. Well
done, old fellow! I think we have him now.
This quick outcry was occasioned by the actual
apparition of the opossum, almost at the old man's
feet. The little animal had been lying close at hand;
and, alarmed at the din of the approaching war, had
made an effort to secure his retreat. He came
creeping
slily towards the tree; but, finding his passage
intercepted, had glided noiselessly by, and, in a
moment
,
the moving and misty object, that we had
obscurely
discerned speeding with an awkward
motion
through the grass, was lost to view. A few
seconds
only elapsed, and the dogs swept past us with
the fleetness of the wind. They did not run many
paces before they halted at the root of a large
chestnut
that threw its aged and ponderous branches
over an extensive surface, and whose distant
extremities
almost drooped back to the earth. Here they
assembled, an eager and obstreperous pack,
bounding
wildly from place to place, and looking up and
15 *
howling, with that expressive gesture that may be
seen in this race of animals when they are said to be
baying the moon.
This troop of dogs presented a motley
assortment
.
There were two conspicuous for their size
and apparently leaders of the company,a
mixture
of bound and mastiffthat poured out their
long, deep and bugle-like tones, with a fulness that
was echoed back from the farther shore of theriver,
and which rang through the forest with a strength
that must have awakened the sleepers at the
mansion
we had left. Several other dogs of inferior
proportions
,
even down to the cross and peevish terrier
of the kitchen, yelped, with every variety of note,
sharp, quick and piercing to the ear. This collection
was gathered from the negro families of the
plantation
;
and they were all familiar with the discipline of
the wild and disorderly game in which they were
engaged
.
A distinguished actor in this scene was our
old friend Wilful, who, true to all his master's pranks,
appeared in the crowd with officious
self-importance
,
bounding violently above the rest, barking with
an unnecessary zeal, and demeaning himself, in all
respects, like a gentlemanly, conceited, pragmatical
and good-natured spaniel. This canine rabble
surrounded
the tree, and, with vain efforts, attempted to
scale the trunk, or started towards the outer
circumference
,
and jumped upwards, with an earnestness
that showed that their sharp sight had detected their
fugitive aloft.
In this scene of clamour and spirited assault Ben
and our old groom were the very masters of the
storm. They were to be seen every where
exhorting
,
cheering and commanding their howling
subordinates
,
and filling up the din with their no less
persevering
and unmeasured screams.
Speak to him Csar! shouted Carey in a
prolonged
and hoarse toneSpeak to him, old fellow!
That's a beauty!
Howl, Boson! roared Ben, to another of the
dogs. Whoop! Whoop! let him have it!sing
out!keep it up, Flower!
Wilful! you rascal, cried Ned. Mannerly,
keep quiet; would you jump out of your skin, old
dog?quiet, until you can do some good.
A rustling noise was heard in some of the higher
branches of the tree, and we became advised that
our besieged enemy was betaking himself to the
most probable place of safety. The moon, in her
last quarter, was seen at this moment, just peering
above the screen of forest that skirted the eastern
horizon; and a dim ray was beginning to relieve
the darkness of the night. This aid came
opportunely
for our purpose, as it brought the top of the
chestnut in distinct relief upon the faintly illuminated
sky. The motion of the upper leaves betrayed to
Ben the position of the prey; and, in an instant, he
swung himself up to the first bough, and proceeded
urgently upward. I see the
varmint
here in the
crotch of one of the tip-top branches! he exclaimed
to us, as he hurried onward. Look out below!
The terrified animal, on finding his pursuer about
to invade his place of safety, speedily abandoned it;
and we could distinctly hear him making his way to
the remote extremity of the limb. As soon as he had
gained this point he became visible to us all,
clinging
like an excrescence that had grown to the
slender
twigs that sustained him. Ben followed as near
as he durst venture with his heavy bulk, and began
to whip the bough up and down, with a vehement
motion that flung the animal about through the air,
like a ball on the end of a supple rod. Still,
however
,
the way-laid freebooter kept his hold with a
desperate tenacity.
During this operation the dogs, as if engrossed
with the contemplation of the success of the
experiment
,
had ceased their din; and, at intervals only,
whined with impatience.
He can never stand that, said Harvey, as if
involuntarily speaking his thoughts. Look out! he
is falling. No, he has saved himself again!
Instead of coming to the ground, the dexterous
animal, when forced at last to abandon the limb,
only
dropped to a lower elevation, where he caught
himself again amongst the foliage, in a position
apparently
more secure than the first. The dogs
sprang forward, as if expecting to receive him on the
earth; and, with the motion, uttered one loud and
simultaneous
cry:Their disappointment was evinced
in an eager and impressive silence. The negroes
set up a shout of laughter; and one of them
ejaculated
,
with an uncontrolled merriment,
'Not going to get possum from top of tree at one
jump, I know. He come down stairs presently.
Terrible
varmint
for grabbing!his tail as good as his
hand,Oh, oh!
Ben now called out to know how far he had
dropped; and being informed, was immediately
busy in the endeavour to reach the quarter indicated.
A repetition of the same stratagem, that had been
employed above, produced the same result; and the
badgered outlaw descended still lower, making good
his lodgement with a grasp instinctively unerring,
but now rendered more sure by the frightful death
that threatened him below. This brought him
within
fifteen feet of the jaws of his ruthless enemies.
The frantic howl, screech, and halloo that burst
from dog, man, and boy, when the object of their
pursuit thus became distinctly visible, and their
continued
reduplicationsbreaking upon the air with a
wild, romantic furywere echoed through the lonely
forest at this unwonted hour, like some diabolical
incantation
,
or mystic rite of fantastic import, as they
have been sometimes fancied in the world of fiction,
to picture the orgies of a grotesque superstition.
The whole pack of dogs was concentrated upon one
spot; with heads erect and open mouths, awaiting
the inevitable descent of their victim into the midst
of their array.
Ben, indefatigable in his aim, had already arrived
at the junction of the main branch of the tree with
the trunk; and there united in the general uproar.
Hazard now interposed and commanded silence;
and then directed the people to secure the dogs, as
his object was to take the game alive. This order
was obeyed, but not without great difficulty; and,
after a short delay, every dog was fast in hand. We
took time, at this juncture, to pause. At Ned's
suggestion
,
Wilful was lifted up by one of the negroes,
with the assistance of Ben, to the first bough, which
being stout enough to give the dog, practised in such
exploits, a foothold, though not the most secure, he
was here encouraged, at this perilous elevation, to
renew the assault. Wilful crept warily upon his
breast, squatting close to the limb, until he reached
that point where it began to arch downward, and
from whence it was no longer possible for him to
creep farther. During this endeavour he remained
mute, as if devoting all his attention to the safe
accomplishment
of his purpose; but as soon as he
gained
the point above mentioned, he recommenced
barking
with unwearied earnestness. The opossum
began
now to prepare himself for his last desperate
effort
.
An active enemy in his rear had cut off his
retreat, and his further advance was impossible,
without
plunging into the grasp of his assailants. As if
unwilling to meet the irrevocable doom, and anxious
to linger out the brief remnant of his minutes, even in
agony,showing how acceptable is life in its most
wretched category,the devoted quadruped still
refused
the horrid leap; but, releasing his fore feet,
swung downwards from the bough, holding fast by
his hind legs and tail,the latter being endued with
a strong contractile power and ordinarily used in this
action. Here he exhibited the first signs of
pugnacity
;
and now snapped and snarled towards the
crowd below, showing his long array of sharp teeth,
with a fierceness that contrasted singularly with the
cowering timidity of his previous behaviour. In one
instant more Wilful, as if no longer able to restrain
his impatience, or, perhaps, desirous to signalize
himself
by a feat of bravery, made one spring forward
into the midst of the foliage that hung around his
prey, and came to the ground, bringing with him the
baffled subject of all this eager pursuit.
Ned seized Wilful in the same moment that he
reached the earth; and thus prevented him from
inflicting
a wound upon his captive. The opossum,
instead of assaying a fruitless effort to escape, lay
upon the turf, to all appearance, dead. One or two
of those who stood around struck him with their feet;
but, faithful to the wonderful instinct of his nature,
he gave no signs of animation; and when Hazard
picked him up by the tail, and held him suspended
at arm's length with the dogs baying around him, the
counterfeit of death was still preserved.
More with a view to exhibit the peculiarities of the
animal than to prolong the sport, Hazard flung him
upon the ground and directed us to observe his
motions
.
For a few moments he lay as quiet as if his
last work had been done; and then slowly and
warily
turning his head round, as if to watch his captors,
he began to creep, at a snail's pace, in a direction of
safety; but, no sooner was pursuit threatened, or a
cry raised, than he fell back into the same supine and
deceitful resemblance of a lifeless body.
He was at length taken up by Ben, who causing
him to grasp a short stick with the end of his tail,
(according to a common instinct of this animal)
threw him over his shoulders, and prepared to return
homeward.
It was now near three o'clock; and we speedily
betook ourselves to the mansion, fatigued with the
exploits of the night.
After all, said Harvey Riggs, as he lit a candle
in the hall, preparatory to a retreat to his chamber,
we have had a great deal of toil to very little
purpose
.
It is a savage pleasure to torture a little
animal
with such an array of terrors, merely because he
makes his livelihood by hunting. God help us, Ned,
if we were to be punished for such pranks!
To tell the truth, replied Ned, I had some
such misgivings myself to-night, and that's the reason
I determined to take our captive alive. To-morrow
I shall have him set at liberty again; and I think it
probable he will profit by the lesson he has had, to
avoid molesting the poultry-yard!
CHAPTER XIV.
ONE ACT OF A FARCE.
The
next morning we fell into a consultation, or
rather resolved ourselves into a committee of the
whole, on the subject of Ned's affairs; and the
result
of our deliberation was, that we should forthwith
proceed to the Brakes, and there renew our
operations
as circumstances might favour.
Hazard, it will be remembered, had determined to
assume a more sapient bearing in his intercourse
with Bel, and to dazzle her with a display of
learning
and sentiment. I will come up, Mark, said
he, as near as possible to that model of precision
and grace, the ineffable Swansdown,whom Bel
thinks one of the lights of the age.
Ned, accordingly, withdrew to make his toilet;
and, in due time, reappeared, decked out in a new
suite of clothes, adjusted with a certain air of fashion
that he knew very well how to put on. His cravat,
especially, was worthy of observation, as it was
composed
with that elaborate and ingenious skill which,
more than the regulation of any other part of the
apparel
,
denotes a familiarity with the usages of the
world of dandyism.
I fancy this will do, said he, eyeing his person,
and turning himself round so as to invite our
inspection
.
VOL. II. 16
I think I have seized upon that secret grace
that fascinates the imagination of female beholders.
We agreed that nothing could be better.
I flatter myself, he continued, pleased with the
conceit, that I shall amaze her to-day. But
remember
,
you are not to laugh, nor make any remarks
upon my conversion. I mean to conduct this thing
with a sort of every day ease.
You may trust us, said Harvey, if you are
careful not to overdo your own play. Don't be too
preposterous.
Here ended all that is necessary to be told of the
preliminaries to our visit, and we now shift the scene
to the moment when our triumvirate arrived at the
Brakes, somewhere about eleven o'clock.
We found the ladies preparing to take a morning
ride. Their horses were at the door, and Ralph was
ready to escort them. Our coming was hailed with
pleasure; and we were immediately enlisted in their
service. I thought I could perceive some expression
of wonder in Bel's face when her eye fell upon
Hazard; and indeed his appearance could
scarcely
escape remark from any one intimately
acquainted
with him. His demeanor corresponded to
his dress. Instead of the light, careless, cavalier
manner in which he was wont to address the family
at the Brakes, there was an unsmiling sobriety in his
accost, and a rather awkward gravity. Bel imputed
this to the coldness she had shown at their former
interview; and, annoyed by the reflection that she
had unjustly dealt with him, she was now almost as
awkward as himself in framing her deportment in
such wise as might convey her regret for what had
passed, without absolutely expressing it in language.
This desire on her part favoured our design, and
we had therefore little difficulty, when we came to
mount our horses, to despatch Bel and Hazard in
the van of the party. I immediately took Catharine
under my convoy; and Harvey and Ralph brought
up the rear.
For the first fifteen minutes our conversation was
all common-place; and Ned frequently looked round
with a droll expression of faint-heartedness. We
had chosen a road that wound through the shade of
a thick wood, and our horses' feet fell silently upon
the sand. In a short time we arrived at a piece of
scenery of very peculiar features. It was an
immense
forest of pine, of which the trees, towering to
the height of perhaps a hundred feet or more, grew
in thick array, shooting up their long and sturdy
trunks to nearly their full elevation without a
limb, resembling huge columns of a slaty hue, and
uniting their clustered tops in a thick and dark
canopy
.
No other vegetation diversified the view; even
the soil below exhibited the naked sand, or was
sparsely covered with a damp moss, which was seen
through the russet vail formed by the fallen and
withered
foliage of the wood. This forest extended in
every direction as far as the eye could pierce its
depths,an image of desolate sterility; and the deep
and quiet shade which hung over the landscape cast
upon it a melancholy obscurity. Where the road
penetrated this mass the trees had been cut away in
regular lines, so as to leave, on either side, a
perpendicular
wall of mathematical precision, made up of
vast pillars that furnished a resemblance to a
lengthened
aisle in some enormous cathedral.
When we entered into this pass, Bel, with her
hair-brained cavalier, was still in advance; and the
rest of us were riding immediately after them in
one platoon. Ned was evidently daunted, and by
no means played off the bold game he had
threatened
;
but an opportunity now arrived, and as if taking
courage from the occasion, he launched out in a
style that took us by surprise.
Bel had remarked to him the uncommon
character
of the scene, and said that, from its novelty, it
had always been a favourite spot. This place is
familiar to you, she added.
I know each lane, said he, quoting from
Milton
,
with an emphatic earnestness
And every alley green,
Dingle and bushy dell, in this wild wood.
And every bosky bourne, said Harvey, from
the rear, drawling it out, like a school-boy reciting
verses.
From side to side,
My daily walks and ancient neighbourhood.
Hold your profane tongue, Harvey! It is not
fit for such as you to mar the thoughts of the divine
bard by uttering them with your jesting lips.
Bel stared at Ned and then smiled.
Riggs, continued Hazard, is the most
inveterate
jester I ever knew. He spreads the
contagion
into all societies. For my part, I think there
are scenes in nature, as there are passages in life,
which ought to repress merriment in the most
thoughtless minds; and this is one of them. Such
a spot as this kindles up a sort of absorbing,
superstitious
emotion in me that makes me grave.
I observe that you are grave, remarked Bel.
Since I left college, said Ned, and
particularly
since my last return to Swallow Barn, I have
devoted
a great deal of my time to the study of those
sources of poetical thought and association which
lurk amongst the foundations of society.
Hear that! whispered Harvey to me.
I venerate, proceeded Ned, old usages;
popular
errors have a charm for my imagination, and I
do not like to see them rubbed out. `The
superstitious
,
idleheaded eld,' as the poet calls it, has a volume
of delightful lore that I study with rapture. And
although
,
I dare say, you have never observed my
secret devotion to such pursuits.
No indeed! I never suspected you of it,
interrupted
Bel.
I have taken great pains to preserve the race of
sprites and witches from the ruin that threatens them.
The poetry of this local mythology, Bel, is always
rich, and renders the people who possess it not only
more picturesque, but more national, and, in many
respects, more moral.
I am delighted to hear you say so, said Bel,
innocently, for I have precisely the same opinion.
Indeed! exclaimed Ned. I did not know there
was another human being in Virginia that would
venture to acknowledge this.
16 *
Nor I neither, whispered Harvey again; we
shall hear more anon.
This belief, continued Ned, is, to the
ignorant
,
a tangible religion which takes hold of the
vulgar
imagination with a salutary terror; while to
cultivated
minds it furnishes treasures of classical
beauty
.
The ancients
Heaven preserve us! said Harvey, still in a low
voice; now for something in the style of parson
Chub.
Ned turned round and smiled. The ancients,
BelI see Harvey does not believe mebut the
ancients
stocked such a place as this with tutelar
deities
:
they had their nymphs of the wood and grove,
of the plain, of the hill, the valley, the fountain, the
river, and the ocean. I think they numbered as
many
as three thousand. I can hardly tell you their
different denominations; but there were Oreads and
Dryads and Hamadryads, Nape, Nereids, Naiads,
andthe devil knows what all!
That was a slip, said Harvey, aside; one
more and he is a lost man.
Bel opened her eyes with amazement at this
volley
of learning, as if utterly at a loss to understand
its meaning.
Our English ancestors, proceeded Ned, in
the most palmy age of their poetry, had their goblin
and elf and ouphe, `swart fairy of the mine,' `blue
meagre hag,' and `stubborn unlaid ghost,'to say
nothing of witch and devil. Our times, more
philosophic
,
have sadly dispeopled these pleasure-grounds
of romance.
Indeed have they! cried Bel, who was listening
in wondering attention.
You see it every where, added Ned; they are
gradually driving away even the few harmless
wanderers
that, for a century past, inhabited such spots
as this; and in a short time we shall not have the
groundwork for a single story worth reading.
Ned calls that sentiment, said Harvey. It
looks amazingly like a schoolmaster's lecture.
This remark, although intended only for us in the
rear, was overheard by both Ned and Bel; upon
which Ned reined up his horse, so as to face us,
and burst out a-laughing.
I'll thank you, Harvey Riggs, said he, when
I am engaged in a confidential discourse, to keep
your proper distance: I do not choose to have such
an impenetrable, hardened outlaw to all the
fascinations
of romance and poetry, within hearing.
Indeed, upon my word, cousin Harvey! said
Bel, Mr. Hazard has been contributing very much
to my edification.
We had now passed the confines of the pine forest,
and were following a road that led by a circuit
round to the Brakes, so as to approach the house
from the quarter opposite to that by which we had
left it. By this track it was not long before we
concluded
our ride and found ourselves assembled in
the parlour.
How did I acquit myself? inquired Ned of
Harvey and myself, when we were left alone.
You have utterly astounded us both, replied
Harvey; and, what is better, Bel is quite
enchanted
.
Where, in the name of balderdash! did you
get all that nonsense?
Gad, I once wrote an essay on popular
superstitions
!
answered Ned, and had it all at my
finger-ends. So, I thought I would take the chance
of the pine forest to give it to Bel.
It had a very prosy air, said Harvey.
However
,
you are on the right track.
During the day Ned made a great many efforts
at sentiment, but they generally ended either in
unmeaning
words or dull discourses, which came from
him with a gravity and an earnestness that attracted
universal remark; and by nightfall, it was admitted
by the ladies, that Hazard had a good deal of
information
on topics to which he was hitherto deemed a
total stranger, but that he had certainly lost some of
his vivacity. Catharine said, she was sure
something
unpleasant had occurred to him: his manners
were strange;she should not be surprised if he had
some affair of honour on hand,for, he evidently
talked like a man who wanted to conceal his
emotions
.
It was just the way with gentlemen who
were going to fight a duel.
Bel was also perplexed. She could not account
for it, except by supposing that he was more deeply
wounded by her conduct than he chose to confess.
It made her unhappy. In short, Ned's substitution
of a new character began already to make him dull,
and to disturb the rest of the company.
When we announced our intention to return to
Swallow Barn after tea, old Mr. Tracy interposed
to prevent it. He said he had set his heart upon a
hand at whist, and that we must remain for his
gratification
.
Our return was accordingly postponed;
and when, at ten o'clock, the old gentleman retired
to rest, we were challenged by Harvey to a game
at brag. The consequence was, that, all
unconscious
of the flight of the hours, we were found in
our seats when the servants came in the morning
and threw open the shutters, letting in the daylight
upon a group of sallow, bilious and night-worn faces,
that were discovered brooding over a disorderly
table
,
in the light of two candles that were flaring in
their sockets and expending their substance, in
overflowing
currents, upon the board.
Alarmed by this disclosure, we broke up the
sitting
,
and were shown by Ralph to our unseasonable
beds.
CHAPTER XV.
THE FATE OF A HERO.
Whether
it was that Hazard was anxious to
conceal from the family his last night's frolic; or that
his thoughts were engrossed with the approaching
crisis in his affairs; or, perchance, that he was
nervous
from overwatching during the two previous
nights, and unable to sleep, he rose early, and met
the family at their usual breakfast time. Neither
Harvey, Ralph, nor myself, suffered under the same
difficulties, and, therefore, it was fully ten o'clock
before we were seen in the parlour.
Ned's mien was truly sad. He had a haggard
look, a stagnated, morbid complexion, and
blood-shot
eyes. His dress, which the day before had been
adjusted with such an unwonted precision, afforded
now an expressive testimony of the delinquent
irregularity
of its wearer. Nothing more infallibly
indicates
the long nocturnal revel than the disordered
plight of the dress the next morning: a certain rakish
air is sure to linger about its deepened folds, and
betray
the departure from the sober usages of life.
Hazard's manners corresponded with this
unhappy
exterior. A certain lassitude attended his
movements
,
and a pitiful dejection sat upon his visage. If
he had been master of his own actions, he would
never have risked the perilous fortunes of the day in
his present shattered condition; but a spell was upon
him, and it seemed as if fate had decreed him to
abide the chance. He was moody; and conversed
with the ladies with a bearing that implied an
abstracted
mind and an alarmed conscience.
Sometimes
,
it is true, he raised his spirits to a forced gaiety,
but it was manifest, in spite of this, that he was
disquieted
,
pensive, and even melancholy. What
added
to the singularity of these phenomena was, that
while Catharine and Bel were yet in the parlour, he
got up abruptly, and wandered out upon the lawn,
and then took a solitary ramble towards the river,
where he was observed, from the windows, walking
to and fro, absorbed in contemplation.
None of these symptoms of a perturbed
imagination
escaped Bel. She was exceedingly puzzled, and
revolved in her mind all that had lately passed, to
ascertain the cause. At length,as it usually
happens
with women in such cases,when she found
herself unable to penetrate the mystery, her heart
began to attune itself to pity. She grew to be quite
distressed. Harvey read the workings of her thoughts
in her face, and took an opportunity to draw her into
a private conference.
My dear Bel, you see how it is, said he,
shaking
his head mournfully. Poor fellow! I did'nt
expect to see it come to such an extremity as this.
In the name of wonder, cousin! I pray you, what
is it? demanded Bel.You alarm me.
Ah! returned Harvey, turning up his eyes, and
laying his hand upon his breastIt cannot be
concealed
.
These are the very doleful doings of the
little
Archer. The young gentleman is cruelly
transfixed
;he
is spitted with the bolt, and is ready to be
geared to a smoke-jack, and turned round and round
before the fire that consumes him like a roasting
woodcock.
Let us have a truce to jesting, said Bel.And
tell me, Harvey,for indeed I cannot guess it,
what ails Mr. Hazard?
You would never believe me, replied Harvey,
although I have told you a hundred times, that Ned
was a man of deep and secret emotions. Now, you
must perceive it;for the fact is becoming too plain
to be mistaken. I consider it a misfortune for any
man who wishes to stand well with a woman, to
have been educated in habits of close intimacy with
her. She is certain, in that case, to be the last
person
to do justice to his merits.
It would be vanity in me, cousin, said Bel, to
persuade myself that Edward Hazard was so much
interested in my regard as to grow ill on that
account
.
What have his merits to do with any
supposed
attachment to me?
He desires to be thought a liege man to his lady,
Bel! answered Harvey. To tell you the truth,
Ned's as full of romance as you are; and I have
been looking to see some extravagance that would
defy all calculation: some freak that would not fail
to convince even
you
that the man was on the verge
of madness. And now, here it is! he has gone through
five degrees of love.
Five degrees! Pray, what are they?
The first is the
mannerly
degree: it is taken
at that interesting epoch when a man first
begins
to discover that a lady has an air, a voice, and a
person more agreeable than others; he grows civil
upon this discovery; and if he has any wit in him it
is sure to appear. The next is the
poetical
degree;
it was in this stage that we surprised Ned upon the
bank of the river, when he was singing out your name
so musically, for the entertainment of Mark Littleton.
The third is the
quixotic
love, and carries a
gentleman
in pursuit of stray hawks, and sets him to
breaking
the heads of saucy bullies. The fourth is the
sentimental;
when out comes all his learning, and
he fills his mistress's head with unimaginable
conceits
.
Then comes the
horrible:
you may know this,
Bel, by a yellow cheek, a wild eye, a long beard,
an unbrushed coat, and a most lamentable,
woebegone
,
lackadaisical style of conversation. This
sometimes turns into the
furious;
and then, I would
not answer for the consequences! It strikes me that
Ned looks a little savage this morning.
Cousin, that is all very well said, interrupted
Bel. But, I see none of your degrees in Edward
Hazard.
Why, he has not slept a wink for two nights
past, said Harvey.
And pray, what prevented him from sleeping?
Thinking of you, Bel! You have been buzzing
about in his brain, like a bee in his night-cap. And
it stands to reason! neither man nor beast can do
without sleep. If he were a rhinoceros he must
eventually
sink under such privations. There he was,
VOL. II. 17
the livelong night, stalking about like a spectre on
the banks of Acheron!
And you, Harvey, added Bel, laughing, were
one of the principal imps that stalked by his side.
You are not aware that I have been made
acquainted
with your vagaries. I happen to know that you
were engaged in the refined and elegant amusement
of hunting an opossum all night, with a band of
negroes
.
Who was so indiscreet as to tell you that?
asked
Harvey. I am sure the story has been marred
in the telling; and, therefore, I will relate to you the
plain truth. Ned was uneasy in mind, and could
not close his eyes; so, like the prince in the
storybook
,
he summoned his followers to attend him to the
chase, in the vain hope that he should find some
relief
from the thoughts that rankled
Irreclaimable cousin Harvey!
Fact, I assure you! Nothing takes off the load
from the mind like an opossum hunt.
And then, last night, resumed Bel, you were up
playing cards until daylight. That was to chase
away sorrow too, I suppose?
Ned could not sleep last night neither, said
Harvey. But Bel, don't say until
daylight
. We
broke up at a very reasonable hour.
I have heard all about it, answered Bel.
I admit, returned Harvey, that appearances
are a little against us: but, they are only
appearances
.
If you had seen how Ned played, you would
have been satisfied that the game had no charms for
him; for he sighed,swore, and flung away his
money
like a fool. I suppose he must have lost, at least,
a hundred dollars.
And with it, his good looks and peace of mind
besides, added Bel. Gaming, fighting and
drinking
!
Ah, me!
All for love, Bel! all for love! It is the most
transmographying
passion! exclaimed Harvey.
Things the most opposite in nature come out of it.
Now, tell me honestly,have you not seen a change
in Ned that surprises you?
Indeed I have, answered Bel.
What do you impute it to?
I am sure I do not know.
Then, to be done with this levity, said Harvey,
it is what I have said. Ned is awkward in his zeal
to serve you; but he is the truest of men. He gets
into all manner of difficulties on your account, and
suffers your displeasure like a martyr. He talks of
you, even in his sleep; and grows tiresome to his
friends with the eternal repetition of your praises. It
is a theme which, if you do not put an end to it, will
grow to be as hackneyed as a piece of stale politics.
If you could make it consistent, Bel, with your other
arrangements, I do really think it your duty to put the
youth out of misery: for, he never will be fit
company
for any rational man until this infection is
cured.
You would not have me marry a man I do not
love, said Bel, gravely.
No, indeed, my dear Bel, returned Harvey.
But I have been all along supposing you did love
him.
You know my objections, said Bel.
I think they were all removed yesterday,
answered
Harvey.
If they were, they have come back again
today
.
That shows, said Harvey, what a ticklish
thing is this love. May the saints shield me from all
such disasters as falling in love!
Your prayer has been granted before it was
asked, returned Bel, smiling.
Here ensued a pause, during which the lady
stood for some moments wrapt in thought, with her
foot rapidly beating against the floor.
I do not think, she said at last, at least, I am
not altogether certain, cousin, that I love him well
enough to
Faith, Bel, I think you come pretty near to it,
whispered Harvey; the longer you ponder over
such a doubt, the clearer it will appear.Drum it
out with your foot; that is the true device:Love is
very much a matter of the nerves after all.
I will talk no more! exclaimed Bel, with a
lively emotion.
With these words, she retreated into the
drawing-room
,
and sat down to the piano, where she played
and sung as if to drown her thoughts.
During all this while, the unconscious subject of
this colloquy was pursuing his secret meditations. It
is meet that I should tell my reader what was the
real cause of the cloud that sat upon his brow. In
truth, he was endeavouring to screw his courage up
to a deed of startling import. It was his fixed
resolve
,
when he crept to his bed at the dawn, to bring
matters, that very day, to some conclusion with his
mistress; and this fancy took such complete
possession
of his faculties, that he found it vain to attempt
repose. His fortitude began to waver as the hour of
meeting Bel drew nigh, and every moment shook the
steadiness of his nerves. He cast a glance at the
reflection of his forlorn figure in the glass, and his
heart grew sick within him. As if ashamed of the
tremor that invaded his frame, he swore a round oath
to himselfthat come what would, he would fulfil his
purpose. It was in this state of feeling that he
appeared
at breakfast. Every instant the enterprise grew
more terrible to his imagination; until it was, at last,
arrayed before his thoughts as something awful. It
is a strange thing that so simple a matter should
work such effects; and stranger still, that,
notwithstanding
the painful sensations it excites, there
should lurk at the bottom of the heart a certain
remainder
of pleasant emotion, that is sufficient to
flavour the whole. Ned experienced this; and
inwardly
fortified his resolution by frequent appeals to
his manhood. In such a state of suspense it was not
to be expected that he should be much at ease in
conversation. On the contrary, he spoke like a
frightened man, and accompanied almost every thing
he said with a muscular effort at deglutition, which
is one of the ordinary physical symptoms of fear.
His walk by the river side was designed to
reassemble
his scattered forces; an undertaking that he
found impossible in the face of the enemy: They
were a set of militia-spirits that could not be brought
17 *
to rally on the field of battle. Having argued
himself
into a braver temper, he returned from his
wanderings
and stalked into the drawing-room, with an
ill-counterfeited composure. By a natural instinct,
he marched up behind Bel's chair, and for some
moments
seemed to be absorbed with the music.
After
a brief delay, during which the colour had flown
from his cheek, he crossed the room to the window,
and, with his hands in his pockets, gazed out upon
the landscape. Restless, uncertain and perplexed,
he returned again to the chair, and cast a suspicious
and rueful glance around him.
Harvey observing how matters stood, silently
tripped
out of the room.
Bel executed a lively air, and concluded it with a
brisk pounding upon the keys; and then sprang up,
as if about to retreat.
Play on, said Ned, with a husky voice; don't
think of stopping yet. I delight in these little
melodies
.
You cannot imagine, Bel, how music
exhilarates
me.
I didn't know that you were in the room,
returned
Bel. What shall I play for you?
You can hardly go amiss. Give me one of those
lively strains that make the heart dance, said he,
with a dolorous accent. But you have some
exquisite
ballads too; and I think you throw so much
soul into them that they are irresistible. I will have
a ballad.
Whilst he was wavering in his choice she struck
up a waltz. Ned, during this performance,
sauntered
to the farther end of the drawing-room; and,
having planted himself opposite a picture that hung
against the wall, stood minutely surveying it, with
his lips, at the same time, gathered up to an
inarticulate
and thoughtful whistle. The cessation of the
music recalled him to the piano with a start; and
he hastened to say to Bel,that there was something
unspeakably pathetic in these simple and natural
expressions of sentiment; that it belonged to the
ballad to strike more directly upon the heart than
any other kind of song; and that, for his part, he
never
listened to one of those expressive little
compositions
without an emotion almost amounting to
melancholy
.
What is he talking about?thought Bel. She
paused in profound astonishment: and then asked
him, if he knew what it was she had been playing?
The tune is familiar to me, stammered Ned.
But, I have a wretched memory for names.
You have heard it a thousand times, said she.
It is the waltz in the Freyschutz.
Oh, true! exclaimed Ned. It is a pensive
thing; it has several touching turns in it. Most
waltzes have something of that in them. Don't
you think so?
Most waltzes, replied Bel, laughing, have a
great many turns in them: but, as to the
pensiveness
of the music, I never observed that.
Indeed! exclaimed Ned, confounded past all
hope of relief; It depends very much upon the
frame of mind you are in. There are moodsand
they come on me sometimes like shadowswhich
predispose the heart to extract plaintive thoughts
from the liveliest strains.If there be one desponding
cord in the strings of the soul,that one will begin
to vibratewith a single sympathetic notethat
may be hurried across it in the rush of the gayest
melody.I mean,that there is something in all
music that arouses mournful emotions,when the
mind is predisposed tomelancholy.
As a man who takes his seat in a
surgeon-dentist's
chair, to have his teeth filed, having made up
his mind to endure the operation, bears the first
application
of the tool with composure, but, feeling a
sense of uneasiness creeping upon him with every
new passage of the file across the bone, is hurried
on rapidly to higher degrees of pain, with every
succeeding
jar; until, at last, it seems to him as if his
powers of sufferance could be wound up to no higher
pitch, and he, therefore, meditates an abrupt leap
from the hands of the operator,so did Ned find
himself
,
as he plunged successively from one stage to
the other of the above-recited, exquisite piece of
nonsense
.
When he had finished, his face (to use the phrase
of a novel writer) `was bathed in blushes;' and Bel
had turned her chair half round, so as to enable her
to catch the expression of his countenance; for, she
began to feel some misgiving as to the soundness of
his intellect.
Of all the ordinary vexations of life it is certainly
the most distressing, for a man of sense to catch
himself
unseasonably talking like a fool, upon any
momentous
occasion wherein he should especially
desire
to raise an opinion of his wisdom; such as in
the case of a member of congress making his first
speech, or of an old lawyer before a strange tribunal,
or, worse than all, of a trembling lover before a
super-fastidious
mistress. The big drops of perspiration
gathered on Ned's brow: he felt like a thief taken in
the mainour: he was caught in the degree of
back
berinde and bloody hand
, known to the Saxon Forest
laws, with his folly on his back. He could have
jumped out of the window; but, as it was, he only
ordered a servant to bring him a glass of water, and
coughed with a short dry cough, and swallowed the
cool element at a draught.
As motion conduces to restore the equilibrium of
the nerves, Ned now paced up and down the
apartment
,
with stately and measured strides.
Courage! said he, mentally. I'll not be
frightened! So, he made another convulsive motion
of the sophagus,such as I have seen a
mischievous
,
truant boy make, when on his trial before the
pedagogueand marched up directly behind Bel.
All this time she sat silent; and taking the
infection
of fear from her lover, began to cower like a
terrified
partridge.
Miss Tracy, said Ned, after a long pause, with
a feeble, tremulous utterance, accompanied by a
heavy suspiration.
Sir
Miss Tracy,here Ned put his hands upon
the back of Bel's chair, and leaned a little over her;
You,youplay very well,would you favour
me with another song,if you please?
I havn't sung a song for you, replied Bel.
Then, you can do it, if you would try.
No. It would be impossible. I am out of
voice.
So am I, returned Ned, with comic
perturbation
.
It is strange that we should both have lost
our voices at the very time when we wanted them
most.
I am sure I don't see, said Bel, blushing, any
thing extraordinary in my not being able to sing.
Well,I think it very extraordinary, said Ned,
with a dry laugh and an affected, janty air, as he
took a turn into the middle of the room,that the
fountains of speech should be sealed up, when I had
something of the greatest importance in the world to
communicate to you.
What is that? inquired Bel.
That I am the most particularly wretched and
miserable coxcomb in the whole State of Virginia,
said he, rising into a more courageous tone.
Your speech serves to little purpose, muttered
Bel, if it be to utter nothing better than that.
I am a boy,a drivelling fool, continued Ned,
very little like a man who had lost his power of
articulation
I
am vexed with myself, and do not
deserve
to be permitted to approach you.
Bel was covered with confusion; and an
awkward
silence now intervened, during which she
employed
herself in turning over the leaves of a
music-book
.
Do you relent, Bel? said Ned, in a soft and
beseeching
accent. Have you thought better of the
proposition I made you a year ago? Do you think
you could overcome your scruples?
Bel, somewhat startled by these tender tones,
withdrew
her eyes from the music-book, and slowly
turned
her head round to the direction of the voice. There,
to her utter amazement, was her preposterous lover
on one knee, gazing pitifully in her face.
It is necessary that I should stop at this interesting
moment, to explain this singular phenomenon; for,
doubtless, my reader concludes Ned to be the veriest
mountebank of a lover that ever tampered with the
beautiful passion.
It is common to all men, and, indeed, to all
animals
,
when sore perplexed with difficulties, to resort
for protection to the strongest instincts nature has
given them. Now, Ned's predominating instinct
was to retreat behind a jest, whenever he found that
circumstances galled him. For some moments past
he had been brightening up, so that he had almost
got into a laugh,not at all dreaming that such a state
of feeling would be unpropitious to his suit; and when
he arrived at the identical point of his wooing above
described, he was sadly at a loss to know what step
to take next. His instinct came to his aid, and
produced
the comic result I have recorded. It seemed
to strike him with that deep sense of the ridiculous,
that is apt to take possession of a man who seriously
makes love; and the incorrigible wight, therefore,
reckless of consequences, dropped upon his knee,
one-tenth part in jest, and nine-tenths in earnest. It
was well nigh blowing him sky high!
Is this another prank, Mr. Hazard? said Bel.
Am I to be for ever tortured with your untimely
mirth? How,how can you sport with my feelings
in this way! Here she burst into tears; and,
putting
her hand across her eyes, the drops were seen
trickling through her fingers.
Ned suddenly turned as pale as ashes. By all that
is honest in man! he exclaimed,and then ran on
with a list of lover-like abjurations, vowing and
protesting
,
in the most passionate terms,according to
the vulgar phrase, by all that was black and blue,
that he was devoted to his mistress, body and soul.
Never did there rush from an opened flood-gate a
more impetuous torrent than now flowed from his
heart through the channel of his lips. He was
hyperbolically
oratorical; and told her, amongst other
things, that she was the bright luminary that gilded
his happiest dreams.
I have not deserved this from you, said Bel,
whose emotions were too violent to permit her to
hear one word of this vehement declaration. At
such a moment as this, you might have spared me an
unnecessary and cruel jest.
She arose from her seat and was about to retire;
but Ned, springing upon his feet at the same time,
took her by the hand and detained her in the room.
For heaven's sake, Bel! he ejaculated, what
have I done? Why do you speak of a jest?
Never
in my life have my feelings been uttered with
more painful earnestness!
I cannot answer you now, returned Bel, in a
tone of affliction; leave me to myself.
Isabel Tracy! said Ned, dropping her hand, as
he assumed a firm and calm voice, you discard
me now for ever. You fling me back upon the world
the most wretched scapegrace that ever hid himself
in its crowds.
I neither promise nor reject, said Bel, beginning
to tremble at Ned's almost frenzied earnestness. If
I have mistaken your temper or your purpose, you
have yourself to blame. It is not easy to overcome
the impressions which a long intercourse has left upon
my mind. You have seemed to me, heretofore,
indifferent
to the desire to please: You have taught
me to think lightly of myself, by the little value you
appeared to place upon my regard: You have
jested
when you should have been serious, and have
been neglectful when I had a right to expect
attention
:
You have offended my prejudices on those
points that I have been accustomed to consider
indispensable
to the man I should love: You will not
wonder, therefore, that I should misconceive your
conduct. I must have a better knowledge of you,
and of my own feelings, before I can commit myself
by a promise. Pray, permit me to retire.
This was uttered with a sedate and womanly
composure that forbade a reply, and Bel left the
room.
Hazard was thrown, by this scene, into a new
train of sensations. For the first time in his life, he
was brought to comprehend the exact relation he held
to his mistress.He had no further purpose in
remaining
at the Brakes; and he and I, accordingly,
very soon afterwards set out for Swallow Barn.
We discussed fully the events of the morning as
we rode along; and, upon the whole, we considered
this important love-affair to have passed through its
VOL. II. 18
crisis, and to rest upon auspicious grounds. This
conclusion arose upon Ned's mind in a thousand
shapes:
I have got a mountain off my shoulders, said he;
I am unpacked; and feel like a man who has
safely
led a forlorn hope.I would fight fifty Waterloos,
rather than go through such a thing again! Egad! I
can sing and laugh once more. Bel's a woman of
fine sense, Littleton: She is not to be trifled with.
Faith, I stand pretty fairly with her, too! It is
certainly
no refusal: `Faint heart never won fair lady.'
A lover to thrive must come up boldly to the charge.
But, after all, I was considerably fluttered,not to
say most unspeakably alarmed.
These, and many more such fragments of a
boasting
,
doubtful and self-gratulating spirit, burst from him
in succession; and were, now and then,
accompanied
with lively gesticulations on horseback, which
if a stranger could have seen, they would have
persuaded
him that the performer was either an unhappy
mortal on his way to a madhouse, or a happy lover
on the way from his mistress.
CHAPTER XVI.
ORATORY.
As
some adventurous schoolboy, who, having
but lately learned to swim, has gone, upon a fair
summer evening, to the river hard by, to disport
himself
in the cool and limpid wave, so did I first sit
down to write this book: And as that same urchin,
all diffident of his powers, has never risked himself
beyond the reach of some old, stranded hulk, not far
from shore; but now, enchanted by the fragrance of
the season, by the golden and purple-painted clouds,
and by the beauty of the wild-flowers that cluster at
the base of the shady headland on the farther side of
a narrow cove; and incited by the jollity of his
boyhood
,
and seduced by the easy, practick eloquence
of a heedless, good-natured playfellow, he has
thoughtlessly essayed to reach the pleasant
promontory
which he has gained in safety, albeit,
faint-hearted
and out of breath:so have I waywardly
ventured on the tide of Ned's courtship; but, having
reached such a sheltered headland, do, in imitation
of my daunted schoolboy, here break up my voyage;
like him, thinking it safest to get back by trudging
round the pebbly margin of the cove.
In other words, I esteem myself lucky in having
followed Ned's love-affair into a convenient
resting-place
,
where I am willing, at least for the present, to
leave it; and shall indeed be thankful if no future
event, during my sojourn at Swallow Barn, shall
impose
upon me the duty of tracing out to my readers
the sequel of this tortuous and difficult history. For
wisely has it been said, that the current of true love
never did run smooth;to me it seems that its path
is like that of the serpent over the rock: And that
chronicler shall have reason to count himself sadly
tasked, whose lot it may be to follow the lead of a
capricious maiden wheresoever it shall please her
fickleness to decoy her charmed and fretful lover.
Little did I dream, indulgent reader, that when I
came to the Old Dominion to write down the simple
scenes that are acted in a gentleman's hall, I should,
in scarce a month gone by, find myself tangled up in
a web of intricate love-plots that should so overmatch
my slender powers! But I have borne me, as you
have witnessed, like a patient and trusty historian,
through the labyrinth of my story; and now, right
gladly, escape to other matters more german to my
hand.
To say nothing, then, of the manner in which Ned
Hazard bore his present doubtful fortune, nor what
resolves he took in this emergency; nor even
dwelling
upon his frequently repeated visits to the Brakes,
during which, I rejoice to think, nothing especially
worthy of note occurred; I pass over some days, in
order that I may introduce my reader to a new
scene.
Meriwether, one night when we were about to
retire
to rest, suggested to Ned and myself,and the
suggestion was made half in the tone of a request,
implying that he would be pleased if we adopted it,
that we might have an agreeable jaunt if we would
consent to accompany him, the next morning, in his
ride to the Quarter. Now, this Quarter is the name
by which is familiarly known that part of the
plantation
where the principal negro population is
established
.
You, doubtless, Mr. Littleton, said he, take
some interest in agricultural concerns. The process
of our husbandry,slovenly to be sure,may,
nevertheless
,
be worthy of your observation. But I can
add to your amusement by showing you my blooded
colts, which, it is not vanity to affirm, are of the finest
breed in Virginia; and when I say that,it is
equivalent
to telling you that there is nothing better in
the world.
Here Meriwether paused for a moment, with that
thoughtful expression of countenance that indicates
the gathering up of one's ideas; then changing the
tone of his voice to a lower key, he continued,
The improvement of the stock of horses,
notwithstanding
this matter is undervalued in some
portions of our country,I regard as one of the
gravest concerns to which a landed proprietor can
devote his attention. The development of the
animal
perfections of this noble quadruped, by a
judicious
system of breeding, requires both the science
and the talent of an accomplished naturalist. We
gain by it symmetry, strength of muscle, soundness
of wind, ease of action, speed, durability, power of
sustaining fatigue, and fitness for the multiform uses
to which this admirable beast is subservient. What,
18 *
sir, can be more worthy of a portion of the care of a
patriotic citizen? But look, my dear sir, at the
relation
which the horse holds to man. We have no
record in history of an age wherein he has not been
intimately connected with the political and social
prosperity of the most powerful and civilized nations.
He has always assisted to fight our battles, to bear
our burthens, to lighten our fatigues, and to furnish
our subsistence. He has given us bread by tillage
and meat by the chase. He has even lodged in the
same homestead with his master man, frequently
under the same roof: He has been accustomed to
receive
his food from our hands, and to be caressed by
our kindness. We nurse him in sickness, and guard
him in health. He has been, from one age to
another, the companion of the warrior at home, his
trusty friend in travel, and his sure auxiliary and
defence
in battle. What more beautiful than the
sympathy
between them? when the cockles of his
master's
heart rise up at the sound of distant war, he
neighs at the voice of the trumpet, and shakes his
mane in his eagerness to share the glory of the
combat.
Frank had now got to striding backward and
forward
through the room; and, at this last flourish,
came up to the table, where he stood erect; then, in
that attitude, went on.
And yet,however martial his temper,he will
amble gently under the weight of the daintiest dame,
and yield obedience to her tender hand and silken
rein. I have horses in my stable now, that, in the
field upon a chase, will champ their bits, and bound
with an ardour that requires my arm to check;
whilst the same animals, at home here, are as
passive
to Lucretia's command as a lady's pony.
You say so, interrupted my cousin Lucretia,
but, indeed Mr. Meriwether, I do not like to ride
these blooded horses!
Meriwether continued, without heeding the
interruption
.
The horse has a family instinct, and knows
every member of the household: he recognizes his
master's children when they come to his stall, and
is pleased to be fondled by them. Then, see how
faithfully he drudges in the field, and wears away his
life in quiet and indispensable services. I venerate
the steady sobriety of the robust, broad-chested,
massive-limbed
wagon-horse, that toils without repining,
through the summer heats and winter snows. I
contemplate
,
with a peculiar interest, the unremitting
labour of the stage-horse, as he performs his daily
task with unrelaxed speed from one year's end to
another: and,you may smile at it,but I have a
warm side of my heart for the thoughtful and
unobtrusive
back that our little negroes creep along with
to mill. But, above all, where do you find such a
picture of patience, considerateness, discretion, long
suffering, amiable obedience, (here Frank began to
smile,) as in the faithful brute that bears his master,
say a country-doctor, for example, or a deputy sheriff,
or one of your weather-beaten, old, tippling,(at each
of these epithets the orator laughed)gossipping,
night-wandering
Noctua bundus
, said Mr. Chub, who was sitting
all the time at one of the windows.
Right! replied Meriwether, turning towards
the parson and waving his hand,night-wandering
politicians? I say, where is there a finer type of
resignation
,
christian resignation, than in the trusty
horse that bears such a master, through all seasons,
no matter how inclement,fast, without refusing,
and slow, without impatience,for hours together;
and then stands, perhaps, as I have often seen him,
with his rein fastened to a post, or to a fence
corner
,
without food or drink; and, as likely as not,
(for he is subject to all discomforts,) facing a drifting
snow or a pelting hail-storm, for the livelong day; or
through the dreary watches of the night, solitary,
silent
,
unamused, without one note of discontent;
without
one objurgatory winnow to his neglectful master?
And then, at last, when the time arrives when he is
to measure his homeward way, with what a modest
and grateful undertone he expresses his thanks! The
contemplation of these moral virtues in the horse, is
enough to win the esteem of any man for the whole
species. Besides, what is a nation without this
excellent
beast? What machinery or labour-saving
inventions of man could ever compensate him for
the deprivation of this faithful ally?
I do not know how long Meriwether would have
continued this laudatory oration, for he was every
moment growing more eloquent, both in manner and
matter, and, no doubt, would very soon have struck
out into some episodes that would have carried him
along, like a vessel caught up in the trade winds, had
not my cousin Lucretia warned him that it was
growing too late for so promising a discourse; which
having the effect to bring him to a stop, I availed
myself
of the opportunity to say, that I should be highly
gratified with the proposed ride. So did Ned.
Then, said he, remember I ride at sunrise:
Lucretia will give us a cup of coffee before we set
out. Be up, therefore, at the crowing of the cock!
CHAPTER XVII.
STABLE WISDOM.
Almost
with the first appearance of light,
Meriwether
came and knocked at our chamber doors, so
earnestly that the whole household must have been
roused by the noise. Our horses could be heard
pawing the gravel at the front door, impatient of
delay
.
The sun was scarcely above the horizon before
we were all mounted and briskly pursuing our road,
followed by Carey, who seemed on the present
occasion
to be peculiarly charged with professional
importance
.
The season was now advanced into the first week
of August: a time when, in this low country, the
morning air begins to grow sharp, and to require
something more than the ordinary summer clothing.
The dews had grown heavier; and the evaporation
produced that chilling cold which almost indicated
frost. There was, however, no trace of this abroad;
but every blade of grass, and every spray was
thickly
begemmed with dewdrops. The tall and
beautiful
mullen, which suggested one of the forms of the
stately candlebraalmost the first plant that puts
forth in the spring, and amongst the first to wither
was now to be seen marshalled in groups over the
fallows, with its erect and half-dried spire hung round
with that matchless jewelry, which the magic hand
of night scatters over the progeny of earth. The
fantastic spiderwebs hung like fairy tissues over every
bush, and decked with their drapery every bank;
whilst their filaments, strung with watery beads, and
glittering in the level beams of the sun, rendered them
no longer snares for the unwary insects for which
they were spread. Our road through the woods was
occasionally waylaid by an obtrusive pinebranch
that, upon the slightest touch, shook its load of
vapour upon our shoulders, as we stooped beneath it.
The lowing of cows and the bleating of sheep struck
upon our ear from distant folds; and all the glad
birds of summer were twittering over the woodland
and open plain. The rabbit leaped timidly along the
sandy road before us, and squatted upon his seat, as
if loth to wet his coat amongst the low
whortle-berry
and wild-indigo that covered the contiguous
soil.
Emerging from the forest, a gate introduced us to a
broad stubblefield, across whose level surface, at the
distance of a mile, we could discern the uprising of
several thin lines of smoke, that formed a light cloud
which almost rested on the earth; and, under this, a
cluster of huts were dimly visible. Near these, an
extensive farmyard surrounded a capacious barn
together
with some fodder-houses and stacks of grain,
upon which were busily employed a number of
labourers who, we could see, were building up the
pile from a loaded wagon that stood close by.
As we advanced, a range of meadows opened to
our view, and stretched into the dim perspective,
until
the eye could no longer distinguish their boundary.
Over this district, detached herds of horses were
observable
,
whisking their long tails as they grazed
upon
the pasture, or curvetting over the spaces that
separated them from each other.
There! said Meriwether, kindling up at the
sight of this plain, there is the reward I promised
you for your ride. I have nothing better to show you
at Swallow Barn. You see, on yonder meadow,
some of the most unquestioned nobility of Virginia.
Not a hoof strays on that pasture, that is not warmed
by as pure blood as belongs to any potentate in the
world.
Carey rode up to us, at this speech, to observe, as
I supposed, the effect which his master's
communication
might have upon me; for he put on a
delighted
grin, and said somewhat officiously
I call them my children, master Littleton.
Truly then, Carey, you have a large family,
said I.
They are almost all on 'em, sir, replied Carey,
straight down from old Diomed, that old master
Hoomes had
fotch
out from England, across the
water
more than twenty years ago. Sir Archy, master
Littleton, was a son of old Diomed, and I can't tell
you how many of his colts I've got. But, sir, you
may depend upon it, he was a great horse! And
thar
was Duroc, master! You've hearn on him?I've got
a heap of colts of Duroc's.Bless your heart! he was
another of old Diomed's.
Carey is a true herald, said Meriwether.
Nearly all that you see have sprung from the
Diomed
stock. It is upwards of forty years since
Diomed
won the Derby in England: He was brought
to this country in his old age; and is as famous
amongst us, almost, as Christopher Columbus; for,
he may be said to have founded a new empire here.
Besides that stock, I have some of the Oscar breed;
one of the best of them is the gelding I ride: You
may know them, wherever you see them, by their
carriage and indomitable spirit.
I know nothing about it, said I,but I have
heard a great deal said of the Godolphin Arabian.
I can show you some of that breed, too, replied
Meriwether,Wildair, who I believe was a
grandson
of the Arabian.
Old
Wildairmark you, master! interrupted
Carey, very sagely,not Col. Symmes' Wildair.
Old Wildair, I mean, rejoined Frank.He
was imported into Maryland, and taken back to
England before the Revolution:but I have some
of his descendants.
And
thar's
Regulus's breed, said Carey. They
tell me he was genuine Arabian too.
I am not sure, returned Meriwether, that I
have any of that breed.Carey affects to say that
there are some of them here.
Bless your soul! master Frank, interrupted the
old groom,did'nt I carry the Ace of Diamonds,
over here to the Bowling Green, that next summer
coming after the war, to
Ride on and open the gate for us, said Frank.
Set that old negro to talking of pedigrees, and his
tongue goes like a mill!
VOL. II. 19
We now entered upon the meadow, and soon came
up with several of the beautiful animals whose
ancestry
had been the subject of this discussion. They
were generally in the wild and unshorn condition of
beasts that had never been subjected to the dominion
of man. It was apparent that the proprietor of the
stock kept them more for their nobleness of blood than
for any purpose of service. Some few of the older
steeds showed the care of the groom; but even these
were far from being in that sleek state of nurture
which we are apt to associate with the idea of beauty
in the horse. One, skilled in the points of symmetry,
would, doubtless, have found much to challenge his
admiration in their forms; but this excellence was,
for the most part, lost upon me. Still, however,
unpractised
as I was, there was, in the movements of
these quadrupeds, a charm that I could not fail to
recognize
.
No sooner were we descried upon the field,
than the different troops, in the distance, were set in
motion, as if by some signal to which they were
accustomed
;
and they hurried tumultuously to the spot
where we stood, exerting their utmost speed, and
presenting a wonderfully animated spectacle. The
swift career of the horse, upon an open plain, is
always an interesting sight; but as we saw it now,
exhibited in squadrons, pursuing an unrestrained and
irregular flight, accompanied with wild and
expressive
neighs and enlivened with all the frolicksome
antics that belong to high-mettled coursers,it was
a scene of singularly gay and picturesque beauty.
The ludicrous earnestness, too, with which they
crowded upon us!there was in it the natural grace
of youth, united with the muscular vigour of maturity.
One would rear playfully, as he thrust himself into the
compact assembly; another would advance at a
long, swinging trot, striking the ground at every step
with a robust and echoing stroke, and then, halt
suddenly
,
as if transfigured into a statue. Some would
kick at their comrades, and seize them with their
teeth in the wantonness of sport: others would leap,
in quick bounds, and make short circuits, at high
speed, around the mass, with heads and tails erect,
displaying the flexibility of their bodies in caracols of
curious nimbleness. The younger colts would
impertinently
claim to be familiar with the horses we
rode; and were apt to receive, in return, a severe
blow for the intrusion. Altogether, it was a scene of
boisterous horse-play, well befitting the arrogant
nature
of such a licentious, high-blooded, far-descended
and riotous young nobility.
It may be imagined that this was a sight of
engrossing
interest to Meriwether. Both he and Carey
had dismounted, and were busy in their survey of the
group, all the while descanting upon the numberless
perfections of form that occurred to their view; and
occasionally interlarding their commendations with
the technical lore of genealogy, which, so far as I was
concerned, might as profitably have been delivered
in Greek.
The occasion of this rapid concentration of our
cavalry was soon explained. Meriwether was in
the habit of administering a weekly ration of salt to
these wandering hordes at this spot; and they,
therefore
,
were wont to betake themselves to the
rendezvous
,
with all the eagerness we had witnessed,
whenever any sign was afforded them that the
customary
distribution was to be made. Care was now
taken that they should not be disappointed in their
reasonable expectations; and Carey was,
accordingly
,
despatched to the stable for the necessary
supplies
.
Having gratified our curiosity in this region, we
now visited the farm-yard. Within this enclosure,
a party of negroes were employed in treading out
grain. About a dozen horses were kept at full trot
around a circle of some ten or fifteen paces diameter,
which was strewed with the wheat in sheaf. These
were managed by some five or six little blacks, who
rode like monkey caricaturists of the games of the
circus, and who mingled with the labours of the place
that comic air of deviltry which communicated to
the whole employment something of the complexion
of a pastime. Whilst we remained here, as
spectators
of this stirring and busy occupation, a dialogue
took place, which, as it made some important
veterinary
disclosures, I will record for the benefit of all
those who take an interest in adding to the treasures
of pharmacy.
One of the horses had received an injury in a
foreleg
,
a day or two before; and was now confined in
the stable under the regimen of the overseer. The
animal was brought out for inspection, and the
bandages
,
which had been bound round the limb, were
removed in our presence. To a question as to the
cause of this injury, Carey replied
The mischeevous young devil wa'nt content with
the paster, but she must be loping over the fence into
the cornfield! It was a marcy she wa'nt foundered
outright, on the green corn; but she sprained her
pasten-joint, any how;which she desarved for
being
so obstropolous.
A consultation was now held upon the case, at
which divers of the elder negroes assisted. But, in
general, every attempt by any of these to give an
opinion was frowned down by the authoritative and
self-sufficient Carey, who was somewhat tyrannical
in the assertion of his prerogative.
Frank Meriwether ventured to suggest that the
injured
part should be bathed frequently with
ice-water
;
to which prescription our ancient groom
pointedly
objected,saying, that all the
cretur
wanted,
was to have her leg dressed, every night and
morning
,
with a wash that he could make, of vinegar and
dockweed, and half a dozen other ingredients, which,
he affirmed, would produce a cure, in almost no
time.
A conspicuous and, till now, somewhat restive
member of the council, was a broad-shouldered,
dwarfish, old negro, known by the name of uncle
Jeff, who had manifested several decided symptoms
of a design to make a speech; and now, in despite
of Carey's cross looks, gave his advice in the
following
terms
One of the stonishingst things for a sprain that I
19 *
knows on, is this said he, stepping into the ring
and laying the fingers of his right hand upon the palm
of his leftBless your soul, Mas Frank! I have
tried it, often and often, on people,but, in pertickler,
upon horses: oil of spike he continued, striking
his palm, at the enumeration of each ingredient;
oil of spike, campfire, a little castile soap, and the
best of whiskey, all put into a bottle and boiled half
awayIt's mazing how it will cure a sprain! My
old 'oman was sick abed all last winter, with a sprain
on her knee; and she tried Doctor Stubbs, and the
leech doctor, and all the tother larned folksbut no
use, tell she tuck some my intment! She said herself
if you believe methar was none on'em no touch
to my intment. It's mazing, Mas Frank! Oh,
oh!
Sho! ejaculated Carey, in a short, surly growl,
after hearing this wise morsel of experience to the
end, and looking as angry as a vexed bull-dog;
Sho! Jeff, you tell me! Think I never seed a hos
with a sprained foot, all the way up to my time of
life? Stan off, man! I knows what I am about?
Meriwether turned to me, with a look of jocular
resignation, and said, laughing
You see how it is! This old magnifico will allow
no man to have an opinion but himself. Rather
than disturb the peace, I must submit to his
authority
.
Well, Jeffry, my old fellow, as we can't
convince
Mr. Carey, I suppose we had better not make
him angry. You know what an obstinate,
cross-grained
,
old bully, he is? I am afraid he will take us
both in hand, if we contradict him: so I'm for letting
him alone.
Consarn his picter! said Jeff, in a low tone of
voice, accompanied by a laugh, in which all the
other negroes joined, as we broke up the
consultation
and walked away
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE QUARTER.
Having
despatched these important matters at
the stable, we left our horses in charge of the
servants
,
and walked towards the cabins, which were not
more than a few hundred paces distant. These
hovels
,
with their appertenances, formed an
exceedingly
picturesque landscape. They were scattered
over the slope of a gentle hill without order; and
many
of them were embowered under old and majestic
trees. The rudeness of their construction rather
enhanced
the attractiveness of the scene. Some few
were built after the fashion of the better sort of
cottages
;
but age had stamped its heavy traces upon
their exterior: the green moss had gathered upon the
roofs, and the coarse weatherboarding had broken,
here and there, into chinks. But the more lowly of
these structures, and the most numerous, were
nothing
more than plain log-cabins, compacted pretty
much on the model by which boys build
partridgetraps
;
being composed of the trunks of trees, still
clothed with their bark, and knit together at the
corners
with so little regard to neatness that the
timbers
,
being of unequal lengths, jutted beyond each
other, sometimes to the length of a foot. Perhaps,
none of these latter sort were more than twelve feet
square, and not above seven in height. A door
swung upon wooden hinges, and a small window of
two narrow panes of glass were, in general, the only
openings in the front. The intervals between the
logs were filled with clay; and the roof, which was
constructed of smaller timbers, laid lengthwise along
it and projecting two or three feet beyond the side or
gable walls, heightened, in a very marked degree, the
rustic effect. The chimneys communicated even a
droll expression to these habitations. They were,
oddly enough, built of billets of wood, having a broad
foundation of stone, and growing narrower as they
rose, each receding gradually from the house to which
it was attached, until it reached the height of the roof.
These combustible materials were saved from the
access of the fire by a thick coating of mud; and the
whole structure, from its tapering form, might be said
to bear some resemblance to the spout of a tea kettle;
indeed, this domestic implement would furnish no
unapt
type of the complete cabin.
From this description, which may serve to
illustrate
a whole species of habitations very common in
Virginia, it will be seen, that on the score of
accommodation
,
the inmates of these dwellings were
furnished
according to a very primitive notion of comfort.
Still, however, there were little garden-patches
attached
to each, where cymblings, cucumbers, sweet
potatoes, water-melons and cabbages flourished in
unrestrained proximity. Add to this, that there were
abundance of poultry domesticated about the
premises
,
and it may be perceived that, whatever might
be the inconveniences of shelter, there was no want
of what, in all countries, would be considered a
reasonable supply of luxuries.
Nothing more attracted my observation than the
swarms of little negroes that basked on the sunny
sides of these cabins, and congregated to gaze at us
as we surveyed their haunts. They were nearly all
in that costume of the golden age which I have here,
tofore described; and showed their slim shanks and
long heels in all the varieties of their grotesque
natures
,
from the most knock-kneed to the most
bandy-legged
.
Their predominant love of sunshine, and
their lazy, listless postures, and apparent content to
be silently looking abroad, might well afford a
comparison
to a set of terapins luxuriating in the genial
warmth of summer, on the logs of a mill-pond.
And there, too, were the prolific mothers of this
redundant brood,a number of stout negro-women
who thronged the doors of the huts, full of idle
curiosity
to see us. And, when to these are added a few
reverend, wrinkled, decrepit old men, with faces
shortened as if with drawing-strings, noses that
seemed
to have run all to nostril, and with feet of the
configuration
of a mattock, my reader will have a
tolerably
correct idea of this negro-quarter, its
population
,
buildings, external appearance, situation and
extent.
Meriwether, I have said before, is a kind and
considerate
master. It is his custom frequently to visit
his slaves, in order to inspect their condition, and,
where it may be necessary, to add to their comforts
or relieve their wants. His coming amongst them,
therefore, is always hailed with pleasure. He has
constituted himself into a high court of appeal, and
makes it a rule to give all their petitions a patient
hearing, and to do justice in the premises. This, he
tells me, he considers as indispensably necessary;
he says, that no overseer is entirely to be
trusted
:
that there are few men who have the
temper
to administer wholesome laws to any population,
however small, without some omissions or
irregularities
;
and that this is more emphatically true of
those who administer them entirely at their own will.
On the present occasion, in almost every house
where Frank entered, there was some boon to be
asked; and I observed, that in every case, the
petitioner
was either gratified or refused in such a
tone as left no occasion or disposition to murmur,
Most of the women had some bargains to offer, of
fowls or eggs or other commodities of household use,
and Meriwether generally referred them to his wife,
who, I found, relied almost entirely on this resource,
for the supply of such commodities; the negroes
being regularly paid for whatever was offered in this
way.
One old fellow had a special favour to ask,a
little
money to get a new padding for his saddle, which,
he said, galled his cretur's back. Frank, after a
few jocular passages with the veteran, gave him
what he desired, and sent him off rejoicing.
That, sir, said Meriwether, is no less a
personage
than Jupiter. He is an old bachelor, and
has his cabin here on the hill. He is now near
seventy, and is a kind of King of the Quarter. He
has an old horse, that he extorted from me last
Christmas; and I never come here without finding
myself involved in some fresh consequences from
my donation. I believe now, however, that he is
fully equipped with every thing but spurs, with
which I mean to supply him. But he is a
preposterous
coxcomb; Ned has given him an old
cocked-hat
,
and he wears it on Sundays, with a conceit that
has excited the jealousy of all the negroes on the
plantation.
From this view of the negro population at
Swallow
Barn I should not hesitate to pronounce them a
comparatively comfortable and contented race of
people, with much less of the care and vexation of
life than I have often observed in other classes of
society. I expressed this opinion to Meriwether.
His reply may serve to explain the feelings of an
intelligent
slave-holder on this subject.
This topic, said he, has grown to possess a
fearful interest of late. The world has begun to
discuss
the evils of slavery; and a part of the debate
has been levelled to the comprehension of our
negroes
.
I believe there is no class of men who may
not be persuaded that they suffer some wrong in the
organization of society;and, perhaps, it is true;
then, how much easier is it to inflame the
ignorant
minds of these people, especially with a
subject
so indefensible as slavery? It is theoretically
and morally wrong; and, of course, it may be made
to appear wrong in all its modifications. But, surely,
if these people are consigned to our care, and put
upon our commonwealth, without our agency, the
only duty that is left to us is to administer
wholesome
laws for their government, and to make their
servitude as tolerable to them as we can. We are
not bound to submit to internal convulsions to get
rid of them; nor have we a right, in the desire to
free ourselves, to whelm them in greater evils than
they suffer here: A violent removal of them, or a
general emancipation would produce one or the
other of these consequences. When we can part
with them on terms easy to ourselves and to them,
I would do it. In the mean time, we must treat
them kindly and justly. As to the evils they suffer,
I do not believe in them:the evil generally is on the
side of the master. They are required to do less
work than any other labourers in society, they have
as many privileges as are compatible with the nature
of their occupations: they are subsisted in general
as comfortably, nay, in
their
estimation of comforts,
more comfortably than the tillers of the soil of other
nations. And as to the severities that are alleged to
be practised upon them, I think there is more malice
than truth in the accusation: the slave-holders, in this
country at least, are, in the main, men of kind and
humane tempers, as pliant to the touch of pity and
compassion as any class in any country; and as
little
likely to inflict sufferings upon their dependants.
Indeed, the owner of slaves is less apt to be harsh in
his requisitions of labour, than those men are who toil
much themselves; because, it is almost invariably
true, that those who are in the habit of severely
tasking
themselves, are most inclined to regulate their
demands upon others by their own standard. Our
slaves are punished for misdemeanors, exactly as
VOL. II. 20
disorderly or dishonest persons are punished in all
communities. The different mode of inflicting the
punishment
upon slaves causes it to be more remarked.
If a man in New York is committed to prison or
chained in a cell, for robbery, it is called an act of
justice
,
because it is done by the public authorities; but if
a negro in Virginia should rob his neighbour's barn, he
is whipped by the overseer; and all that the world
knows of it isthat a black man has been cruelly
whipped by order of his master. The punishments in
this community very little exceed in amount the
penalties exacted in other communities.
It is very well worth the attention of our
legislature
to consider whether the negro population be ill
used; and I would give my hearty concurrence to a
law to punish cruelty in masters, because it concerns
humanity, as well as good government, that all such
abuses of power should be checked. But, as to
myself
,and
I believe I may speak for my neighbours,
such a law would be found of exceeding rare
application
.
Whenever emancipation of slaves, or the abolition
of slavery is to be required, the requisition must come
from the slave-holding states themselves, as they are
the only persons in this country who are able to deal
with the subject. All other men will be deluded
by the feeling which the abstract question of slavery
excites in their minds,a feeling of unmitigated
abhorrence
of its injustice. We, on the contrary, have
every motive to calm and prudent counsel. Our
lives, fortunes, families,even our commonwealth
are put at the hazard of this resolve. In the mean
time, therefore, it seems to me that the real friends of
humanity and justice should rather conspire to allay
the ferments of the country on this question, and,
especially
,
to soothe the mind of the slave himself, and
reconcile him to a destiny which, in fact, is more free
from want, care or sorrow, than that of most others
who perform the same offices.
It has sometimes occurred to me,and I am
disposed
to cherish the idea now,that we in Virginia
might elevate our slave population to a more
respectable
footing, by infusing into it something of a feudal
character. I would establish a class of privileged
serfs, somewhat like those, formerly, in parts of
Germany
.
These should be selected from the most
deserving
negroes above the age of forty-five years.
They should be entitled to hold small tracts of land,
under their masters, rendering for it a certain rent,
payable either in personal service or money. I would
create manorial jurisdictions, and give the masters or
stewards of these manors, high civil and criminal
judicial authority; and I would enact a code of laws
particularly adapted to such a class. The effect of
this system would be to relieve us from the support
of a superfluous slave population; to furnish
incentives
to good conduct on the part of our slaves, by
placing before them the hope of attaining this feudal
rank; and it would reduce the administration of
punishment
amongst our slaves to such specific offences
as would show, in most cases, the motive and the
extent of the infliction;a circumstance that would
take away from it the objection of its being
considered
capricious or vindictive.
I have not carried out all the details of my plan,
continued Meriwether,but I have a fancy that
this idea may be improved to advantage,and I
should like myself to begin the experiment. Jupiter
here, should be my first feudatory,my tenant in
soccage
,my
old villain.
I suspect, said I, Jupiter considers that his
dignity is not to be enhanced by any enlargement of
privilegeas long as he is allowed to walk about in
his cocked hat as King of the Quarter.
Perhaps not, replied Meriwether, laughing:
then I shall be forced to make my commencement
upon Carey.
Carey, interrupted Hazard,would think it
small promotion to be allowed to hold land under
you.
Faith, I shall be without a feudatory to begin
with!said Meriwether.But come with me: I
have to make a visit to the cabin of old Lucy.
CHAPTER XIX.
A NEGRO MOTHER.
Lucy's
cottage was remote from the rest of the
cabins
,
and seemed to sleep in the shade of a wood
upon the skirts of which it was situated. In full view
from it was a narrow creek, or navigable inlet from
the river, which was seen glittering in the sunshine
through the screen of cedars and shrubbery that
grew upon its banks. A garden occupied the little
space in front of the habitation; and here, with some
evidence of a taste for embellishment which I had
not seen elsewhere in this negro hamlet, flowers were
planted in order along the line of the enclosure, and
shot up with a gay luxuriance. A draw-well was
placed in the middle of this garden, and some few fruit
trees were clustered about it. These improvements
had their origin in past years, and owed their present
preservation to the thrifty care of the daughter of the
aged inhabitant, a spruce, decent and orderly
woman
who had been nurtured among the family
servants
at Swallow Barn, and now resided in the
cabin
,
the sole attendant upon her mother.
When we arrived at this little dwelling, Lucy was
alone, her daughter having, a little while before, left
her to make a visit to the family mansion. The old
20 *
woman's form showed the double havock of age and
disease. She was bent forward, and sat near her
hearth, with her elbows resting on her knees; and her
hands (in which she grasped a faded and tattered
handkerchief,) supported her chin. She was
smoking
a short and dingy pipe; and, in the weak and
childish musing of age, was beating one foot upon the
floor with a regular and rapid stroke, such as is
common
to nurses when lulling a child to sleep. Her
gray hairs were covered with a cap; and her attire
generally exhibited an attention to cleanliness, which
showed the concern of her daughter for her personal
comfort.
The lowly furniture of the room corresponded
with the appearance of its inmate. It was tidy and
convenient, and there were even some
manifestations
of the ambitious vanity of a female in the
fragments
of looking-glass, and the small framed prints
that hung against the walls. A pensive partner in
the quiet comfort of this little apartment, was a large
cat, that sat perched upon the sill of the open
window
,
and looked demurely out upon the garden,as
if soberly rebuking the tawdry and garish bevy of
sunflowers
that erected their tall, spinster-like figures so
near that they almost thrust their heads into the
room.
For the first few moments after our arrival, the
old woman seemed to be unconscious of our
presence
.
Meriwether spoke to her without receiving
an answer; and, at last, after repeating his
salutation
two or three times, she raised her feeble eyes
towards
him, and made only a slight recognition by a
bow. Whether it was that his voice became more
familiar to her ear, or that her memory was
suddenly
resuscitated, after her master had addressed some
questions to her, she all at once brightened up into a
lively conviction of the person of her visiter; and, as
a smile played across her features, she exclaimed,
God bless the young master! I did'nt know him.
He has come to see poor old mammy Lucy!
And how is the old woman? asked Meriwether,
stooping to speak, almost in her ear.
She has'nt got far to go, replied Lucy. They
are a-coming for her:they tell me every night that
they are a-coming to take her away.
Who are coming? inquired Frank.
They that told the old woman, she returned,
looking up wildly and speaking in a louder voice,
that they buried his body in the sands of the sea.
Saying these words, she began to open out the
ragged
handkerchief which, until now, she had held in
her clenched hand.They brought me this in the
night, she continued,and then, I knew it was
true.
In the pause that followed, the old negro
remained
in profound silence, during which the tears ran
down her cheeks. After some minutes she seemed
suddenly to check her feelings and said, with energy,
I told them it was a lie: and so it was!The old
woman knew better than them all. Master Frank
did'nt know it, and Miss Lucretia didn't know it,
but mammy Lucy, if she is old, knew it well!Five
years last February!How many years, honey, do
you think a ship may keep going steady on without
stopping?It is a right long time,isn't it, honey?
This exhibition of drivelling dotage was attended
with many other incoherent expressions that I have
not thought it worth while to notice; and I would
not have troubled my reader with these seemingly
unmeaning effusions of a mind in the last stages of
senility, if they had not some reference to the
circumstances
I am about to relate. The scene grew
painful to us as we prolonged our visit; and
therefore
,
after some kind words to the old woman, we
took our departure. As we returned to Swallow
Barn, Frank Meriwether gave me the particulars of
old Lucy's pathetic history, which I have woven, with
as much fidelity as my memory allows, into the
following
simple and somewhat melancholy narrative.
ABE.
During
the latter years of the war of the
revolution
my uncle Walter Hazard, as I have before
informed
my reader, commanded a troop of volunteer
cavalry, consisting principally of the yeomanry in
the neighbourhood of Swallow Barn; and, at the
time of the southern invasion by Lord Cornwallis,
this little band was brought into active service, and
shared, as freely as any other corps of the army, the
perils of that desultory warfare which was waged
upon the borders of North Carolina and Virginia.
The gentlemen of the country, at that time,
marshalled
their neighbours into companies; and, seldom
acting in line, were encouraged to harass the enemy
wherever opportunity offered. The credit as well
as the responsibility of these partisan operations fell
to the individual leaders who had respectively
signalized
themselves by their zeal in the cause.
This kind of irregular army gave great occasion
for the display of personal prowess; and there were
many gentlemen whose bold adventures, during the
period alluded to, furnished the subject of popular
anecdotes of highly attractive interest. Such
exploits
,
of course, were attended with their usual
marvels; and there was scarcely any leader of note
who could not recount some passages in his
adventures
,
where he was indebted for his safety to the
attachment and bravery of his followers,often to
that of his personal servants.
Captain Hazard was a good deal distinguished in
this war, and took great pleasure in acknowledging
his indebtedness, on one occasion, for his escape from
imminent peril, to the address and gallantry of an
humble retainer,a faithful negro, by the name of
Luke,whom he had selected from the number of
his slaves to attend him as a body-servant through
the adventures of the war.
It furnishes the best answer that can be made to
all the exaggerated opinions of the misery of the
domestic
slavery of this region, that, in the stormiest
period of the history of the United States, and when
the whole disposable force of the country was
engrossed
in the conduct of a fearful conflict, the slaves of
Virginia were not only passive to the pressure of a
yoke which the philosophy of this age affects to
consider
as the most intolerable of burthens, but they also,
in a multitude of instances, were found in the ranks,
by the side of their masters, sharing with them the
most formidable dangers, and manifesting their
attachment
by heroic gallantry.
After the close of the war Captain Hazard was
not unmindful of his trusty servant. Luke had
grown into a familiar but respectful intimacy with
his master, and occupied a station about his person
of the most confidential nature. My uncle scarcely
ever rode out without him, and was in the habit of
consulting him upon many lesser matters relating to
the estate, with a seriousness that showed the value
he set upon Luke's judgment. He offered Luke his
freedom; but the domestic desired no greater liberty
than he then enjoyed, and would not entertain the
idea of any possible separation from the family.
Instead
,
therefore, of an unavailing, formal grant of
manumission, my uncle gave Luke a few acres of
ground, in the neighbourhood of the Quarter, and
provided him a comfortable cabin. Before the war
had terminated, Luke had married Lucy, a slave
who had been reared in the family, as a lady's maid,
and, occasionally, as a nurse to the children at
Swallow
Barn. Things went on very smoothly with
them, for many years. But, at length, Luke waxed
old, and began to grow rheumatic; and, by degrees,
retired from his customary duties, which were
rendered
lighter as his infirmities increased. Lucy,
from the spry and saucy-eyed waiting-woman, was
fast changing into a short, fat and plethoric old
dame. Her locks accumulated the frost of each
successive winter; and she, too, fell back upon the
reserve of comfort laid up for their old age by their
master,who himself, by a like process, had faded
away, from the buxom, swashing madcap of the
revolutionary
day, into a thin, leather-cheeked old
campaigner
,
that, sometimes, told hugely long stories, and
sent for Luke to put his name on the back of them.
In short, five and thirty years, had wrought their
ordinary
miracles; and first, the veteran Luke
disappeared
from this mortal stage; and then his master:
and old Lucy was left a hale and querulous widow,
with eight or nine children, and her full dower
interest
in the cabin and its curtilage.
The youngest, but one, of her children was named
Abrahamuniversally called Abe. All before Abe
had arrived at manhood, and had been successively
dismissed from Lucy's cabin, as they reached the age
fit to render them serviceable, with that satisfied
unconcern
that belongs to a negro mother who trusts
to the kindness of her master. This family was
remarkable
for its intelligence; and those who had
already left the maternal nest had, with perhaps
one or two exceptions, been selected for the
mechanical
employments upon the estate:they were
shoemakers
,
weavers, or carpenters; and were held in
esteem for their industry and good character. Abe,
however, was an exception to the general
respectability
of Luke's descendants. He was, at the period
to which my story refers, an athletic and singularly
active lad, rapidly approaching to manhood; with
a frame not remarkable for size, but well knit, and
of uncommonly symmetrical proportions for the race
to which he belonged. He had nothing of the flat
nose and broad lip of his tribe,but his face was
rather moulded with the prevailing characteristics of
the negroes of the West Indies. There was an
expression
of courage in his eye that answered to the
complexion of his mind: he was noted for his
spirit
,
and his occasional bursts of passion which, even
in his boyhood, rendered him an object of fear to his
older associates. This disposition was coupled with
singular shrewdness of intellect, and an aptitude for
almost every species of handicraft. He had been
trained to the work of a blacksmith, and was, when
he chose to be so, a useful auxiliary at the anvil.
But a habit of associating with the most profligate
menials belonging to the extensive community of
Swallow Barn, and the neighbouring estates, had
corrupted his character, and, at the time of life which
he had now reached, had rendered him offensive to
the whole plantation.
Walter Hazard could never bear the idea of
disposing
of any of his negroes; and when Meriwether
came to the estate, he was even more strongly
imbued
with the same repugnance. Abe was,
therefore
,
for a long time, permitted to take his own way,
the attachment of the family for his mother procuring
for him an amnesty for many transgressions. Lucy,
as is usual in almost all such cases, entertained an
affection for this outcast, surpassing that which she
felt for all the rest of her offspring. There was never
a more exemplary domestic than the mother: nor
was she without a painful sense of the failings of her
son; but this only mortified her pride without
abating
her fondnessa common effect of strong animal
impulses, not merely in ignorant minds. Abe had
always lived in her cabin, and the instinct of long
association predominated over her weak reason; so
that although she was continually tormented with
his misdeeds, and did not fail to reprove him even
with habitual harshness, still her heart yearned
secretly towards him. Time fled by, confirming this
motherly attachment, and, in the same degree,
hardening
Abe into the most irreclaimable of culprits.
He molested the peace of the neighbourhood by
continual
broils; was frequently detected in acts of
depredation
upon the adjoining farms; and had once
VOL. II. 21
brought himself into extreme jeopardy by joining a
band of out-lying negroes, who had secured
themselves
,
for some weeks, in the fastnesses of the
low-country
swamps, from whence they annoyed the
vicinity by nocturnal incursions of the most lawless
character. Nothing but the interference of
Meriwether
,
at the earnest implorings of Lucy, saved
Abe, on this occasion, from public justice. Abe was
obliged in consequence to be removed altogether
from the estate, and consigned to another sphere of
action.
Meriwether revolved this matter with great
deliberation
;
and, at length, determined to put his
refractory
bondsman in the charge of one of the pilots
of the Chesapeake, to whom, it was supposed, he
might become a valuable acquisition;his active,
intelligent and intrepid character being well suited
to the perilous nature of that service. The
arrangements
for this purpose were speedily made, and the
day of his removal drew nigh.
It was a curious speculation, on the part of the
family, and an unpleasant one, to see how Lucy
would bear this separation. The negroes, like all
other dependants, are marked by an abundant spirit
of assentation. They generally agree to whatever is
proposed to their minds, by their superiors, with an
acquiescence that has the show of conviction. But,
it is very hard to convince the mind of a mother, of
the justice of the sentence that deprives her of her
child,especially a poor, unlearned, negro mother.
Lucy heard all the arguments to justify the necessity
of sending Abe abroad; assented to all; bowed her
head, as if entirely convinced;and thought itvery
hard. She was told that it was the only expedient
to save him from prison; she admitted it; but still said
that it was a very cruel thing to sever mother and
son. It was a source of unutterable anguish to her,
that no kindness on the part of the family could
mitigate
.
Forgetting Abe's growth to manhood, his
delinquencies
,
the torments he had incessantly inflicted
upon her peace, and unmindful of the numerous
children
that, with their descendants, were still around
her, she seemed to be engrossed by her affection for
this worthless scion of her stock;showing how
entirely
the unreasoning instincts of the animal sway
the human mind, in its uneducated condition. All
the considerations that proved Abe's banishment a
necessary and even, for himself, a judicious measure,
seemed only to afford additional reinforcements to the
unquenchable dotings of the mother.
From the time of the discovery of the
transgression
which brought down upon Abe the sentence
that was to remove him from Swallow Barn, until
the completion of the preliminary arrangements for
his departure, he was left in a state of anxious
uncertainty
as to his fate. He was afraid to be seen at
large, as some risk was hinted to him of seizure by
the public authorities; and he, therefore, confined
himself, with a sullen and dejected silence, in Lucy's
cabin,seldom venturing beyond the threshold; and,
when he did so, it was with the stealthy and
suspicious
motion which is observable in that class of
animals
that pursue their prey by night, when induced
to stir abroad in daytime.
It is a trait in the disposition of the negroes on the
old plantations, to cling with more than a freeman's
interest to the spot of their nativity. They have a
strong attachment to the places connected with their
earlier associations,what in phrenology is called
inhabitiveness
;and
the pride of remaining in one
family
of masters, and of being transmitted to its
posterity
with all their own generations, is one of the
most remarkable features in these negro clans. Being
a people of simple combinations and limited faculty
for speculative pleasures, they are a contented race,
not much disturbed by the desire of novelty. Abe
was not yet informed whether he was to be sold to a
distant owner, given over to public punishment, or
condemned to some domestic disgrace. Apparently,
he did not much care which:his natural
resoluteness
had made him dogged.
It was painful, during this period, to see his
mother
.
In all respects unlike himself, she suffered
intensely
;
and, though hoary with sixty winters, hovered
about him, with that busy assiduity which is one of the
simplest forms in which anxiety and grief are apt to
show themselves. She abandoned her usual
employments
,
and passed almost all her time within her
cabin
,
in a fretful subserviency to his wants; and, what
might seem to be incompatible with this strong
emotion
of attachment,though, in fact, it was one of the
evidences of its existence,her tone of addressing him
was that of reprimand, seldom substituted by the
language
of pity or tenderness. I mention this, because
it illustrates one point of the negro character. She
provided for him, as for a sickly child, what little
delicacies
her affluence afforded; and, with a furtive
industry, plied her needle through the livelong night,
in making up, from the scanty materials at her
command
,
such articles of dress as might be found or
fancied
to be useful to him, in the uncertain changes
that awaited him. In these preparations there was
even seen a curious attention to matters that might
serve only to gratify his vanity; some fantastical and
tawdry personal ornaments were to be found amongst
the stock of necessaries that her foresight was thus
providing.
I hope I shall not be thought tedious in thus
minutely
remarking the trifles that were observable in
the conduct of the old domestic on this occasion.
My purpose is to bring to the view of my reader an
exhibition of the natural forms in which the passions
are displayed in those lowest and humblest of the
departments of human society, and to represent truly
a class of people to whom justice has seldom been
done, and who possess many points of character well
calculated to win them a kind and amiable
judgment
from the world. They are a neglected race,
who seem to have been excluded from the pale of
human sympathy, from mistaken opinions of their
quality, no less than from the unpretending lowliness
of their position. To me, they have always
appeared
as a people of agreeable peculiarities, and not
without much of the picturesque in the developement
of their habits and feelings.
When it was, at last, announced that Abe was to
be disposed of in the manner I have mentioned, the
tidings were received by the mother and son
variously
,
21 *
according to their respective tempers. Lucy knew
no difference between a separation by a hundred or
a thousand miles: she counted none of the
probabilities
of future intercourse; and the traditionary
belief
in the dangers of the seas, with their unknown
monsters, and all the frightful stories of maritime
disaster
,
rose upon her imagination with a terrifying
presage of ill to her boy. Abe, on the other hand,
received the intelligence with the most callous
unconcern
.
He was not of a frame to blench at
peril, or fear misfortune; and his behaviour rather
indicated
resentment at the authority that was
exercised
over him, than anxiety for the issue. For a
time, he mused over this feeling in sullen silence:
but, as the expected change of his condition became
the subject of constant allusion among his associates,
and as the little community in which he had always
lived gathered around him, with some signs of
unusual
interest, to talk over the nature of his
employments
,
a great deal reached his ears from the older
negroes, that opened upon his mind a train of
perceptions
that were highly congenial to the latent
properties
of his character. His imagination was
awakened
by the attractions of this field of adventure; by the
free roving of the sailor; and by the tumultuous and
spirit-stirring roar of the ocean, as they were
pictured
to him in story. His person grew erect, his limbs
expanded to their natural motion, and he once
more walked with the light step and buoyant
feelings
of his young and wayward nature.
The time of departure arrived. A sloop that had
been lying at anchor in the creek, opposite to Lucy's
cabin, was just preparing to sail. The main-sail
was slowly opening its folds, as it rose along the
mast: a boat with two negroes had put off for the
beach, and the boatmen landed with a summons to
Abe, informing him that he was all they now staid
for. Abe was seated on his chest in front of the
dwelling; and Lucy sat on a stool beside him, with
both of his hands clasped in hers. Not a word
passed between them; and the heavings of the old
woman's bosom might have been heard by the
standers-by. A bevy of negroes stood around them:
the young ones, in ignorant and wondering silence;
and the elders conversing with each other in
smothered
tones, with an occasional cheering word
addressed
to mammy Lucyas they called her. Old
uncle Jeff was conspicuous in this scene. He stood
in the group, with his corncob pipe, puffing the smoke
from his bolster-lips, with lugubriously lengthened
visage.
The two boatmen pressed into the crowd to speak
to Lucy, but were arrested by the solemn Jeff, who,
thrusting out his broad, horny hand and planting it
upon the breast of the foremost, whispered, in a half
audible voice,The old woman's taking on!wait
a bitshe'll speak presently!
With these words, the whole company fell into
silence and continued to gaze at the mother. Abe
looked up, from the place where he sat, through his
eye-lashes, at the little circle, with an awkwardly
counterfeited smile playing through the tears that
filled his eyes.
It a'most goes to kill her, whispered one of the
women to her neighbour.
I've seen women, said Jeff, this here way,
afore in my time: they can bear a monstrous sight.
But, when they can once speak, then it's done,you
see.
Lucy was now approached by two or three of the
old women, who began to urge some feeble topics
of consolation in her ear, in that simple phrase which
nature supplies, and which had more of
encouragement
in its tones than in the words: but the only
response extracted was a mute shake of the head,
and a sorrowful uplifting of the eye, accompanied
by a closer grasp of the hands of Abe.
Its no use, said Jeff, as he poured a volume of
smoke from his mouth, and spoke in a deep voice,
in the dialect of his people,its no use till nature
takes its own way. When the tide over yonder
(pointing to the river) comes up, speeches arn't
going
to send it back: when an old woman's heart is
full it's just like the tide.
The wind is taking hold of the sail, said one of
the boatmen, who until now had not interfered in
the scene, and the captain has no time to stay.
Lucy looked up and directed her eye to the sloop,
whose canvass was alternately filling and shaking in
the wind, as the boat vacillated in her position.
The last moment had come. The mother arose
from her seat, at the same instant with her son,
and flung herself upon his neck, where she wept
aloud.
Didn't I tell you so! whispered Jeff to some
old crones; when it can get out of the bosom by
the eyes, it carries a monstrous load with it.
To be sure! exclaimed the beldams, which is
a form of interjection amongst the negroes, to express
both assent and wonder.
This burst of feeling had its expected effect upon
Lucy. She seemed to be suddenly relieved, and
was able to address a few short words of parting to
Abe: then taking from the plaits of her bosom, a
small leather purse containing a scant stock of
silver
,the
hoard of past yearsshe put it into the
unresisting hand of Abe. The boy looked at the
faded bag for a moment, and gathering up something
like a smile upon his face, he forced the money back
upon his mother, himself replacing it in the bosom of
her dress. You don't think I am going to take
your money with me! said he, I never cared about
the best silver my master ever had: no, nor for
freedom
neither. I thought I was always going to stay
here on the plantation. I would rather have the
handkerchief you wear around your neck, than all
the silver you ever owned.
Lucy took the handkerchief from her shoulders,
and put it in his hand. Abe drew it into a loose
knot about his throat, then turned briskly round,
shook hands with the by-standers, and, shouldering
his chest, moved with the boatmen, at a rapid pace,
towards the beach.
In a few moments afterwards, he was seen
standing
up in the boat, as it shot out from beneath the
bank, and waving his hand to the dusky group he
had just left. He then took his seat, and was watched
by his melancholy tribe until the sloop, falling away
before the wind, disappeared behind the remotest
promontory.
Lucy, with a heavy heart, retired within her cabin,
and threw herself upon a bed; and the comforting
gossips who had collected before her door, after
lingering
about her for a little while, gradually
withdrew
,
leaving her to the assiduities of her children.
Some years elapsed; during which interval
frequent
reports had reached Swallow Barn, relating to
the conduct and condition of Abe; and he himself
had, once or twice, revisited the family. Great
changes had been wrought upon him: he had grown
into a sturdy manhood, invigorated by the hardy
discipline
of his calling. The fearless qualities of his
mind, no less than the activity and strength of his
body, had been greatly developed to the advantage
of his character; and, what does not unfrequently
happen, the peculiar adaptation of his new pursuits
to the temper and cast of his constitution, had
operated
favourably upon his morals. His errant
propensities
had been gratified; and the alternations
between
the idleness of the calm and the strenuous and
exciting bustle of the storm, were pleasing to his
unsteady
and fitful nature. He had found, in other
habits, a vent for inclinations which, when
constrained
by his former monotonous avocations, had so often
broken out into mischievous adventures. In short,
Abe was looked upon by his employers as a
valuable
seaman; and the report of this estimation of him
had worked wonders in his favour at Swallow Barn.
From the period of his departure up to this time,
poor old Lucy nursed the same extravagant feelings
towards him; and these were even kindled into a
warmer flame by his increasing good repute. Her
passion, it may be called, was a subject of constant
notice in the family. It would have been deemed
remarkable in an individual of the most delicate
nurture; but, in the aged and faithful domestic, it
was a subject of commiseration on account of its
influence
upon her happiness, and had almost induced
Meriwether to recall Abe to his former occupation;
although he was sensible that, by doing so, he might
expose him to the risk of relapsing into his earlier
errors. But, besides this, Abe had become so well
content with his present station that it was
extremely
likely he would, of his own accord, have sought to
return to it. The vagrant, sunshiny, and billowy
life of a sailor has a spell in it that works
marvellously
upon the heedless and irresponsible
temperament
of a negro. Abe was, therefore, still permitted,
like a buoy, to dance upon the waves, and to woo
his various destiny between the lowest trough of
the sea, and the highest white-cap of the billow.
At the time to which my story has now advanced,
an event took place that excited great interest
within
the little circle of Swallow Barn. It was about
the breaking up of the wintertowards the latter
end of Februarysome four years ago, that in the
afternoon of a cheerless day, news arrived at
Norfolk
that an inward-bound brig had struck upon the
shoal of the middle ground, (a shallow bar that
stretches seaward beyond the mouth of the
Chesapeake
,
between the two capes,) and, from the
threatening
aspect of the weather, the crew were supposed
to be in great danger. It was a cold, blustering day,
such as winter sometimes puts on when he is about
to retreat:as a squadron, vexed with
watching
a politic enemy, finding itself obliged, at last, to
raise the blockade, is apt to break ground with an
unusual show of bravado.The wind blew in gusts
from the north-west; a heavy rack of dun and chilly
clouds was driven churlishly before the blast, and
spitted out some rare flakes of snow. These moving
masses were forming a huge, black volume upon the
eastern horizon, towards the ocean, as if there
encountering
the resistance of an adverse gale. From
the west the sun occasionally shot forth a lurid ray,
that, for the instant, flung upon this dark pile a
sombre
,
purple hue, and lighted up the foam that
gathered
at the top of the waves, far seaward; thus opening
short glimpses of that dreary ocean over which
darkness
was brooding. The sea-birds soared against
the murky vault above them; and, now and then,
caught upon their white wings the passing beam, that
gave them almost a golden radiance; whilst, at the
same time, they screamed their harsh and frequent
cries of fear or joy. The surface of the Chesapeake
was lashed up into a fretful sea, and the waves
were repressed by the weight of the wind; billow
pursuing
billow with an angry and rapid flight, and
barking
,
with the snappish sullenness of the wolf. Across
the wide expanse of Hampton Road might have
been seen some few bay-craft, apparently not much
larger than the wild-fowl that sailed above them,
beating, with a fearful anxiety, against the gale, for
such harbours as were nearest at hand; or scudding
before it under close-reefed sails, with ungovernable
speed, towards the anchorages to leeward. Every
moment the wind increased in violence; the clouds
swept nearer to the waters; the gloom thickened;
the birds sought safety on the land; the little barks
were quickly vanishing from view; and, before the
hour of sunset, earth, air, and, sea were blended into
one mass, in which the eye might vainly endeavour to
define the boundaries of each: whilst the fierce
howling
of the wind, and the deafening uproar of the ocean
gave a desolation to the scene, that made those, who
looked upon it from the shore, devoutly thankful that
no ill luck had tempted them upon the flood.
It was at this time that a pilot boat was seen
moored
to a post at the end of a wooden wharf that
formed
the principal landing place at the little seaport of
Hampton. The waves were dashing, with hollow
reverberations, between the timbers of the wharf, and
the boat was rocking with a violence that showed
the extreme agitation of the element upon which it
floated. Three or four sailorsall negroesclad in
rough pea-jackets, with blue and red woollen caps,
were standing upon the wharf or upon the deck of
the boat, apparently making some arrangements for
venturing out of the harbour. The principal
personage
among them, whose commands were given with
a bold and earnest voice, and promptly obeyed, was
our stout friend Abe, now grown into the full
perfection
of manhood, with a frame of unsurpassed strength
and agility. At the nearer extremity of this wharf,
land-ward, were a few other mariners, white men,
of a weather-beaten exterior, who had seemingly
just walked from the village to the landing-place,
and were engaged in a grave consultation upon some
VOL. II. 22
question of interest. This group approached the
former
while they were yet busy with the tackling of
the boat. Abe had stepped a-board with his
companions
,
and they were about letting all loose for
their departure.
What do you think of it now, Abe? asked one
of the older seamen, as he turned his eyes towards
the heavens, with a look of concern. Are you still
so crazy as to think of venturing out in this gale?
The storm is like a young wolf, replied Abe.
It gets one hour older and two worse. But this
is'nt the hardest blow I ever saw, Master Crocket.
It will be so dark to-night, said the other, that
you will not be able to see your jib; and, by the time
the wind gets round to north-east, you will have a
drift of snow that will shut your eyes. It will be a
dreadful night outside of the capes: I see no good
that is to come of your foolhardiness.
Snow-storm or hail-storm, it's all one to me,
answered Abe. The little Flying-Fish has ridden,
summer and winter, over as heavy seas as ever
rolled
in the Chesapeake. I knows what she can do,
you see!
Why, you could'nt find the brig if you were
within
a cable's length of her, such a night as this, said
another speaker; and if you were to see her I don't
know how you are to get along side.
You wouldn't say so, master Wilson, returned
Abe, if you were one of the crew of the brig
yourself
.
We can try, you know; and if no good comes
on it, let them that
saunt
me judge of that. I always
obeys orders!
Well, replied the other, a negro that is born to
be hangedyou know the rest, Abe:the devil may
help you, as he sometimes does.
There is as good help for a negro as there is for
a white man, master Wilsonwhether on land or
water. And no man is going to die till his time
comes. I don't set up for more spirit than other
people
;
but I never was afeard of the sea.
During this short dialogue, Abe and his comrades
were busily reefing the sail, and they had now
completed
all their preparations. The day had come
very near to the hour of sunset. Abe mustered his
crew, spoke to them with a brave, encouraging tone,
and ordered them to cast off from the wharf. In a
moment, all hands were at the halyards; and the
buoyant little Flying Fish sprang off from her
moorings
,
under a single sail double-reefed, and bounded
along before the wind, like an exulting doe, loosened
from thraldom, on her native wastes.
That's a daring fellow! said one of the party
that stood upon the wharf, as they watched the
gallant
boat heaving playfully through the foamand
would'nt mind going to sea astride a shark, if any
one would challenge him to it.
If any man along the Chesapeake, said another,
can handle a pilot boat in such weatherAbe can.
But it's no use for a man to be tempting providence
in this way. It looks wicked!
He is on a good errand, interrupted the first
speaker. And God send him a successful venture!
That negro has a great deal of good and bad both in
himbut I think the good has the upper hand.
The Flying Fish was soon far from the speakers,
and now showed her little sail, as she bent it down
almost to kiss the water, a spotless vision upon the
dark and lowering horizon in the east. At length
she was observed close hauled upon the wind, and
rapidly skimming behind the headlands of Old Point
Comfort; whence, after some interval, she again
emerged, lessened to the size of a water fowl by
distance
,
and holding her course, with a steady and
resolute
speed, into the palpable obscure of the
perspective
.
When the last trace of this winged messenger of
comfort was lost in the terrific desert of ocean, with
its incumbent night, the watchful and anxious
spectators
on the wharf turned about and directed their
steps, with thoughtful forebodings, to the public house
at some distance in the village.
From what I have related, the reader will be at no
loss to understand the purpose of this perilous
adventure
.
The fact was, that as soon as the intelligence
reached Norfolk that the brig had got into the
dangerous
situation which I have described, some of the
good people of that borough took measures to
communicate
with the crew, and to furnish them such
means of relief as the suddenness of the emergency
enabled them to command. The most obvious
suggestion
was adopted of despatching, forthwith, a
small vessel to bring away those on board, if it should
be ascertained that there was no hope of saving the
brig itself. This scheme, however, was not so easy
of accomplishment as it, at first, seemed.
Application
was made to the most experienced mariners in
port to undertake this voyage; but, they either
evaded
the duty, by suggesting doubts of its utility, or cast
their eyes towards the heavens and significantly
shook their heads, as they affirmed there would be
more certainty of loss to the deliverers than to the
people of the stranded vessel. The rising tempest
and the unruly season boded disaster to whomsoever
should be so rash as to encounter the hazard.
Rewards
were offered; but these, too, failed of effect,
and the good intentions of the citizens of Norfolk
were well nigh disappointed, when chance brought
the subject to the knowledge of our old acquaintance
Abe. This stout-hearted black happened to be in
the borough at the time; and was one of a knot of
seamen who were discussing the proposition of the
chances of affording relief. He heard, attentively,
all that was said in disparagement of the projected
enterprise; and it was with some emotion of secret
pleasure that he learned that several seamen of
established reputation had declined to undertake the
venture. The predominant pride of his nature was
aroused; and he hastened to say, that whatever
terrors this voyage had for others, it had none for
him. In order, therefore, that he might vouch the
sincerity of his assertion by acts, he went
immediately
to those who had interested themselves in
concerting the measure of relief, and tendered his
services for the proposed exploit. As may be
supposed
,
they were eagerly accepted. Abe's
conditions
were, that he should have the choice of his
boat, and the selection of his crew. These terms
were readily granted; and he set off, with a busy
22*
alacrity, to make his preparations. The Flying Fish
was the pilot-boat in which Abe had often sailed,
and was considered one of the best of her class in
the Chesapeake. This little bark was, accordingly,
demanded for the service, and as promptly put at
Abe's command. She was, at that time, lying at the
pier at Hampton, as I have already described her.
The crew, from some such motive of pride as first
induced Abe to volunteer in this cause, was selected
entirely from the number of negro seamen then in
Norfolk: They amounted to four or five of the most
daring and robust of Abe's associates, who, lured by
the hope of reward, as well as impelled by that
spirit
of rivalry that belongs to even the lowest classes of
human beings, and which is particularly excitable
in the breasts of men that are trained to dangerous
achievements, readily enlisted in the expedition, and
placed themselves under the orders of their gallant
and venturous captain.
This tender of service and its acceptance,
produced
an almost universal reprobation of its
rashness
,
from the sea-faring men of the port. And while
all acknowledged that the enterprise could not have
been committed to a more able or skilful mariner
than Abe, yet it was declared to be the endeavour
of a fool-hardy madman who was rushing on his fate.
The expression of such distrust only operated as an
additional stimulant to Abe's resolution, and served
to hurry him, the more urgently forward, to the
execution
of his purpose. He, therefore, with such
despatch
as the nature of his preparations allowed,
mustered
his intrepid crew in the harbour of Norfolk, and
repaired with them to the opposite shore of the
James River, to the little sea-port, where my reader
has already seen him embarking upon his brave
voyage
,
amidst the disheartening auguries of wise and
disciplined veterans of the sea.
I might stop to compare this act of an humble and
unknown negro, upon the Chesapeake, with the
many
similar passages in the lives of heroes whose
names have been preserved fresh in the verdure of
history, and who have won their immortality upon
less noble feats than this; but History is a
stepmother
,
that gives the bauble fame to her own
children
,
with such favouritism as she lists, overlooking
many a goodly portion of the family of her husband
Time. Still, it was a gallant thing, and worthy of
a better chronicler than I, to see this leader and
his little bandthe children of a despised stock
swayed by a noble emulation to relieve the
distressed
;
and (what the fashion of the world will deem a
higher glory) impelled by that love of daring which
the romancers call chivalrythrowing themselves
upon the unruly waves of winter, and flying, on
the wing of the storm, into the profound, dark abyss
of ocean, when all his terrors were gathering in their
most hideous forms; when the spirit of ill shrieked in
the blast, and thick night, dreary with unusual
horrors
,
was falling close around them; when old
mariners
grew pale with the thought of the danger, and
the wisest counselled the adventurers against the
certain
doom that hung upon their path:I say, it was
a gallant sight to see such heroism shining out in an
humble and unlettered slave of the Old Dominion!
They say the night that followed was a night
of the wildest horrors. Not a star twinkled in the
black heavens: the winds rushed forth, like some
pent-up flood suddenly overbearing its barriers, and
swept through the air with palpable density: men,
who chanced to wander at that time, found it
difficult
to keep their footing on the land: the steeples
of Norfolk groaned with the unwonted pressure;
chimneys were blown from their seats; houses were
unroofed, and the howling elements terrified those
who were gathered around their own hearths, and
made them silent with fear: the pious fell upon their
knees: nurses could not hush their children to sleep:
bold-hearted revellers were dismayed, and broke up
their meetings: the crash of trees, fences,
out-buildings
mingled with the ravings of the tempest: the
icicles were swept from the eaves, and from every
penthouse, till they fell in the streets like hail: ships
were stranded at the wharves, or were lifted, by an
unnatural tide, into the streets: the ocean roared
with more terrific bass than the mighty wind, and
threw its spray into the near heaven, with which it
seemed in contact: and, as anxious seamen looked
out at intervals during the night, towards the
Atlantic
,
the light-house, that usually shot its ray over
the deep, was invisible to their gaze, or seen only by
glimpses, like a little star immeasurably remote,
wading through foam and darkness.
What became of our argonauts?The next
morning
told the tale. One seaman alone of the brig
survived
to relate the fate of his companions. In the
darkest hour of the night their vessel went to pieces,
and every soul on board perished, except this man.
He had bound himself to a spar, and, by that
miraculous
fortune which the frequent history of
shipwreck
recounts, he was thrown upon the beach near
Cape Henry. Bruised, chafed and almost dead, he
was discovered in the morning and carried to a
neighbouring house, where care and nursing restored
him to his strength. All that this mariner could tell
was, that early in the night,perhaps about eight
o'clock,and before the storm had risen to its
height, (although, at that hour, it raged with fearful
vehemence,) a light was seen gliding, with the
swiftness
of a meteor, past the wreck; a hailing cry was
heard as from a trumpet, but the wind smothered
its tones and rendered them inarticulate; and, in
the next moment, the spectre of a sail (for no one of
the sufferers believed it real) flitted by them, as with
a rush of wings, so close that some affirmed they
could have touched it with their hands: that, about
an hour afterwards, the same hideous phantom, with
the same awful salutation, was seen and heard by
many on board, a second time: that the crew,
terrified
by this warning, made all preparations to meet
their fate; and when at last, in the highest
exasperation
of the storm, the same apparition made its
third visit, the timbers of the brig parted at every
joint, and all, except the relater himself, were
supposed
to have been engulphed in the wave, and given
to instant death.
Such, was the sum of this man's story. What
was subsequently known, proved its most horrible
conjecture to be fatally true.
Various speculation was indulged, during the first
week after this disaster, as to the destiny of Abe and
his companions. No tidings having arrived, some
affirmed that nothing more would ever be heard of
them. Others said that they might have luffed up
close in the wind and ridden out the night, as the
Flying Fish was staunch and true: others, again,
held that there was even a chance that they had
scudded before the gale, and, having good sea-room,
had escaped into the middle of the Atlantic. No
vessels
appeared upon the coast for several days, and
the hope of receiving news of Abe, was not
abandoned
.
The next week came and went. There were
arrivals
,
but no word of the Flying Fish. Anxiety
began to give way to the conviction that all were
lost. But, when the third week passed over, and
commerce grew frequent, as the spring advanced, all
doubts were abandoned, and the loss of the Flying
Fish and her crew, ceased any longer to furnish
topics of discussion.
My reader must now get back to Swallow Barn.
The story of Abe's adventure had reached the
plantation
,
greatly exaggerated in all the details; none of
which were concealed from Lucy. On the contrary,
the wonder-loving women of the Quarter daily
reported
to her additional particulars, filled with
extravagant
marvels, in which, so far from manifesting a
desire to soothe the feelings of the mother and
reconcile
her to the doom of Abe, all manner of appalling
circumstances were added, as if for the pleasure of
giving a higher gust to the tale.
It may appear unaccountable, but it was the fact,
that Lucy, instead of giving herself up to such grief
as might have been expected from her attachment to
her son, received the intelligence even with
composure
.
She shed no tears, and scarcely deserted her
customary occupations. She was remarked only to
have become more solitary in her habits, and to
evince an urgent and eager solicitude to hear
whatever
came from Norfolk, or from the Chesapeake.
Scarcely a stranger visited Swallow Barn, for some
months after the event I have recounted, that the old
woman did not take an occasion to hold some
conversation
with him; in which all her inquiries tended
to the tidings which might have existed of the
missing
seamen.
As time rolled on, Lucy's anxiety seemed rather to
increase; and it wrought severely upon her health.
She was observed to be falling fast into the weakness
and decrepitude of age: her temper grew fretful, and
her pursuits still more lonesome. Frequently, she
shut herself up in her cabin for a week or a fortnight,
during which periods she refused to be seen by any
one. And now, tears began to visit her withered
cheeks. Meriwether made frequent efforts to reason
her out of this painful melancholy: her reply to all
his arguments was uniformly the same;it was
simple
and affectingI cannot give him up, master
Frank!
In this way a year elapsed; but, with its passage,
came no confirmation to Lucy's mind of the fate of
her son; and so far was time from bringing an
assuagement
of her grief, that it only cast a more
permanent
dejection over her mind. She spoke
continually
upon the subject of Abe's return, whenever she
conversed with any one; and her fancy was filled
with notions of preternatural warnings, which she had
received in dreams, and in her solitary communings
with herself. The females of the family at Swallow
Barn exercised the most tender assiduities towards
the old servant, and directed all their persuasions to
impress upon her the positive certainty of the loss of
Abe; they endeavoured to lift up her perception to
the consolations of religion,but the insuperable
difficulty
which they found in the way of all attempts
to comfort her, was the impossibility of convincing
her that the case was, even yet, hopeless. That
dreadful
suspense of the mind, when it trembles in the
balance
between a mother's instinctive love for her
offspring
,
on the one side, and the thought of its
perdition
on the other, was more than the philosophy or
resignation of an ignorant old negro woman could
overcome. It was to her the sickness of the heart
that belongs to hope deferred,and the more
poignant
,
because the subject of it was incapable of even
that moderate and common share of reason that
would have intelligently weighed the facts of the
case.
Months were now added to the year of
unavailing
regrets that had been spent. No one ever heard
Lucy say wherefore, but all knew that she still
reckoned Abe's return amongst expected events. It
was now, in the vain thought that the old woman's
mind would yield to the certainty implied by the
lapse of time and the absence of tidings, that my
cousin Lucretia prepared a suit of mourning for her,
and sent it, with an exhortation that she would wear
it in commemoration of the death of her son.
Meriwether laid some stress upon this device; for,
he said, grief was a selfish emotion, and had some
strange alliance with vanity.It was a
metaphysical
conceit of his, which was founded in deep
observation
;
and he looked to see it illustrated in
the effect of the mourning present upon Lucy. She
took the dressit was of some fine bombazet,
gazed at it, with a curious and melancholy eye, and
then shook her head and said,it was a mistake:
I will never put on that dress, she observed,
because
it would be bad luck to Abe. What would
Abe say if he was to catch mammy Lucy wearing
black clothes for him?
They left the dress with her, and she was seen to
put it carefully away. Some say that she was
observed
in her cabin, one morning soon after this,
through the window, dressed out in this suit; but
she was never known to wear it at any other time.
About this period, she began to give manifest
indications
of a decay of reason. This was first
exhibited
in unusual wanderings, by night, into the
neighbouring
wood; and then, by a growing habit of
speaking and singing to herself. With the loss of
her mind her frame still wasted away, and she
gradually
began to lose her erect position.
Amongst the eccentric and painful developements
of her increasing aberration of mind, was one that
presented the predominating illusion that beset her
in an unusually vivid point of view.
VOL. II. 23
One dark and blustering night of winter, the third
anniversary of that on which Abe had sailed upon
his desperate voyage,for Lucy had noted the date,
although others had not,near midnight, the
inhabitants
of the Quarter were roused from their
respective
cabins by loud knockings in succession at their
doors; and when each was opened, there stood the
decrepit figure of old Lucy, who was thus making
a circuit to invite her neighbours, as she said, to her
house.
He has come back! said Lucy to each one, as
they loosed their bolts; he has come back! I
always told you he would come back upon this very
night! Come and see him! Come and see him! Abe
is waiting to see his friends to-night.
Either awed by the superstitious feeling that a
maniac inspires in the breasts of the ignorant, or
incited
by curiosity, most of the old negroes followed
Lucy to her cabin. As they approached it, the
windows
gleamed with a broad light, and it was with
some strange sensations of terror that they assembled
at her threshold, where she stood upon the step, with
her hand upon the latch. Before she opened the
door to admit her wondering guests, she applied her
mouth to the keyhole, and said in an audible
whisper
,
Abe, the people are all ready to see you,
honey
!
Don't be frightened,there's nobody will do
you harm!
Then, turning towards her companions, she said,
bowing her head,
Come in, good folks! There's plenty for you all.
Come in and see how he is grown!
She now threw open the door, and, followed by
the rest, entered the room. There was a small table
set out, covered with a sheet; and upon it three or
four candles were placed in bottles for candlesticks.
All the chairs she had were ranged around this table,
and a bright fire blazed in the hearth.
Speak to them, Abe! said the old woman, with
a broad laugh. This is uncle Jeff, and here is Dinah,
and here is Ben,and in this manner she ran over
the names of all present; then continued,
Sit down, you negroes! Have you no manners?
Sit down and eat as much as you choose; there is
plenty in the house. Mammy Lucy knew Abe was
coming: and see what a fine feast she has made for
him!
She now seated herself, and addressing an empty
chair beside her, as if some one occupied it, lavished
upon the imaginary Abe a thousand expressions of
solicitude and kindness. At length she said,
The poor boy is tired, for he has not slept these
many long nights. You must leave him now:he
will go to bed. Get you gone! get you gone! you
have all eaten enough!
Dismayed and wrought upon by the unnatural
aspect of the scene, the party of visiters quitted the
cabin almost immediately upon the command; and
the crazed old menial was left alone to indulge her
sad communion with the vision of her fancy.
From that time until the period at which I saw
her, she continued occasionally to exhibit the same
evidences of insanity. There were intervals,
however
,
in which she appeared almost restored to her
reason. During one of these, some of the negroes
hoping to remove the illusion that Abe was still alive,
brought her a handkerchief resembling that which
she had given to him on his first departure; and, in
delivering it to her, reported a fabricated tale, that it
had been taken from around the neck of Abe, by a
sailor who had seen the body washed up by the tide
upon the beach of the sea, and had sent this relic to
Lucy as a token of her son's death. She seemed, at
last, to believe the tale; and took the handkerchief
and put it away in her bosom. This event only gave
a more sober tone to her madness. She now keeps
more closely over her hearth, where she generally
passes the livelong day, in the posture in which we
found her. Sometimes she is heard muttering to
herself
,They
buried his body in the sands of the sea,
which she will repeat a hundred times. At others,
she falls into a sad but whimsical speculation, the
drift of which is implied in the question that she put
to Meriwether whilst we remained in her cottage;
How many years may a ship sail at sea without
stopping?
CHAPTER XX.
CLOUDS.
The
time had now arrived when it was
necessary
for me to return to New York. It was almost
two months since I had left home, and I was
cautioned
by my northern friends not to remain in the
low-country of Virginia longer than until the middle
of August. Hazard endeavoured to persuade me
that the season had all the indications of being
unusually
healthy, and that I might therefore remain
without risk. He had manifestly views of his own to
be improved by my delay, which rendered him
rather
an interested adviser; and, in truth, we had
grown so intimate by our late associations, that I
felt it somewhat difficult to bring myself to the
necessary
resolution of taking leave. But go I mustor
inflict upon my good mother and sisters that
feminine
torture which visits the bosoms of this solicitous
sex when once their apprehensions are excited on
any question of health. I therefore announced my
fixed determination on the subject to the family, and
pertinaciously met all the arguments which were
directed
to unsettle my resolve, with that hardy denial
of assent which is the only refuge of a man in such a
case. My preparations were made, and the day of
my departure was named.
23*
Unluckily for my plan, the elements made war
against it. The very day before my allotted time,
there came on a soft, drizzling rain, which began soon
after breakfast; and when we met at dinner,
Hazard
came to me, rubbing his hands and smiling with
a look of triumph, to tell me that however obstinate
I might be in my purpose, here was a flat interdict
upon it.
We generally have, said he, what we call a
long spell in August. The rain has begun; and you
may consider yourself fortunate if you get away in a
week. I took it as a jest; but the next morning,
when I went to my chamber-window, I found that
Ned's exultation was not without some reason. It
had rained all night, not in hard showers, but in
that gentle, noiseless outpouring of the heavens,
which showed that they meant to take their own
time to disburthen themselves of their vapour. Far
as my eye could reach, the firmament was clad in
one broad, heavy, gray robe. The light was
equally
diffused over this mass, so as entirely to conceal
the position of the sun; and, somewhat nearer to
earth, small detachments of dun clouds floated
across the sky in swift transit, as if hastening to find
their place in the ranks of the sombre army near the
horizon. I came down to breakfast, where the family
were assembled at a much later hour than usual. A
small fire was burning in the hearth: the ladies were
in undress, and something of the complexion of the
sky seemed to have settled upon the countenances
of all around me;a quiet, unelastic, sober
considerateness
,
that was not so frequently disturbed as
before with outbreaks of merriment. My cousin
Lucretia poured out our coffee with a more sedate
and careful attention: Prudence looked as if she had
overslept herself:Meriwether hung longer over the
newspaper than common, and permitted us to take
our seats at table some time before he gave up
reading
the news. The little girls had a world of care
upon their shoulders;and Parson Chub despatched
his meal with unwonted expedition, and then,
thrusting
his hands into his pockets, went into the hall, and
walked to and fro thoughtfully. Hazard was the
only one of the party who appeared untouched by
the change of the weather; and he kept his spirits
up by frequent sallies of felicitation directed to me,
on the auspicious prospect I had before me.
After breakfast we went to the door. The rain
pattered industriously from the eaves down upon the
rosebushes. The gravel walk was intersected by little
rivers that also ran along its borders; and the
grassplots
were filled with lakes. The old willow,
saturated
with rain, wept profuse tears, down every
trickling fibre, upon the ground. The ducks were
gathered at the foot of this venerable monument, and
rested in profound quiet, with their heads under their
wings. Beyond the gate, an old plough-horse spent
his holiday from labour in undisturbed idlenesshis
head downcast, his tail close to his rump and his
position motionless, as some inanimate thing, only
giving signs of life by an occasional slow lifting
up of his headas if to observe the weatherand a
short, horse-like sneeze.
The rain poured on; and now and then some one
would affirm that it grew brighter, and that, perhaps,
at mid-day it would clear up. But mid-day came,
and the same continual dripping fell from leaf, and
roof, and fence. There was neither light nor shade:
all the picturesque had vanished from the landscape:
the foreground was full of falling drops, and the
perspective
was mist. The dogs crept beneath the porch,
or intruded, with their shaggy and rain-besprinkled
coats, into the hall, leaving their footsteps marked
upon the floor wherever they walked. The negro
women ran across the yard with their aprons thrown
over their heads. The working men moved leisurely
along, like sable water-gods, dripping from every
point, their hats softened into cloth-like consistence,
and their faces, beneath them, long, sober and trist.
During the day, Rip made frequent excursions out of
doors, and returned into the house with shoes
covered
with mud, much to the annoyance of Mistress
Winkle, who kept up a quick and galling fire of
reproof
upon the young scapegrace. As for Hazard
and myself, we betook ourselves to the library,
whither Meriwether had gone before us, and there
rambled through the thousand flowery by-paths of
miscellaneous literature; changing our topics of
study
every moment, and continually interrupting each
other by reading aloud whatever passages occurred
to provoke a laugh. This grew tedious in turn; and
then we repaired to the drawing-room, where we
found the ladies in a similar unquiet mood, making
the like experiments upon the piano. We were all
nervous.
Thus came and went the day. The next was no
better. When I again looked out in the morning,
there stood the weeping willow, the same vegetable
Niobe as before, and there the meditative ducks;
there the same horse,or another like him,looking
into the inscrutable recesses of a fence corner; and
there the dogs, and the muddy-footed Rip. To vary
the scene, we took umbrellas and walked out,
holding
our way trippingly over the wet path towards the
bridge. The pigeons, like ourselves, tired of keeping
the house, had ranged themselves upon the top of the
stable, or on the perches before the doors of their own
domicil, dripping images of disconsolateness. A stray
flock of blackbirds sometimes ventured across the
welkin; and the cows, in defiance of the damp earth,
had composedly lain down in the mud. The only
living thing who seemed to feel no inconvenience
from the season was the hog, who pursued his
epicurean
ramble in despite of the elements.
The rain poured on; and the soaked field and
drenched forest had no pleasure in our eyes; so, we
returned to the house, and again took refuge in the
library. Despairing of the sun, I at length sat down
to serious study, and soon found myself occupied in
a pursuit that engrossed all my attention.
I have said before that Meriwether had a good
collection
of books. These had been brought together
without order in the selection, and they presented a
mass of curious literature in almost every department
of knowledge. My love of the obsolete led me
amongst the heavy folios and quartos that lumbered
the lower shelves of the library, where I pitched
upon
a thin, tall folio, that contained the following
pithy title page, which I have copied exactly as I
found it:Some account of the Renowned
Captayne
John Smith, with his travel and adventures in
the Foure Quarters of the Earthe; showing his
gallante
Portaunce in divers perillous Chaunces, both
by Sea and Land: his Feats against the Turke, and
his dolefull Captivitie in Tartaria. Also, what befell
in his Endeavours towards the Planting of the
Colonie
of Virginia; and, in especiall, his Marvellous
Prouess and Incredible Escapes amongst the
Barbarous
Salvages. Together with Sundrie other
Moving
Accidents in his Historie. London. Imprinted
for Edward Blackmore, 162.
This title was set out in many varieties of type,
and occupied but a small portion of the page, being
encompassed by a broad margin which was richly
illuminated with a series of heraldic ornaments,
amongst which was conspicuous the shield with
three turbaned heads and the motto vincere est
vivere
.
There were, also, graphic representations
of soldiers, savages and trees, all coloured according
to nature, and, as the legend at the foot imported,
graven by John Barra.
The date of the work had been partially
obliterated
,three
numerals of the year being only
distinguishable
;
but from these it was apparent that this
memoir was published somewhere about the end of
the first quarter of the seventeenth century
perhaps
about 1625, or not later than 1629.
The exploits of Captain Smith had a wonderful
charm for that period of my life when the American
Nepos supplied the whole amount of my reading;
but I have never, since that boyish day, taken the
trouble to inquire whether I was indebted for the
captivation of the story to the events it recorded, or
to my own pleasant credulity,that natural stomach
for the marvellous, which, in early youth, will digest
agate and steel. This little chronicle, therefore,
came most opportunely in my way; and I gave
myself
up to the perusal of it with an eager appetite.
I was now on the spot where Smith had achieved
some of his most gallant wonders. The narrative
was no longer the mere fable that delighted my
childhood; but here I had it in its most authentic
form, with the identical print, paper and binding in
which the story was first given to the world by its
narratorfor aught that I knew, the Captain himself
perhaps the Captain's good friend, old Sam
Purchas
,
who had such a laudable thirst for the
wonderful
.
This was published, too, when thousands were
living to confute the author if he falsified in any
point.
And here, on a conspicuous page, was An Exact
Portraictuer of Captayne Iohn Smith, Admiral of
all New England, taken to the life; with his lofty
brow that imported absolute verity on the face of it,
and his piercing eye, and fine phrenological head,
with a beard of the ancient spade cut; arrayed in
his proper doublet, with gorget and ruff; one arm
a-kimbo, the other resting on his sword. Below the
picture were some fair lines inferring that he was
brass without, and gold within. Throughout the
volume, moreover, were sundry cuts showing the
Captain in his most imminent hazards, of a
flattering
fancy, but in total disregard of all perspective.
And here, in view of the window, was the broad
James River, upon which he and his faithful Mosco,
(otherwise called by the more euphonious name of
Uttasantasough), two hundred years gone by, had
sailed, in defiance of twenty kings whose very names
I am afraid to write. History is never so charming
as under the spell of such associations; the narrative
avouched by present monuments, and fact
sufficiently
dim by distance, for the imagination to make what
it pleases out of it, without impugning the veracity
of the story.
I have sometimes marvelled why our countrymen,
and especially those of Virginia, have not taken
more pains to exalt the memory of Smith. With
the exception of the little summary of the schools,
that I have before noticed,and which is
unfortunately
falling into disuse,some general references
to his exploits as they are connected with the history
of our states, and an almost forgotten memoir by
Stith, we have nothing to record the early
adventures
and chivalric virtues of the good soldier, unless
it be some such obsolete and quaint chronicle as this
of Swallow Barn, that no one sees. He deserves
to be popularly known for his high public spirit, and
to have his life illustrated in some well told tale that
should travel with Robinson Crusoe and the
Almanack
at
least through the Old Dominion:and in
the Council Chamber at Richmond, or in the Hall
of Delegates, the doughty champion should be
exhibited
on canvass in some of his most picturesque
conjunctures: And then, he should be lifted to that
highest of all glorifications,the truest touchstone of
renown,the signposts.
Smith's character was moulded in the richest
fashion of ancient chivalry; and, without losing any
thing of romance, was dedicated, in his maturer
years, to the useful purposes of life. It was marked
by great devotion to his purpose, a generous estimate
of the public good, and an utter contempt of danger.
In the age in which he lived, nobleness of birth was
an essential condition to fame. This, unfortunately
for the renown of Smith, he did not possess;
otherwise
,
he would have been as distinguished in history
as Bayard, Gaston de Foix, Sir Walter Manny,
or any other of the mirrors of knighthood whose
exploits
have found a historian. Smith, however, was
poor, and was obliged to carve his way to fame
without
the aid of chroniclers; and there is, consequently,
a great obscurity resting upon the meagre details
which now exist of his wonderful adventures. These
rude records show a perplexing ignorance of
geography
,
which defies all attempts at elucidation.
Muniments
,
however, of unquestionable authenticity,
still exist to confirm the most remarkable prodigies of
his story. The patent of knighthood conferred upon
him by Sigismund Bathor, in 1603, is of this
character
.
It recites some of the leading events of his life,
and was admitted to record by the Garter
King-at-Arms
of Great Britain, twenty-two years afterwards,
when Smith's services in the establishment of the
American colonies attracted a share of the public
attention.
He possessed many of the points of a true knight.
VOL. II. 24
He was ambitious of honour, yet humble in his own
praise,tempering his valour with modesty, and the
reckless gallantry of the cavalier with irreproachable
manners. A simple testimony to this effect, but a
sincere one, is given by an old soldier who had
followed
him through many dangers, and who shared
with him the disasters of the defeat at Rothenturn.
It is appended, by the author of it, to Smith's account
of New England. His name was Carlton, and he
had served as Smith's ensign in the wars of
Transylvania
.
The reader may be gratified to peruse some
of these lines, addressed to the honest Captaine.
Thy words by deeds, so long thou hast approved,
Of thousands know thee not, thou art beloved.
And this great Plot will make thee ten times more
Knowne and beloved than e'er thou wert before.
I never knew a warrior yet but thee,
From wine, tobacco, debts, dice, oaths so free.
* * * * * * * * *
Your true friend, sometime your souldier,
THO. CARLTON.
The uncouthness of the verse accords with the
station
of the writer, and gives a greater relish of
honesty
to the compliment.
It may be pleasing to the fairer portion of my
readers
,
to learn something of his devotion to dames and
lady-love, of which we have good proof. He was so
courteous and gentle, that he might be taken for a
knight sworn to the sex's service. He was a
bachelor
too, by 'r lady!and an honour to his calling;
mingling the refinement of Sir Walter Raleigh, his
prototype, with the noble daring of Essex and
Howard
.
Hear with what suavity and knightly zeal he
commends his gratitude to the sex, in recounting his
various fortunes to the illustrious and most noble
Princesse, The Lady Francis, Duchesse of
Richmond
and Lenox; and with what winning phrase,
like a modest cavalier, he consigns his History of
Virginia to her protection!
I confesse my hand, though able to wield a
weapon
among the Barbarous, yet well may tremble in
handling a pen among so many judicious: especially,
when I am so bold as to call so piercing and so
glorious
an Eye, as your Grace, to view these poore
ragged lines. Yet my comfort is, that heretofore,
honorable and vertuous Ladies, and comparable but
amongst themselves, have offered me rescue and
protection
in my greatest dangers: even in forraine
parts, I have felt relief from that sex. The
beauteous
Lady Tragabizanda, when I was a slave to the
Turkes, did all she could to secure me. When I
overcame
the Bashaw of Nalbritz in Tartaria, the
charitable
Lady Callamata supplyed my necessities. In
the utmost of many extremities, that blessed
Pokahontas
,
the great King's daughter of Virginia, oft
saved
my life. When I escaped the crueltie of Pirats
and most furious stormes, a long time alone, in a
small boat at Sea, and driven ashore in France, the
good Lady, Madam Chanoyes, bountifully assisted
me.
And so verily, these adventures have tasted the
same influence from your Gratious hand, which hath
given birth to the publication of this narration. And,
thereupon, he prays that his poore booke, which
had no helpe but the Shrine of her glorious name to
be sheltered from censorious condemnation, might
be taken under her protection; and that she would
vouchsafe some glimpse of her honorable aspect to
accept his labours, that they might be presented to
the King's Royall Majestie, the most admired Prince
Charles, and the Queene of Bohemia.
He tells her that her sweet Recommendations
would make it worthier their good countenances,
and concludes by assuring her, that this page should
record to Posteritie that his service should be to pray
to God that she might still continue the Renowned
of her Sexe, the most honored of Men, and The
Highly Blessed of God.
How much does all this flavour of the perfect
knight of romance! But, to revert to our Legend.
The authorship of this memoir is left in mystery.
There was no preface nor explanation of the
circumstances
in which it was written. I rather incline to
ascribe it to George Piercie, brother of the Earl of
Northumberland, who was Smith's lieutenant in
Virginia, and, like himself, richly tinctured with the
spirit of the age. It is certain that Piercie furnished
some portions of Smith's History of Virginia, and
was always a gallant comrade in danger. I think
there is something in this nameless story that shows
the hand of one fond of the wars; and it is most
likely
that Smith, in their long intercourse, had often
relieved
the tediousness of their solitary watches by
these narratives, so grateful to the ear of a soldier.
These are thrown together in such loose manner
as might beseem a warrior who had given more time
to his sword than to his pen. A part of the narrative
is avowedly furnished by Francisco Ferneza, a
learned
Italian, who was secretary to Sigismund, and who
was, probably, personally acquainted with Smith.
This person wrote an account of the wars of
Transylvania
,
and corroborates the facts which led the
unfortunate
Sigismund to confer the order of
knighthood
upon our brave captain.
It is my purpose to amuse my reader with a
cursory
compilation from the gay and careless narrative
of my late discovered Legend.
24 *
THE CHRONICLE OF THE LIFE OF JOHN
SMITH.
When
John Smith began the world, your soldier
was your only gentleman. Henry the Fourth had
set France on fire with his gallant fancies, and
win and wear was the true practick of the day.
The Low Countries furnished a fair harvest to the
English reapers; and the glories of brave Lord
Willoughby and of Captains Norris and Turner,
on the fields of Flanders, formed the theme of
household
ballads, that had been sung in Smith's ear
until
he grew frantic with ambition. So, like a young
Varlet of chivalry, with the heart of a lion, a
stalwart
arm, a good sword, and withal a slender purse,
in the year of grace 1594, with scant fifteen years
upon his poll, he took his leave of the town of Lynn,
in Norfolk,where he had been bound apprentice
to a merchant,to seek his fortune wherever honour,
throughout the wide world, was most surely to be
won. He first went to France; but as that nation
had just made a truce to take breath, he was not
long in finding his way to that fruitful land of sieges,
the Low Countries, whither he went under the
banner
of Captain Joseph Duxbury.
His education was none of the best, for youths of
his temperament do not take very kindly to book
and candle; but his disposition was cheery and
venturous, and fit to make the best of whatever
might fall out; his person graceful, and his manners
modest; and his face, if the portraictuer tell truth,
was not unhandsome. At least, so I figure him to
my mind from what I glean of his history.
The Low Countries were overstocked with
gallants
.
And therefore, after a brief service in the
field, our Varlet, having studied what he might of
the art of war, began to look further about him. If
it were only his cue to fight, there was no lack of
the trade for such a cockerel. But he was tender of
conscience, and did not like to abet the quarrel
between
Christian nations; especially while there was
a Turk to be hacked upon the Danube. In fact, he
was a lover of the picturesque, and yearned for
outlandish
adventures.
The Sultan had gained great renown by his recent
wars, and he was then in the field with that most
gorgeous of all creations, a Moslem army. Smith,
therefore, proposed to himself some fortune with the
Arch-duke Ferdinand. He travelled slowly, and
looked about him as he went; and, being of a
trusting
temper, soon slipped into one of those pit-falls
which this world always contrives for the unwary.
It chanced that he fell into the company of four
worthies of a stamp very common in unquiet times,
for all of them were knaves. They had the
address
to persuade him that one was a Lord, and
the others his retainers. Like many before them,
they had just
Come forth of the Low Countree,
With never a penny of money
and having embarked with him in Flanders to sail
to St. Vallery in Picardy, they contrived, on landing,
to rob him of his trunks, and with them, of all his
worldly gear. So entirely did they strip him, that he
was obliged to sell his cloak, though it was in deep
winter, to pay his passage. So much for the first
lesson of experience to the Admiral of New
England
.
It is, doubtless, a hard thing to be set down in a
strange country without money. But this was a
common mishap in those days, amongst soldiers;
and one of that profession might wisely trust to
fortune
.
She did not now abandon Smith, but threw
him in the way of a fellow soldier who was bound
to Caen in Normandy. This good man, seeing that
he had a blithe lad beside him, was touched with
pity for his poverty, and not only supplied his
present
wants, but gave him convoy and welcome to a
goodly circle of friends. Amongst the rest, the Lady
Columber, at Caen, took a fancy to him, and brought
him amongst many persons of worship, who amply
reimbursed his losses, and tempted him with so much
fair entertainment, that he had well nigh forgotten
his purpose against the Turk. From all which I
conclude that he was a comely youth, of pleasant
demeanour.
Here, lest his noble ardour should evaporate
amongst the blandishments of a life of idleness, he
took up the resolution expressed in the ballad;
When he had rested him awhile
In play and game and sportt,
He said he would goe prove himself,
In some adventurous sort.
And, accordingly, after a short delay, he set out
again upon his travels. In this second wandering he
visited many cities in France, being principally led
to the seaports, in the hope of finding a ship of war
bound up the Mediterranean. This circuit was not
without some rough adventures; for he again felt
the pinch of poverty, from which he was relieved by
charity; and he also did a deed of some note, in
punishing
Cursell, one of the four thieves who had
robbed
him of his trunks. He met this freebooter in a
wood, alone; and, as a Varlet of chivalry was an
extremely
pugnacious animal, he did not fail to bring
his spoiler to his weapon: the result was, that
Cursell
,
as my Legend says, no more, from that time
forward, cozened honest men; from whence we
derive
a significant conclusion. This feat happened in
the neighbourhood of the residence of a nobleman
with whom Smith had enjoyed a former
acquaintance
,
the Lord Ployer, to whom he immediately
betook
himself, and received from him prompt and
needful aid; which favours were long and gratefully
remembered by our hero, as I find by The
History
of Virginia, where Anas Todkil writes,this
place (Accomack) we called Point Ployer, in
honour
of that most honourable house of Mounsey in
Britaine, that, in an extream extremitie, once
relieved
our Captayne.
From Brittany, the young adventurer went to
Marseilles, where he took shipping for Italy. The
ship in which he embarked was filled with pilgrims,
under vows to St. Peter's at Rome. There were
many misadventures attending their sailing: first,
they were driven by foul weather into Toulon; and
then, they were compelled to come to anchor under
the little Isle of St. Marguerite, on the coast of
Savoy
.
The winds increased in violence, the waves
tossed more angrily, and the heavens grew blacker,
the longer Smith remained on board. A vote was
accordingly taken by the passengers, who, gravely
judging him to be a Huguenot, readily discovered
the cause of impediment to the voyage. So they
made a Jonah of him, and flung him into the sea,
not so far from shore, however, but that he was able
to reach St. Marguerite's kindly beach.
The next day, a Captain Laroche, with a French
ship from Brittany, a near friend of Lord Ployer, took
him off the island; and, being set upon a cruise,
found in the bachelor Smith a ready comrade. The
Captain Laroche was a gallant sailor, and as full of
adventure as our hero could wish. Moreover, he
drew kindly to his recruit, as well for the love he
bore their common friend, as for the congeniality of
their tempers. They stood across to Cape Bona,
thence to the isle of Lampidosa, and, shortly
afterwards
,
they made Alexandria in Egypt, where they
staid long enough to deliver a cargo. Thence,
cruising
round Candia, Rhodes, and through the
Archipelago
,
and back again, doubling Cape Matapan,
and occasionally touching where their necessities
or convenience required, they reached the island of
Corfu.
Every thing that walked, in these quarrelsome
days, and every thing that swam, went armed in
proof; and Laroche, like a true knight, wooed
danger as a bride. He and Smith both longed
for work in the way of their trade. It was near at
hand. They left Corfu, bound for Otranto,
And days they scant had sayled three,
Upon the voyage they took in hand,
But there they met with a noble shipp,
And stoutly made it stay and stand.
A Venetian argosy, richly freighted, and
homeward
bound, hove in sight. The two belligerents
were well manned, but the advantage in size was
greatly in favour of the enemy. It was a fine sight
to look upon! There was no idle parade, in those
days, between merchantmen of different nations,
speaking each other out of courtesy, to hear the news,
or get the longitude, or a supply of pork and biscuit.
He that wanted a fight could not go wrong; for the
world was made up of war, and play or pay was
the rule of the game. They both stood to quarters,
and a fierce engagement ensued, in which victory
long hung hovering over either banner. At last, the
Venetian vailed his top, and gave up to the
conquerors
as much of his store of piled velvets,
cloth of gold, piastres, sequins and sultanies as they
thought fit to take. After this, each prosecuted his
voyage; the vanquished home, and the victor to
Antibes
in Piedmont, whither he went to repair. Here,
Smith, having taken his first degree in nautical life,
by which he became afterwards so famous, and
having
won a thousand sequins in honourable battle,
went ashore to woo dame Fortune on another
strand.
He now accounted himself a proper man, and,
thereupon, cocking his beaver, and trolling the old
staveSt. George he was for EnglandSt. Denis
was for France, he took to the road, like a free
companion, and travelled all the way to Naples,
having seen some strange sights at Rome on his
journey. Thence, he came back, by another route,
to Florence, to Mantua, to Padua, and to Venice;
visiting gay cities; consorting with cavaliers and
choice spirits; romping with rustic lasses; outfacing
bluff bandits; and tuning himself up to the key of
that wayward, disorderly time, in the best humour of
a bon-camarado who wore silken doublet and trusty
Toledo. Right joyously, I ween, did he look upon
the delightful fields of sunny Italy! And, since the
days of the admirable Creichton, never strode across
them a more elastic foot! For he was now about
twenty years of age, with a plentiful pocket, a thirst
for fame, and a robust constitution,all three
conducing
to the hey-day current of his blood.
Boundless as was his love of travel, it was inferior
to his love of feats of arms. The Emperor, Rodolph
the Second was at that time in the height of his
quarrel with the Sultan Mahomet the Third, who
had just commenced his reign by strangling his
nineteen
brothers, and drowning ten of his father's wives;
and all Europe was armed to the teeth. Smith
looked
with an affectionate interest to these broils; and
hither tended his steps. But resolving, before he
took service, to see something of the Turk in his own
strongholds, he crossed from Venice to Dalmatia,
and forthwith set out for Albania. Here, defying
Musselman and mountain, private treachery and
open challenge, he threaded the defiles of these
tangled
regions alone; became a renegade for the nonce;
put on the capote and turban; walked into their
camp; ate pillau and drank sherbet; lodged in their
fastnesses and towers of strength; and surveyed every
thing with a practised and wily judgment. Then,
turning north, he crossed Mount Hmus, and
traversing
Bosnia and Sclavonia, he reached Gratz in
Stiria, where the Archduke held his head-quarters.
A man of mettle was not to be lost in a crowd
where blows fell thicker than there were heads to bear
them; and Smith, accordingly, soon won favour with
Lord Ebersbaught, and Baron Kisell, and, through
them, with Voldo, Earl of Meldritch; all three of
them officers of note in the Austrian army.
The Turks had just taken Caniza, and were now
besieging Olimpach. Ebersbaught commanded in
the place, and Kisell, at the head of the Archduke's
artillery, vexed the besiegers from without. Smith
entered with the latter as a volunteer, and did good
service. He invented a night telegraph, by which
the two armies were enabled to communicate, and
thus to concert a scheme which, in a most
cunninglie
devised stratageme, by our young volunteer,
drove the Turk from his lines, and compelled him to
raise the siege. He was immediately complimented
for this exploit with a company of two hundred and
fifty men, in the regiment of Count Meldritch.
Thus ended Smith's first campaign. The
Emperor
now began to make himself ready for further
operations
.
He raised three armies, of which the first
VOL. II. 25
was put under the command of his brother, the
Arch-duke
Mathias, and the Duke Mercury,who took
the principal charge in the field. This army was
directed
to the defence of Lower Hungary; and with
a part of it, amounting to thirty thousand men, Duke
Mercury marched to the leaguer of
Stuhl-Weissemburg
.
The regiment of Meldritch was with this
detachment
;
and, with his gallant colonel, Smith
shared, says the chronicle, in many a bloudy
sallie
,
strange stratajeme, and valiant exploit;but,
chiefly, was he commended for the invention of a
hand-grenade, that wrought wondrous detriment
to the enemie.
After much trouble and many blows,
Stuhl-Weissemburg
was taken by the Duke. But the Turks,
having reinforced their army, marched forward with
a purpose to regain their city. They met the Duke
on the plains of Girke, where a most desperate battle
ensued, in which Meldritch performed prodigies of
valour, and where Smith had his horse shot, and was
himself badly wounded. The Duke, however, won
the day, and put an end to the campaign in that
quarter.
This occasioned a separation of the forces. There
was now a triangular war going on in Transylvania.
The native Prince, Sigismund Bathor, was
contending
for his crown against the Emperor; and of the
three armies above mentioned, one was sent by the
Emperor, under the famous George Basta, against
Sigismund. The Turk, on the other hand, was
vexing
the same Prince from the Wallachian frontier;
and both Basta and Sigismund had abundance of ill
will against the Turk. Here was a pretty Gordian
knot to be cut by the sword!
After the defeat of the Turks at Girke, Meldritch
was ordered to join his troops with Basta's. Now,
Meldritch was himself a Transylvanian, and much
beloved. Whereupon he resolved,having nothing
more to his liking,rather to help the Prince against
the Turk, than Basta against the Prince. A soldier
of fortune might in this age, without prejudice to the
honour of his calling, change his colours as often as
he pleased,only preserving good faith in his
contracts
.
Besides, the Emperor was somewhat of a
sluggish paymaster; and as to booty,there was not
so much of that as there were buffets! For all which
reasons, Count Meldritch, and his follower Smith,
found no great difficulty in taking their soldiers into
the Transylvanian service. Sigismund received
them, as all men in straits are apt to receive a friend,
with open arms and fair promises. And
straitway
,
affirms the legend, they were despatched to
trie conclusions against their old enemy the Turkes.
Transylvania was diversely mastered. The Prince
kept his footing in some parts of the territory, the
Emperor had possession of others, and the Turks had
garrisons in some of the southern mountainous
defiles
.
It was in this latter district that the estates of
the father of Count Meldritch lay, and he hoped to
rescue them from the enemy. Here he accordingly,
with Sigismund's permission, carried on a desultory
war.
When the spring opened, Meldritch sat down
before
Regall, a strong fortification and town in the
Zarkam country of Wallachia, encompassed with
mountains, and well garrisoned with a motley band
of Turks, Tartars, Robbers and Renegades. His
army was eight thousand strong; the Turks greatly
exceeded that force; but the Zekler Prince Moyses,
with an army of nine thousand soldiers, came and
added his forces to those of Meldritch, and assumed
command of the whole.
This city of Regall was hitherto deemed an
impregnable
spot, and the Turks were vain-glorious in
their boasts of defence. The siege was long and
obstinate
,
and some bloody skirmishes ensued between
the out posts. Several months were spent; till, at
last, matters began to grow tedious to the impatient
besiegers. The country around them was rich in
picturesque beauty; the season delicious; and all
things contributed to warm the blood into a
mettlesome
gallop. Our gallants were high in heart; but
none so high as the young Captain Smith. And the
Turks were proud and scornful, as in those days,
when the Sultan's banner floated in Buda, they had
good right to be.
There was within the walls a belted knight, of a
laudable ambition to do something worthy of his
spurs; the Lord Turbashaw by name. This
warrior
was the very pink of Eastern chivalry, and
burned
to signalize himself in presence of his mistress.
So, merely to amuse the gentle dames of Regall, he
caused a defiance to be carried to the Christian host,
to any Captain of their army to meet him in single
fight, at such time and place as should be agreed on.
The Christian cavaliers were overjoyed at this
proposal
.
Their answer was prompt and courteous;
they were right glad to certifie to the Lord
Turbashaw how well they approved his
challenge
.
The champion was yet unnamed, and many
sought the honour. It was resolved, therefore, to
choose him by lot. On whom might it fall but upon
our bachelor!
The day for the encounter was appointed; the
lists were prepared, and all the ordinances of
chivalry
were duly observed. A truce of twelve days
for the enjoyment of the pastime was proclaimed,
and every thing in either camp assumed the
cheerful
bustle that of yore belonged to a passage at
arms. It was strange to see hostile men, whom no
purpose of charity nor thought of good could seduce
from the fell pursuit of war, suddenly pile their arms,
and meet in brotherhood and amity, to revel in the
sight of private carnage, and to look upon the
flowing
of the blood of their best companions. Yet such
was the delight of chivalry!
When the day arrived, the lists were surrounded
with whatever beauty dwelt in Regall. Idlers
crowded up to the palisades; and the motley rabble
of the country, beggars, ballad-singers and bandits,
Gypsies, Greeks and Jews, thronged to see the sport.
Nobles and knights took their seats of worship;
and the promiscuous soldiery mingled in the crowd
without fear of treachery or thought of feud. The
men at arms were drawn up in battalia at each
extremity
of the lists; pennons flaunted in the breeze;
and bold and sturdie warriors rode to and fro in the
25 *
menie with joyous looks. The Cross and the
Crescent
fluttered from opposite ends of the barriers;
and one or two knights stood in full armour, the
supporters
and guardians of each.
After the heralds had proclaimed the defiance and
the answer, the trumpet sounded for the onset.
And thereupon,according to my authorthe
Lord Turbashaw, all bedecked in bright and
dazzling
armoure, such as that wont to be borne by
Infidels, shining with gold and silver and precious
stones, and on his shoulders the semblance of rich
and glittering winges, came stately forth upon the
field; the voice of hoboyes and other martial musicke
governed the order of his step; and beside him two
Janisaries, whereof one bore his lance, and the
other led his horse. And now, on the other side,
Smith, clad all in mail, with but a single page
bearing
his lance, and no other musicke but a flourish of
trumpets, and with his horse led behind him,
advanced
to the centre of the lists. And here the two
combatants exchanged salutes, with knightly
courtesy
,such
as beseemeth gallant cavaliers:and,
being readie dight, each did mount in saddle. At
the sound of the charge, the lances were thrown,
and the Turk was wounded; but this so enraged
his valour, that they speedily closed in more
desperate
battle, and, as a verse of an ancient date says
Then tooke they out their two good swordes,
And layden on full faste,
Till helm and hauberk, mail and sheelde
They all were well nye brast.
Then, saith the Legend, did ill success be
tide the Pagan Lord; for Smith, making his vantage
good, pierced him thorow the bars of his helmet,
with such a mortal thrust that he fell dead to the
ground; whereupon, the conqueror quicklie got
down from his horse, and took off his adversarie's
head from his body; and presented it to the Lord
Moyses, who received it with great joy in the
presence
of the whole armie.
The death of Turbashaw so wrought upon his
friend Grualgo, that, in a paroxysm of rage, he
defied
the conquerer to do battle with him; and, as
Smith was now pledged, by the laws of the duello,
to stand against all comers, he did not delay to
answer
the challenge; and accordingly, the next day,
before the same goodly company, with all the pomp
of this sad pastime, they met in the same lists. The
rash Grualgo had a ready swordsman to deal with;
and his head, too, soon became a victor's prize, with
forfeiture of his horse and costly armour.
Smith, no longer a Varlet, had now won his rank,
according to the ancient laws of chivalry, as a
Chevalier
tres hardie; and was looked upon, in all
men's eyes, as a warrior tried. He was loth to let
his courage sleep. The siege waxed dull; the place
was strong, and the beleagured enemy, taught by
experience
,
had grown wary. The flame of glory
blazed brighter than ever in our young soldier's heart;
and he employed his time in martial sports, relieving
the unprofitable hours of his delay by practice with
the sword and lance.
At length, coveting some new adventure, By my
troth! said he, I will teach the saucie Turke to
amuse his dame with somewhat beside his sakre and
falcon! And straightway, continues the
narrative
,
he hied him to the Prince Moyses, to whom,
with much winning speech, and reasons well set
forth in soldierly termes, he urged the delight he
might afford if his behest should be granted; which
was no other than that, for relief of the tediousness
of the leaguer, he should be permitted to despatch
to the citie a trusty messenger, to pay back the
presumptuous
challenge of the Turke, by telling him
that there were yet some christian heads to be won,
if the fayre ladies of Regall would deign to send out
some warrior of ranke to undertake the hazard.
The Lord Moyses consenting to this reasonable
request, an envoy was sent to bear the message. The
Turks were not to be frightened by bravado; for
they had abundance of valiant men; and this insolent
taunt brought forth a chosen and sturdy champion,
one Bony Molgro. The appointments were all
made with the same ceremonies as before, and a
bloody conflict ensued, which brought our springald
into extreme peril. They fought first with pistols,
then with battle axes, with which some lusty blows
were given, that had nearly unhorsed the challenger.
In the course of the fight, Smith was wounded; and
a shout of triumph rent the air from the Turkish
army
.
The chances were against his life; but his
consummate
skill as a horseman stood him in
excellent
stead; for, fetching a circuit round his
antagonist
,
and so featly bending his body as thereby to
avoid the blows aimed at him, he presentlie found
his advantage so open, that, with one quicke leap,
he skilfully struck down his foe with his sword,
piercing him clean through to the back. This
brought Bony Molgro from his horse; and, in little
time, his head was added to the spoils of our notable
warrior. Truly, the ladies of Regall had a dainty
entertainment in these broils!
After these victories, Smith was received by the
army with great pomp; and, as an acknowledgment
of his valour and knightly bearing, Moyses conferred
upon him some presents of great price; a richly
caparisoned
steed, namely, and a scimetar and
baldrick
worth three hundred ducats: and Count
Meldritch
promoted him to a rank of honourable trust in
his regiment.
Regall at length capitulated; and Smith's name
was trumpeted abroad with worthy praise. The
report
of his valour reaching Sigismund, our hero
received
from the prince's hand the honours of
knighthood
,
with a permission to wear three Turks' heads
in his shield, and on his colours. To this boon the
prince added a yearly pension of three hundred
ducats
,
and presented the young knight, also, his
picture
set in gold. These honours were conferred in
1603, when Smith was but twenty-four years old.
History tells how speedily the Emperor, by the
help of the trusty George Basta, put an end to the
pretensions of Sigismund as an independent sovereign
in Transylvania, and reduced him to the rank of a
Baron of Bohemia; in which character he
subsequently
lived at Prague.
Upon the happening of these events, the army was
disbanded, and Basta found himself surrounded with
the malecontent soldiery of Sigismund, whom
therefore
,
to keep in good humour, he sought every
opportunity
to employ on distant service. Opportunely
for this design, a new quarrel now arose.
The Waywode of Wallachia had just died, and.
the Sultan had sent Jeremy Mohila to take
possession
of that province; who having followed that
fashion
of despots common since the days of Nimrod,
namely, of oppressing his people beyond all human
endurance, was obliged to take to flight, by reason
of some popular tumults. This circumstance
suggested
to Basta a profitable method of employing his
idle soldiers; and, thereupon, Earl Meldritch, with
some other officers of note, among whom was our
hero Smith, was sent into Wallachia to assist in
establishing
,
in the name of the Emperor, Stephen
Rudul
as Waywode of the province. Jeremy, in the
mean time, had gathered an army of forty thousand
men, Tartars, Moldavians and Turks, by which
means he contrived to turn the tables on Rudul
before
the arrival of Meldritch and his friends. These,
however, reached Wallachia with thirty thousand
men in their train, and affairs soon became to
assume
a pleasant belligerent aspect. A bloody battle
was fought near Rebrinke, in which Jeremy was
completely routed; and, it is said, five-and-twenty
thousand men were left rotting in the sun;a
trifle
,
considering how cheaply men are hired for such
a game! News now came to Rudul, that certain
raskaile Tartars were committing depredations on
the borders of Moldavia. Whereupon, Meldritch
was detached with thirteen thousand men to keep
them quiet on that frontier. As ill luck would have
it, this was a most pernicious stratagem practised by
Jeremy; for the cunning Turk had prepared an
ambush
,
and lay in wait with a large army.
Meldritch
fell into the snare, and soon found himself
surrounded
by a fierce and bloody-minded multitude.
He retreated, as well as he was able, into the valley
of Veristhorne, upon the river Altus, in that straitened
country known as the Rotherturn Pass. On all sides
of him were high mountains; and nothing remained
for him but to trust to his valour in a desperate effort
to fight his way through the hellish numbers of his
enemy. It was a bold sally that they made! but it
cost them fully as much as it was worth. Basta is
accused of having betrayed this gallant army into this
difficulty, with the wicked purpose of having them
destroyed. He certainly, if this be true, had much
reason to rejoice in his success; for not above
fourteen
hundred escaped, which they did by swimming
the river; and all the rest were slain, or left for no
better than dead men upon the field. Thus died
many noblemen of renown, and many gallant
gentlemen
.
Count Meldritch was amongst the
survivors
,
as also two Englishmen of Smith's company,
ensign Carlton and sergeant Robinson; whilst our
hero himself was most grievously wounded, and lay
amongst the dead bodies. Luckily for him,
however
,
his armour being somewhat costly, the ruffians,
in the hope of ransom, made him a prisoner, and
used some care for his recovery. He got well just in
time to be taken to Axiopolis, where he was set up
for sale in the market place, and bought by the
Pasha
Bogal,a Turkish Falstaff,who, boasting of
his prowess, sent him to Constantinople to be laid at
the feet of the young Charatza Tragabizanda, as
a Bohemian nobleman taken by the pasha's own
hand in battle.
The affair of Rothenturn Pass was a sad
draw-back
to our hero. There is nothing so apt to
disconcert
the schemes of a young and aspiring
cavalier
,
who has taken off three Turks' heads, and filled
his own with notions of glory, as death. The next
thing to this, is being sold for a slave. Both of them,
it will be allowed, are sufficiently disagreeable to a
mettlesome gallant who has won the honours of
knighthood, a shield, and a yearly pension of three
hundred ducats. Smith, however, was an imp of
fame, and his present difficulties only served to
introduce
him to a more strange and eventful fortune;
for, being restored to health, he was decked out in a
lowly habit and sent off to Constantinople, and set
to work amongst the roses and orange trees in the
garden of the unmatchable Lady Tragabizanda.
This lady was a prime beauty, with all the
susceptibility
of a sentimental coquette, who had nothing
to do all day but sit by a sparkling fountain, hear
the tales of interminable story-tellers, and be fanned
by a troop of little slaves, with fans of peacock
feathers
.
Whilst her lover, the Pasha Bogal, was
playing
the braggart on the frontier, and capturing giants,
the gentle dame softly sighed, as her eye fell upon
the unfortunate Bohemian prince, in his menial
dress, digging at the roots of her rose-bushes.
She had, as was common amongst Turkish belles,
a smattering of Italian;and one day, when the
dragon that guarded her was asleep, she contrived to
throw out a few sifting interrogatories in that
language
to our hero, who, in the same tongue, gave
her to understand that her amorous lord was a
preposterous
braggadocio, and a liar to boot, and he
himself
an English gentleman, purchased at half price
in the slave market at Axiopolis. But Smith, as I
said in the beginning, was a handsome fellow, with
a brave, insinuating way about him; and he began
to work wonders in the heart of the dame. In
truth, she fell plainly in love with him; and he, not
to be ungrateful, began to incline as violently to her.
And this is the first and only love affair of our
gallant
captain, whereof I find any record in history.
As often as opportunity favoured, the Charatza
took means to mitigate the severity of her captive's
fortune by such little assiduities a pretty woman
only knows how to offer, and an enthralled bachelor
how to value. One day she sent him a clove, a rose,
and a piece of cloth; which device he had grown
practised enough in Turkish love-making to
understand
according to the liturgy: the clove signified,
I have long loved you, although you are ignorant
of it; the rose, I condole with your misfortunes,
and would make you happy; and the cloth to
me you are above price. His reply was that of a
Chevalier tres hardie: it was conveyed by returning
a spear of straw, with the words appropriate to the
symbol written on the envelope, Oliim sana
yazir
,
receive me as your slave.
Affairs had well nigh come to a critical pass; for,
VOL. II. 26
shortly after this, the lovers had a stealthy meeting
at moonlight; and our hero, who had a stomach for
any hazard, whispered in her ear how excellent it
would be to climb over the garden wall, by the help
of a cypress, whilst he would undertake to strangle
her keepers; and then, after clearing the confines of
their prison, he said, they might make their way
over sea to England. And there, upon the spot,
like an impassioned galliard, he dropped on one
knee, seized her hand, kissed it, and swore to be her
own true knight. The beautiful girl hesitated,
faltered
and wept:
The wall was so high,
And the sea was so deep!
The lover pressed his suit, and pressed her hand;
protested that all dangers of earth, air or sea were
very bagatelles to the all-conquering energy of his
passion; and again gently besought her consent.
Whereupon
The ladye blushed scarlette redde,
And fette a gentle sighe:
Alas, Syr Knighte, how may this bee,
For my degree's so highe?
There is no telling how this matter might have
ended, if it had not been for an old woman,no less
a crone than the Lady Tragabizanda's own mother,
who happened to be listening to the nightingale
under
the covert of a fig-tree, whence, in the moonlight,
she perceived the gallant slave upon his knees before
her daughter. Here followed a direful explosion!
The assignation was broken up in a storm of
Turkish
objurgation; the lady was ordered off to her
bower, and the lover to his cell, to be chained to the
wall, and to dream of the bowstring. The next day,
however, Smith was shipped off in a chaloupe, on a
voyage up the Black Sea; the purpose of which
sudden
removal he afterwards discovered to be, to
prevent
his being sold, and that the Lady Tragabizanda,
to avoid this mishap, had been compelled to send him
to her brother Timour, Pasha of Nalbritz, among the
Nogai Tartars.
The voyage was long, but not without interest to
Smith, as it gave him a sight of new countries. He
coasted along, on the northern shore, beyond the
Crimea, and was at last conducted into the
country
lying between Caucasus and the Don, in which
region was this pleasant site of Nalbritz. Timour,
although the brother of the lovely Charatza, was
nothing
better than a hard-headed savage, surrounded
by hard-hearted barbarians. The Pasha, having
received
some intelligence of what had transpired in
the garden, straightway stripped the unlucky captain
of his habiliments, and substituted for them a rough
tunic of wool, and an iron collar, and then set him to
wait upon his ruffians, in the meanest place of
all.
If there be ever a time when a gay and ambitious
spirit may be excused for sinking into despondency,
it is when a young soldier, who has won a crest, and
almost won a princess, is installed in the lowest
office
of a Tartar's household; with a sturdy
sheep-skin
savage to flourish a whip over his back, and, just
as the whim prompts, to lay it upon his shoulders.
It made Smith very dogged; but, it did not subdue
his temper. For, one day, the Pasha had him
threshing
corn, and, in order to see how the work was
getting on, rode out to his grange, and was somewhat
rude in his demeanour. Smith flourished his
threshing
bat with his usual address, and as soon as the
Pasha happened to come within his reach, he
contrived
to give the implement a lively gesticulation in
the air, and brought it down, with excellent effect,
upon his lord's cranium. And instantly there was
an end of Timour the Tartar!
There was no time to be lost; so, stripping the
body of its foppery, he indued himself with the spoil;
thrust the brutal carcass under a heap of straw;
mounted the fine Arabian charger that champed his
bit hard by; and, with scimetar by his side, and
pistols
in his belt, betook himself to the desert, an
unquestioned
Tartar knight; with the speed of an
uncaged
pigeon, leaving the towers of Nalbritz behind
him.
For sixteen days he sped across the wilderness,
challenging all wayfarers, and exacting such scant
hospitality as his good sword or fair words might win
him. All his confident gaiety of heart revived
within
him, and he travelled his forlorn path as merrily
as ever bridegroom travelled to his mistress.
His first halt in Christendom was at a petty
Russian
fortress upon the Don, where the charitable
Lady Callamata relieved his wants with many
kindnesses. Pursuing his journey, he arrived at Her
manstadt. Thence he went to Leipsic, where he
met Prince Sigismund, who received him with much
affection, and gave him, with other tokens of regard,
fifteen hundred ducats. Here he also found his bluff
old friend Count Meldritch. He now travelled
through Germany and France, and came to Paris;
thence he went into Spain, visiting Burgos,
Valladolid
,
Madrid, Cordova, Cadiz, and other cities.
Not yet satisfied with his banquet of adventures,
and having a new crop of chivalric fancies sprouting
up in his heart, he began to look around for more
employment
.
And where, of all the places on this
fretful
and pugnacious globe, does my reader suppose
that this insatiate follower of a fray now turned
himself
to pick up a quarrel?
He betook himself to the Barbary coast, to visit
the famous cities of Fez and Morocco. The
occasion
of this voyage was as follows: The Emperor
Muley Hamet, amongst his innumerable children,
had two sons who disputed the succession. Their
names were Muley Shah and Muley Sidan. This
bred a coolness in the family, which presently turned
into a heat; and the affairs of the household came to
be sadly involved.
It now came into our good knight's head that this
was a marvellous proper debate, and was likely to
afford many soldierly gratifications. I will turn my
Tartar scimetar to some wholesome account with
these dog-headed Muleys: A nimble witte doth
craftilie devise cunning fortunes, said he, as he cast
up his computation of fame, and slid his hand along
the blade of Timour's sabre, and then glanced his
eye over his wardrobe. Accordingly, with his head
stuffed full of the romance of the Alhambra, and his
portmanteau filled with good store of new
trunkhose
,
26 *
jerkin and doublet, he set forward for the
dominions
of Muley Hamet. But, before his arrival
on the coast, lo! an accident happened in the
family
.
It fell out in this way. Muley Hamet's
principal
wife had taken it into her head to help her son
Muley Sidan to the throne. And as a woman, in
her own house, is apt to manage adroitly whatever
belongs to the domestic department, in this instance
the Empress's tactics were very successful. She
poisoned her husband, and Muley Shah, his son by
another wife; and for fear there might be some
disturbance
from two of the young princesses, who
were acquainted with the transaction, she poisoned
them likewise, although one was her own daughter,
and the other her step-daughter. After this, her
favourite
Muley Sidan, like a dutiful son, stepped into
his father's vacant seat, where he sat cross-legged,
one of the most composed and magnificent of
monarchs. This little incident completely restored the
peace of the empire, and hushed up the family
scandal
.
It, at the same time, put an extinguisher upon
the flame of Moorish glory that burnt in the bosom
of our hero. There was nothing left for him to do
but to travel about for his amusement, which he did
through the fair cities of Mauritania, for some
months; until, growing tired of this innocent
pastime
,
he was obliged, in his own despite, to hie him
home to that luckless land of comfort, where the
wager of battle was growing unfashionable, and
where he had nothing to do but to be happy. So,
biting a peevish lip, he e'en turned on his heel, and
slowly wended his way to merry England.
There he arrived with an addition, since he last saw
it, of ten years' manhood on his brow, a tawny
cheek, some honourable scratches, a light heart, and
a thousand golden ducats in his pouch.
He had now gone through his probation; and
from this time forward, his character exhibited the
most serviceable qualities. From the ranting, easy,
gay comrade, he suddenly became a thoughtful and
stately patriot, and turned his attention to schemes
of grave import, with an earnest desire to promote
his country's good, and leave a name behind him
that posterity might honour.
Some twenty years before this time, the valiant
Grenville, under the auspices of Sir Walter Raleigh,
had made an ineffectual effort to plant a colony in
Wingandacoaafterwards called Virginia. The
failure was sad;the planters had all perished. In
the year 1606, certain of the nobility, gentry and
merchants, who held a patent for the government
of Virginia, prevailed on Captain Gosnell, and some
others, to attempt a new settlement; and Smith,
struck with the grandeur of the idea of founding a
new empire, became a ready and zealous friend of
the enterprise. The more he thought of it, the more
it fired his imagination, and jumped with that brave,
adventurous humour which was so prevalent in his
character.
Who can desire, says he, with great
earnestness
,
in speaking of this career, more content, that
hath small meanes, or but onely his own merit to
advance
his fortunes, then to tread and plant that
ground he has purchased by the hazard of his life?
If he hath any graine of Faith or zeale in Religion,
what can he do less hurtful to any, or more
agreeable
to God, then to seeke to convert those poore
Salvages to know Christ and humanity? What so
truly sures with honour and honesty, as the
discovering
things unknowne, erecting Townes,
peopling
Countries, informing the ignorant, reforming
things unjust, teaching vertue and gaine to our
native
Mother Country? It was with such sentiments
that he entered upon that splendid emprise which
has given the chief renown to his name. And
he pursued it with a singleness of design that never
was excelled.
After an earnest devotion to the cause of the
colonies
for nineteen years, and an expenditure from his
own purse (by no means a plentiful one) of more
than a thousand pounds; and after three years of
the severest personal exposure and privation, he has
occasion to say,rather in the way of exultation
than complaint,in neither of those countries have
I one foot of land, nor the very house I builded, nor
the ground I digged with my owne hands, nor ever
any content (remuneration) or satisfaction at all.
His whole purpose was to rear up his beloved
Virginia
into a thriving and happy commonwealth;
and with that aim, he valued no sacrifice at too high
a price. I have not been so ill bred, said he,
but I have tasted of plenty and pleasure, as well
as want and misery; nor doth necessitie yet, or
occasion
of discontent, force me to these endeavours;
nor am I so ignorant what small thankes I shall
have for my paines, or that manie would have the
world imagine them to be of great judgment, that
can but blemish these my designs by their witty
objections
or detractions. In truth, he was guided
by the most enlightened spirit: his valour, prudence,
and temperate counsel accomplishing more towards
the planting of the colony, than those of any other
person of his day.
He remained in Virginia until the close of the
year 1609, being for the first two years a member of
the council, and for the last year the president.
His history during that period is a narrative of
noble
daring, wise expedients, imminent perils, and all
the chances of savage warfare, in which were
signally
displayed the virtues of a brave captain and of
a skilful councillor. These adventures are full of
deep interest, and they throw about the character
of Smith a rich hue of romance, that, since the days
of Froissart, scarcely belongs to any actor in the
annals
of men. When it is also recollected that the
testimony upon these details is clear and
indubitable
,
and that the hero of them was, during the
passage
of these events, only between twenty-seven
and thirty years of age, we cannot but regard it as
one of the most surprising exhibitions of history.
For the story I must be content to refer my reader
to Smith's own History of Virginia, as it is not
my purpose to pursue the chronicle into much of this
portion of his life; seeing that the circumstances it
relates, being largely connected with our national
annals, are more commonly known than what I
have given of his previous wanderings.
The colony had been sadly mismanaged by the
company in England. Instead of the sturdy natures,
fit to contend with the rough spirit of the wilderness,
it became the resort of poore gentlemen,
tradesmen
,
servingmen, libertines, and such like, ten times
more fit to spoyle a commonwealth then maintaine
one, and unruly gallants, packed thither by their
friends to escape ill destinies. This wretchedly
assorted community found Smith's discipline but
little
tolerant of their lazy humours; whereupon,
violent
factions and seditions arose, which at last
compelled
him to throw up his commission, and to return
to England. He did so, at the period above
mentioned
;
having during the short space of his
administration
humbled the power of Powhatan, and
explored
the Chesapeake up to the country of the
Sasquesahanoughs.
His return is feelingly deplored by George Piercie
who has made it the occasion, with two of his
company
,
to pay a grateful and eloquent compliment to
his leader, in language which imputes to him the
highest virtues of a true knight. What shall I
say of him but this, that in all his proceedings he
made justice his first guide, and experience his
second
;
even hating basenesse, sloath, pride and
indignitie
more then any dangers: that never allowed more
for himselfe then his souldiers with him: that upon no
danger would send them where he would not lead them
himselfe: that would never see us want what he either
had or could, by any meanes, get us: that would rather
want then borrow, or starve then not pay: that loved
action more then words, and hated falshood and
covetousness
worse then death: whose adventures were
our lives, and whose losse our deaths.
In England, after his return, he was chiefly
employed
in stirring up the public mind to the assistance
of the plantations, communicating useful knowledge,
and devising schemes for their success. In the year
1614 he visited New England, and the next year
was furnished with two ships, for the establishment
of a colony in that quarter, with the title of Admiral.
But, not many days after leaving Plymouth, his own
vessel proved unseaworthy, and he was obliged to
put back, leaving his consort to proceed on her
voyage
.
Being now furnished with nothing better than
a small pinnace, he made a second attempt to cross
the Atlantic, but was captured by pirates of his own
nation. Escaping from these, he fell into the hands
of a French cruiser, who compelled him to assist in
several naval actions against the Spaniards; but
being
favoured, whilst off the Isle of Re, on the coast of
France, with an opportunity of flight, he took a small
boat, on a stormy night, and made for the shore.
The violence of the tempest drove him out to sea,
where he was tossed about for three days, alone, and
without provisions. He succeeded however, after
excessive toil, in reaching the shore at the mouth of
the Garonne, whence he found his way to Rochelle,
and again had reason to do homage to that sex who
had never used him but with kindness, for the
soothing
attentions of the excellent Madame Chanoyes.
Upon regaining his country, he found Pocahontas,
who three years before had been married to John
Rolfe. The story of his interview with her is told by
himself in a letter to the queen, and, taken along
with their former acquaintance, their romantic
adventures
,
her passionate love for him, her heroism and
singular
fortunes, constitutes one of the most touching
episodes of personal history. The whole of this
adventure
shows our hero in the most attractive light, and
has given him a renown that has long made his name
a pleasant sound to a lady's ear. He never recurs to
the blessed Pocahontas but with a tender
remembrance
,
and in a strain of the softest and gentlest
gratitude.
She was but a child of twelve or thirteen when
she saved his life at Werowocomoco;King
Powhatan's
most precious daughterand she loved Smith
with that instinctive love that nature kindles in the
breast of unsophisticated woman for a noble and
valiant
cavalier. The hazards she encountered in his
behalf were such as nothing but fervent affection
could have endured. Some of these are told, by an
eye-witness, with a touch of exquisite simplicity.
On one occasion, Smith and sixteen of his
followers
were in great straits at Pamaunkee, whither they
had been beguiled by the address of Powhatan, who
had prepared seven hundred warriors to way-lay
them. But the bravery of the captain had baffled
their scheme. The king at last, with a refined
treachery under a seeming friendly guise, provided
them a plentiful banquet at his own court, where he
hoped to surprise them at supper, get possession of
their arms, and put them to death. The narrative
relates the event with scriptural plainness: The
Indians, says Piercie, or whoever be the narrator,
with all the merrie sports they could devise, spent
the time till night. Then they all returned to
Powhatan
,
who all this time was making ready to
surprise
the house and him at supper. Notwithstanding,
the eternal all-seeing God did prevent him, and by
a strange meanes. For Pocahontas, his dearest
jewell and daughter, in that darke night, came
through the irksome woods, and told our captaine
great cheere should be sent us by and by, but
Powhatan
,
and all the power he could make, would after
come kill us all,if they that brought it could not
kill us with our own weapons, when we were at
supper
:
Therefore, if we would live, she wished us
presentlie
bee gone! such things as shee delighted in, hee
would have given her; but with the teares running
downe her cheekes, shee said shee durst not be seene
to have any; for if Powhatan should know it, shee
were but dead. And so shee ranne away by
herselfe
,
as shee came.
Pocahontas had grown up to woman's estate after
Smith had quitted the country, and, being persuaded
that he was dead, had consented to become the wife
of Rolfe; was converted to the christian faith, and
now bore the title of the Lady Rebecca.
Hearing
,
says Smith, that she was at Branford, with
divers of my friends I went to see her. After a
modest
salutation, without any word she turned about,
obscured her face, as not seeming well contented.
But, not long after, she began to talke, and
remembered
mee well what courtesies shee had done,
saying
,
you did promise Powhatan what was yours should
bee his, and he the like to you: you called him
father
,being
in his land a stranger, and by the same
reason, so must I doe you!
VOL. II. 27
Smith's loyalty revolted, in those days of the divine
right, at this familiarity in the daughter of a king,
and he told her so; but she, not comprehending so
refined a scruple, and reading his embarrassment in
his looks, with a well set countenance, she said,
Were you not afraid to come into my father's
countrie
,
and caused feare to him and all his peoplebut
me; and feare you here I should call you father? I
tell you I will, and you shall call me childe; and so
I will bee for ever and ever your countrie-woman.
They did tell us alwaies you were dead, and I knew
no other till I came to Plimoth.
This amiable princess longed to return to her
native
wilds; and for this purpose, soon after the
meeting
above mentioned, repaired to Gravesend with her
husband, to embark, but unhappily fell a prey to
sickness before she got on ship-board. She left an
only child, Thomas Rolfe, who was adopted and
educated by Sir Lewis Stukely, and afterwards
inherited
a good estate in the realms of his royal
grandfather
.
The chronicle does not record the death of Smith;
but, from another source, I learn that it happened in
Cheshire in England, on the twenty-first of June,
1631, he being then fifty-two years of age. Many a
coward has wondered how it comes to pass that so
many men, with the most judicious forethought to
avoid disaster, should be struck down in their first
fray, whilst such danger-seeking wights as John
Smith, who have worn out their shoes to find new
perils to life and limb, should nevertheless run the
whole gantlet of fate unscathed, and in the end die
soberly in their beds. Whereto I reply, that these
gallants are the decoy-ducks of destiny, and live to
tell of their escapes, that dubious men may be
persuaded
to great undertakings, and that the difficult
passages of human affairs may be achieved even by
the necessary loss of thousands of over-venturesome
fools. If this be no answer, then I tell my querist
that there is an old saw that settles the point;
Every bullet has its billet.
I closed the Chronicle, and restored it to its shelf in
the library with a renewed admiration for the hero
of the Old Dominion; in whom I found so much of
plain sense, mingled with the glory of manhood; so
much homely thought and wise precept sustaining
dauntless bravery; so much gay and chivalrous
adventure
set off with such sturdy honesty, that I
thought I could not better entertain my reader than
by giving him a running sketch of the contents of the
Chronicle, which I have endeavoured to do in the
vein which the perusal excited in my own mind.
Perhaps
,
the cavalier and lightsome tone in which the
story is told by the author of the Chronicle, and his
manifest leaning to invest his friend with the interest
of a galliard and pleasant knight, may have thrown
my thoughts into this channel. I desire my reader
to get the history and read for himself, wherein I wish
him grace to profit both in wisdom and delight. The
character seems to be summed up in the following
passage from Chaucer, which, in opposition to the
custom of all other writers, I append at the end of
my story, as a motto,instead of the beginning.
A knight there was, and that a worthy man,
That fro the time that he firste began
To riden out, he loved chevalrie,
Trouthe and honour, fredom and curtesie.
At mortal batailes hadde he ben fiftene,
And foughten for our faith at Tramissene
In listes thries, and ay slain his fo.
This ilke worthy knight hadde ben also
Somtime with the lord of Palatie,
Agen another hethen in Turkie:
And evermore he hadde a sovereine pris.
And though that he was worthy he was wise,
And of his port as meke as is a mayde,
He never yet no vilaine ne sayde
In alle his lif, unto no manere wight.
He was a veray parfit, gentil knight.
CHAPTER XXI.
PLEASANT PROSPECTS.
The
rain had ceased, and nature was again
arrayed
in the brilliancy of sunshine at the expiration
of three days. The Chronicle had so pleasantly
beguiled
the term of my confinement, that I almost
regretted
the returning azure of the sky which was to
summon me away from the delights of Swallow
Barn. The air had grown cooler by the late rains;
the verdure of the fields, before parched by the
summer
drought, was now partially revived, and the
country
wore something of the freshness of spring. I had
determined that my homeward journey should be
inland
,
and my design, therefore, was to take the
public
stage from Petersburg, thence to Richmond,
Fredericksburg and Washington.
Soon after breakfast on the day of my departure,
Meriwether's carriage was at the door to transport
me as far as the first of the towns mentioned above.
I found that my cousin Lucretia had provided me a
store of refreshment sufficient to have sustained me
all the way to New York. This was neatly put up
in a basket, and placed in the carriage, on the plea
that I might be hungry upon my journey; or, at all
events, that I might not find as good fare at the inns
as I desired. It was in vain to refuse; the stages
were long, and no one knew the comfort of being
well stocked with such necessaries until he was
on the road. I submitted with a good grace,
resolved
to leave what was given me in the carriage,
when I arrived at Petersburg.
And now came the moment of leave-taking, the
most painful of all the accompaniments of travel.
If I had been nurtured in the family from infancy, I
could not have called forth more affectionate
solicitude
;
and I was obliged to promise, what already
was indeed my secret purpose, to repeat my visit.
Meriwether expressed the kindest concern at my
leaving him, and engaged, what was quite unusual
for him, to write to me frequently after I should
arrive
at home. The little girls kissed me a dozen
times, and the whole household, servants and all,
collected at the door to exchange farewells. Ned
Hazard now sprang into the carriage with me, and
we drove off.
That night I arrived at Petersburg. Hazard and
I parted here the next morning, with many vows of
friendship.
In due course of time, I was safely seated at
Longsides, upon the North River, where I have
become
famous, at least with my mother and sisters,
for my long stories and rapturous commendations of
Swallow Barn, and my peremptory way of telling
how things are done in the Old Dominion.
POSTSCRIPT.
In
the course of the winter that followed my
return
to Longsides, I received several letters from
Hazard, from Meriwether, and, indeed, from most of
the family. Harvey Riggs, also, has been a punctual
correspondent. A letter from him, dated the tenth
of January, 1830, gives me a droll history of the
festivities
at the Brakes on the first day of the year,
when, in pursuance of an arrangement which Ned
himself had before communicated to me, Hazard and
Bel were joined in the bands of holy wedlock, Bel
having, at last, surrendered at discretion. Harvey's
comments upon this incident are expressed in the
following extract:
After you left us, Ned relapsed into all his
extravagancies
.
In truth, I believe Bel grew heartily tired
of that incompatible formality of manner which he
assumed
at our instigation. It sat upon him like an ill
fitted garment, and rendered him the dullest of
mortals
.
Bel took the matter into consideration, and at last
begged him to be himself again. Never did a
school-boy
enjoy a holiday more than he this freedom; the
consequence was, that the wight ran immediately
into
the opposite extreme, and has carried the prize,
notwithstanding he had trespassed against all
decorum
,
and had been voted incorrigible. The stars
have had an influence upon this match! I devoutly
believe that it all comes from old Diana's prophecy.
Meriwether discourses philosophically upon the
subject, and says that `marriage is a matter to be
soberly looked at; for if it be unwisely contrived, it is
one of the most irrevocable errors in the world,
though not the most unlikely to have its full share of
repentance.'
The revelry had scarcely ceased at the date of this
letter; and it was a part of the family plans that
Ned should live, for the present, at the Brakes.
Accounts as late as April inform me, that Philly
Wart had just been re-elected to the Legislature,
much against his wish, and, indeed, in the face of his
protestations that he declined a poll. He is said to
have remarked, rather petulantly, at the close of the
election, that it was all nonsense to argue the
question
of constitutional doctrine,here was a case in
point,the will of the constituent will bindt he
representative
in spite of all theories! The worthy
barrister had, a short time before, covered himself
with glory by one of his most flowery speeches at the
bar, in defending his brother, Toll Hedges, upon an
indictment for an assault on one of the justices of
the quorum.
It is at a still later date that Ned writes me
touching
the affairs at the Brakes. Mr. Tracy had not
yet become reconciled to the extinction of the
lawsuit
.
Ned accompanied him lately upon his
morning
ride, and the old gentleman took his course to
the Apple-pie. Here, as Ned describes him, he took
a stand upon the mound that formed one of the
abutments
of the dam, and remained silently pondering
over the landscape for a full hour, and, most of the
time, tugging at his underlip with his hand. It
was singular, he remarked to Hazard, after this
interval
,
that Meriwether should have fallen into the
error of thinking that he had a claim to this land. I
have a mind to give him my ideas on paper. It will
be instructive to you, Mr. Hazard.
Frank stood upon his survey, replied Ned.
I doubt if there was a survey, rejoined the old
gentleman; there is no memorandum of it in my
notes.
Ned was almost afraid to contradict him; but at
length ventured to say,
It was produced, you remember, at the trial,
signed by Jeremiah Perkins himself.
Mr. Tracy knitted his brows for a moment, and
then said, It is very strange! I don't think there was
a survey. There is some mistake. I wish the thing
were to go over again!
The tenor of all my letters now shows that every
thing goes on smoothly on the James River, and that
the Old Dominion contains some very happy persons
within its bosom.
THE END.